The information presented in this section will provide you with a greater understanding of topics related to personal lines property and casualty insurance. This chapter is not required for your state exam, but is included as part of your producer prelicensing education.

IMPORTANT! DO NOT PRINT THIS CHAPTER - IT IS UNUSUALLY LONG AND WILL CONSUME A LARGE AMOUNT OF PAPER IF PRINTED.
Personal Auto Insurance (PAP): Policy Structure
There are several types of personal lines insurance. Personal property coverage is available through homeowners, dwelling and mobile home insurance. Personal automobile policies provide personal liability protection and coverage for damage to a personal automobile. In this course, you will learn about the most common types of personal lines insurance.

The insurance agent may be familiar with the old adage, "Life insurance is sold; property and casualty insurance is bought." Automobile insurance is certainly "bought," and in many jurisdictions, a vehicle may not be licensed until proof of insurance can be established. Automobile insurance is written in as simplistic terms as possible so that the policyholder can understand the provisions. Unfortunately, the percentage of insureds who take time to read and understand their policy is really small, and most policyholders do not look at their policy until the time of a claim. Even then, they prefer an agent's help in interpreting the policy provisions and limitations. Automobile insurance is designed to protect the financial interest in the covered auto, protect against legal liability, and to provide medical coverage for those injured. Of course, not all possible expenses or losses will be covered because each insurance policy has limitations and exclusions, but it will protect most policyholders from severe financial losses as a result of an automobile accident.

At the beginning of each personal automobile policy (PAP), the insured will find policy declarations, agreement, and definitions. This module discusses each of these policy components.

1. Declarations Page
The declarations page identifies the policy number, the parties to the agreement, and other considerations, such as the identification of the vehicle(s) insured, name and address of the named insured, time and date of coverage, the limits of coverages, etc. Basically, it identifies the who, what and where in specifics.

The formats vary from company to company, but the information contained is rather consistent.

2. Agreement Section
As with any other contract, the wording in the agreement section is preceded by a statement that simply states that the services will be performed (by the insurance company) as shown in the policy, as long as the premiums are paid. This may be simple, but it accomplishes two purposes:

It identifies the premium as the consideration given by the insured and the promises as consideration of the insurance company.
It incorporates all of the subsequent terms of the policy by referring to them specifically.
To illustrate, the agreement section may start with the following wording: "In return for payment of the premium and subject to all the terms of this policy, we agree with you as follows:"

3. Definitions Section
Policies contain a definitions section, which defines the terms used in the policy, with particular emphasis on how they apply to what is required of the insurer and the insured.

Many, if not most, insurers use the first and second person pronouns in writing the policy, whereby the insured(s) is/are referred to as "you" and "your." Conversely, the insurer is referred to as "we,""us," and "our." 

Some companies will always put certain important terms in quotations marks (such as "named insured" or "named vehicle"). Other companies may use a boldface print for the same purpose.

It is imperative that the object (private passenger automobile) be defined so that there is no question as to what is insured. In most policies, a private passenger car is an auto, pickup or van ("car" and "auto" and "automobile" may be used interchangeably in this text) that is owned by the insured(s) or leased for a period of at least 6 months under a written lease. It is used primarily for personal use.

When the term "bodily injury" (BI) is discussed, as it is in many places, it refers to actual harm to the physical body (not mental), sickness, disease or death, that occurs as the result of a situation covered by the policy.

A "business" includes such things as a trade (carpenter, plumber, etc.), profession, or occupation, broadening the definition considerably from common usage.

Because the policy, in several places, includes or excludes "family members," they are defined as any person related to the insured by blood, by marriage or by adoption who resides in your household. A ward or foster child is included in the definition of a member of the family.

Certain coverages apply while the insured is "occupying" the vehicle. "Occupying" means that the insured is either in the vehicle, is getting into the vehicle, is upon the vehicle (tractor or motorcycle come to mind), or in the process of getting out or off of the vehicle.

"Property damage" means actual physical injury to property, the destruction of the property, or the loss of the use of tangible property as a result of a situation covered by the policy.

"Tangible" property means actual property that one can see or touch.

Frequently policyholders will tow a trailer without even considering whether the trailer also is covered under their automobile policy. For the purposes of insurance, a "trailer " is a vehicle that is designed to be pulled by a private automobile, pickup, or van. It also can pertain to a farm wagon or farm implement while being towed by the insured vehicle(s).

A "fifth-wheel" trailer is a trailer that rests partially on the bed of a pickup truck. Fifth-wheel trailers are so large that they cannot be pulled by a car, but because they can be pulled by a pickup, and a pickup is considered a passenger car in the policy, they will be covered under the PAP.

Most policies use the terms "covered auto,""covered vehicle," etc., so it is necessary to define what this means. Policies are rather explicit as to what is covered, but basically the covered auto is the vehicle that is shown in the declarations. Although this is obvious, the question arises frequently in regard to newly acquired vehicles. The requirements are such that they may need further explanation.

Personal automobile insurance policies are designed to cover individually owned private passenger automobiles, pickups, or vans, with a gross vehicle weight of less than 10,000 pounds. They are to be used for "personal" usage, and if they are used for delivery or transporting goods and materials, such usage must be incidental to an insured's "business" (see discussion of "business" above) and incidental to installing, maintaining, or repairing furnishings or equipment. Because of the nature of the work, farming and ranching usage is allowed. The language of this section makes it clear that only those private passenger vehicles are to be included in a personal automobile policy.

There are frequently a couple of "caveats" regarding replacement vehicles and additional vehicles acquired. If a covered auto is replaced by another auto, the policyholder has 30 days to notify the insurer if additional coverage is required, or if the coverage is to continue on the same basis. If an additional vehicle is acquired, the additional vehicle will have the broadest coverage of any vehicle previously insured.

Not only does the policy cover a "covered" auto, it also covers any auto or trailer owned by the policyholder(s) used as a temporary vehicle while the covered vehicle is not able to be used because it has broken down or is lost, destroyed, or in the state of repair or servicing.

4. Negligence and Liability
Ever since the invention of the automobile, there have been laws enacted that specifically address the problems of automobile ownership. Local ordinances were enacted when the automobile first was used to any extent, ranging from the operation of a vehicle when near horses or horse-drawn vehicles, who would be qualified to operate such a vehicle, and the areas within which automobiles were allowed to operate.

Negligence became a factor as horse owners considered the automobile owners negligent if their horses bolted at the sight and sound of the vehicles. These laws and countless others that have been enacted created a new category of negligence, and they place specific obligations and responsibilities on the owners and operators of automobiles.

Negligence is the failure to use the care that a reasonable, prudent person would have taken under the same or similar circumstances.

Contributory Negligence
Under contributory negligence, the injured party must be completely free of fault in order to collect. Any negligence on the part of the injured party which contributed to the injury, however slight, will normally defeat the claim. A variation of contributory negligence is known as "the last clear chance rule." It may be used as a defense by a negligent party who can show the injured party had the last clear chance to avoid the loss, but did not.

Contributory negligence, as it applies to auto insurance, sometimes means that when an automobile accident occurs, each party is held liable for its own damages. These rules presently exist in approximately 12 states.

Comparative Negligence
Comparative negligence is in force in most states and specifically addresses negligence pertaining to automobile accidents. Basically the recovery of the plaintiff is decreased by the percentage of negligence contributed to the accident by the plaintiff.

Guest Statutes
Guest statute laws regarding automobiles have been repealed in most states and are in force only in a very few states at this time. These statutes modify the level of care that a driver owes to a passenger (guest) in his/her automobile. Common law states a guest must be accorded reasonable or ordinary care, but these statutes reduced the amount of care to "gross negligence" or "wanton or willful misconduct." Because of the guest statutes, it became very difficult for a passenger in an automobile to recover damages from the driver of an automobile or to take any other legal action.

Note: This does not apply to taxi drivers or other commercial vehicles.

Vicarious Liability
In the states that have this law or regulation, vicarious liability usually pertains to incidents where the owner of a vehicle is not in the automobile when a loss occurs, but is nevertheless held responsible for the action of the driver if the driver has the owner's permission to operate the automobile. A similar type of statute is in force in some states, and involves the operation of motor vehicles by minors. If they become involved in an accident, their parents can be held liable for any damages. Some states require the parents to accept these restrictions and actually sign for the license for their child.

CONSUMER APPLICATION:

Frank asked his secretary if she would take his clothes to the cleaners when she went to lunch because he had forgotten to do so when he came to work, and he had luncheon plans. Frank asked his secretary to take his car because there were several articles of clothing. On the way to the cleaners, his secretary ran a stop sign and caused damage to another car. Frank would be considered liable under vicarious liability statutes, and his insurance company would become involved.

5. Exclusions and Limits of Liability
Exclusions
Policy exclusions are a product of common sense. The insuring agreement section tells what is insured, so anything other than what's listed as insured is not insured. Because different people may have different interpretations of almost any word or phrase, this section is needed in insurance policies to clearly identify the perils that are excluded.

Exclusions simply identify types of losses that are not covered by the policy and accomplish 4 broad purposes:

Clarify the intent of coverage;
Remove coverage for losses that should be covered by other forms of insurance;
Remove coverage for losses which result from above-average risk factors, which are not anticipated, in average rates and premiums (usually available at an extra charge); and
Remove coverage for catastrophic losses.
Liability Exclusions
At this point, the exclusions pertain only to the liability coverage. Each coverage has its own exclusions particular to that section. Typical PAP liability exclusions would read as follows:

A. We will not provide Liability Coverage for any person

1. Who intentionally causes "bodily injury" or "property damage."

2. For "property damage" to property owned or being transported by that person.

3. For "property damage" to property (a) rented to; (b) use by; or (c) in the care of that person.

o This exclusion (A.3) does not apply to "property damage" to a residence or private garage.

4. For "bodily injury" to an employee of that person during the course of employment.

5. For that person’s liability arising out of the ownership or operation of a vehicle while it is being used as a public or livery conveyance.

o This exclusion (A.5.) does not apply to a share-the-expense car pools.

6. While employed or otherwise engaged in the "business" of (a) selling; (b) repairing; (c) servicing; (d) storing; or (e) parking vehicles designed for use mainly on public highways. This includes road testing and delivery.

o This exclusion (A.6.) does not apply to the ownership, maintenance or use of "your covered auto" by: (a) you; (b) any "family member;" or (c) any partner, agent or employee of you or any "family member."

7. Maintaining or using any vehicle while that person is employed or otherwise engaged in any "business" (other than farming or ranching) not described in Exclusion A.6.

o This exclusion (A.7) does not apply to the maintenance or use of a (a) private passenger auto; (b) pickup or van that you own; or (c) "trailer" used with a vehicle described in (a) or (b) above.

8. Using a vehicle without a reasonable belief that that person is entitled to do so.

9. For "bodily injury or "property damage" for which that person (a) is an insured under a nuclear energy liability policy; or (b) would be an insured under a nuclear energy liability policy, but for its termination upon exhaustion of its limit of liability.

A nuclear energy liability policy is a policy issued by any of the following or their successors: (a) American Nuclear Insurers; (b) Mutual Atomic Energy Liability Underwriters; or (c) Nuclear Insurance Association of Canada.

B. We do not provide Liability Coverage for ownership, maintenance or use of

Any motorized vehicle having fewer than four wheels;
Any vehicle, other than "your covered auto" which is (a) owned by you; or (b) furnished or available for your regular use; or
Any vehicle, other than "your covered auto", which is (a) owned by any "family member" or (b) furnished or available for the regular use of a "family member."
However, this exclusion (B.3.) does not apply to you while you are maintaining or "occupying" any vehicle which is (a) owned by a "family member" or (b) furnished or available for the regular use of a "family member."
Obviously, the insurance company will not provide liability coverage for anyone who intentionally causes bodily injury or property damage. There was a movie about a man who had remodeled a pickup into a heavily armored vehicle, and then deliberately ran down those who ran traffic lights or otherwise broke traffic laws, and punished them with his truck. This policy would not cover such behavior. Further, the policy will not pay for property damage to property owned by, or being transported by, the person who intentionally causes bodily injury or property damage, including property rented to or used by that person, except for property damage to a residence or private garage if the insured is liable for damage.

Consumer Application
Example #1: Pamela has a bad temper, according to her boyfriend, Bob. Pamela and Bob got into a heated argument as to who is to be invited to their wedding, and Pamela rushed out of the house and jumped into her car. However, Bob's car was parked so that his car partially blocked the driveway. Pamela deliberately ran her car into Bob's front fender, causing more than $3,000 of damage to the car. Pamela had liability of $100,000 on her policy.

Her policy would not pay for these damages because they were intentional.

The policy will not provide liability coverage for any bodily injury to an employee of the policyholder during the course of employment. This does not apply to domestic employees unless they are required by law to have or be eligible for workers compensation. Obviously, a PAP is not intended to be a substitute for workers compensation.

Obviously, because this is a "personal" automobile insurance policy, it does not cover any liability arising out of the ownership or operation of the auto while it is being used as a public or livery conveyance, in other words, as a limousine for hire, taxi, drayage service, etc. Using the vehicle in a car pool or ride sharing arrangement is not excluded.

Further, liability coverage is not available while the insured(s) are engaged in selling, repairing, servicing, storing or parking vehicles, except for the "covered" auto usage by the insured(s) or family members or partner, agent, or employee of the insured or family member.

These sections differentiate between using the vehicle as a vehicle for hire and eliminates coverage for people in the auto business, unless it is their vehicle.

Example #2: Walter started a carpool with three of his neighbors because they all worked within 2 blocks of each other in the city. It started with Walter driving every fourth day.

One of the riders, Bobbie, had an older model car, which kept breaking down. All the other carpoolers liked Bobbie and felt sorry for her, so they decided that she could ride without driving on her day if she would pay for the gas every fourth day.

Another rider, James, changed jobs, and his new job did not have enough parking for his car, so when he drove, he had to park 4 blocks away. During the winter months, he much preferred to ride with one of the other people and leave his car at home. He agreed to pay for the gas on the days that he normally would have driven.

The last rider, Charles, worked with investments, and it was important for him to get the early Wall Street Journal and read it before he got to the office. Now that he found himself driving every other day, he felt that the time lost reading on the morning commute was too expensive for him to continue.

The participants all enjoyed riding with Walter because he had a large, newer car and was an excellent driver. They all met with Walter and made an agreement that they would each pay him for the gas used. Walter did not like this because there was considerable wear and tear on his car, and he had to have it serviced frequently, so the cost of gas did not cover his expenses. The riders felt that if each paid $3 a day ($15 a week, approximately $45 a month), the $135 a month should cover Walter's expenses. He agreed to this, and they all paid him regularly on the first of each month.

Walter's wife casually asked one evening whether his insurance would cover an accident that he may have while he was "carpooling" his neighbors. Walter called his insurance agent the next morning, who informed him that the carpooling provision would be in question when he started taking money for transporting his neighbors. If the money paid to him just covered his expenses, then he would not have to make any changes in his policy. However, if he was making a profit by driving them to work, then he should either charge less so that the money would cover only expenses, or purchase a business auto policy.

The policy will have a liability exclusion that removes coverage for property rented to, used by, or in the care of the person liable for damages. This applies to most types of property, including another automobile borrowed or rented by the insured. (Note: Coverage for a rented auto or one that is borrowed may be provided under Part D - the physical damage section).

There will be exclusions for bodily injury or property damage for any person who is covered under a nuclear energy liability policy. Liability coverage is not provided for any motorized vehicle that has fewer than four wheels (motorcycles need to have a motorcycle policy or be endorsed onto a PAP).

Liability coverage also is not provided for any vehicle that is owned by the insured or a family member, other than those previously defined as a "covered auto," even if the auto is owned by the insured or is furnished or available for regular use. This could pertain to automobiles furnished to an insured by his employer that can be used for personal use.

It should be noticed that any vehicle that is owned by the insured but is not listed on the policy, will not be covered. The insured cannot pay for insurance on one vehicle, and expect that all of his vehicles will be covered. For other vehicles furnished or available for use by the insured on a regular basis, there is no coverage. If, for example, an employee has access to his employer's fleet of cars, the exclusion would stand even if he regularly used the same car. Coverage can be provided by attaching an Extended Nonowned Vehicle Coverage Endorsement.

As a general rule, many, if not most, of the exclusions can be eliminated by proper endorsement.

Example #3: Steve's son, Steve Junior, works for the Sunoco Service Station during the summer months. He has his own car and is covered under his father's policy.

The owner of the station knows Steve and his son very well, and on occasion, he will trust Junior to deposit the week's receipts in his bank located a mile from the station. One Friday, Junior was taking the money to the bank when a dog ran in front of his car. He swerved to miss the dog and temporarily lost control of the car, causing it to run into the side of a Corvette parked near the curb. When Junior reported this to his father, his father read the insurance policy before he called the agent, and was quite disturbed when he discovered in the "exclusions," that because his son was engaged in the "business" of servicing vehicles, he was not covered.

However, his insurance agent assured him that coverage would still exist as it stated that this exclusion did not apply to the use of "your covered vehicle" (Junior's car).

Example #4: Fred Allcorn does not get along well with his neighbor Wayne, mostly because his son and the Wayne's son seem to always be fighting. Wayne's son made fun of Fred's son because of the way that Fred's son played basketball. When Fred was backing out of his driveway, he deliberately swerved and ran over Wayne's son's bicycle.

Wayne's son jumped on his brother's bicycle and swore at Fred, who started chasing the child (with his car). The child fell off his bicycle and broke his wrist.

Fred is arrested for assault with a deadly weapon (his car), and bail is set at $1,000.

Fred is responsible for the bicycle that he ran over; however, his insurance policy will not pay for it because it was a deliberate act of the insured (not an accident).
Fred is responsible for the medical costs of the child who broke his wrist. He would also be responsible for damages if the second bicycle is damaged. Again, his insurance company will not pay for these damages for the same reason as stated above.
Even though the Supplementary Payments section will pay "up to $250 for the cost of a bail bond (because of) an accident resulting in bodily injury or property damaged covered under the policy" (note the italicized wording), the bodily injury and property damage was not "covered" under the policy, as stated in 1 and 2 above.
Limits of Liability
The policy will explain the limits of liability in detail as required or desired, which is simply stated as "the insurer will not pay more than the maximum amount of liability as shown in the Declarations." This is the maximum that the insurer will pay regardless of how many insureds there are, how many claims are made, the number of vehicles insured or premiums paid, or the number of vehicles involved in the accident. Further, there are separate limits required by law for bodily injury and property damage, but these amounts combined will not exceed the total limit of liability.

Here is an example of simple policy language:

A. The limit of liability shown in the Declarations for this coverage is our maximum limit of liability for all damages resulting from anyone auto accident. This is the most that we will pay regardless of the number of:

Insureds;
Claims made;
Vehicles or premiums shown in the Declarations; or
Vehicles involved in the auto accident.
B. We will apply the limit of liability to provide any separate limits required by law for bodily injury and property damage liability. However, this provision (B) will not change our total limit of liability.

Out of State Coverage
Because state laws differ, if an auto accident occurs in a state other than the state in which the insured vehicles are garaged, and if the state in which the accident occurred has laws requiring a higher amount for bodily injury or property damage liability, the policy will provide the higher amount. If the state in which the auto accident occurs has laws that require a nonresident to maintain insurance, the policy will provide at least the minimum amounts and types of coverage. However, no one is entitled to duplication of coverage.

Consumer Application
Betty resides in Mississippi and has a single limit of $25,000, satisfying the financial requirements of her home state. She went to visit her sister in Alabama and had an accident. Alabama has 20/40/10, so her liability coverage is automatically expanded to $40,000 per accident.

The following is an example of an out-of-state coverage provision:

If an auto accident to which this policy applies occurs in any state or province other than the one in which "your covered auto" is principally garaged, we will interpret your policy for that accident as follows:

A. If the state or province has:

A financial responsibility or similar law specifying limits of liability for bodily injury or "property damage" higher than the limit shown in the Declarations, your policy will provide the higher specified limit.
A compulsory insurance or similar law requiring a nonresident to maintain insurance whenever the nonresident uses a vehicle in that state or province, your policy will provide at least the required minimum amounts and types of coverage.
 B. No one will be entitled to duplicate payments for the same elements of loss.

Financial Responsibility
Financial responsibility laws require that each driver be financially responsible when they operate a motor vehicle. In contrast to compulsory insurance, financial responsibility can be shown after an accident, and it can be demonstrated by an insurance policy, a deposit with the Department of Insurance, or a surety bond, depending upon the state. The required liability varies by state. If a driver cannot show financial responsibility after an accident, the driver may lose his or her license and possibly lose his or her license for the automobile.

Unfortunately, in those cases, the injured party may not receive anything even though the injuring party would suffer the loss of their license.

Many states have financial responsibility laws, so policies will contain a statement stating that this policy will meet the requirements of such laws.

When this policy is certified as future proof of financial responsibility, this policy shall comply with the law to the extent required.

Other Insurance
The insurer will pay only its share of the loss if there is other liability insurance applicable. The insurer will pay the proportion that the total liability limit bears to the total of all applicable limits. If the vehicle involved is not owned by the insured(s), this policy will be excess over any other "collectible" insurance.


If there is other applicable liability insurance, we will pay only our share of the loss. Our share is the proportion that our limit of liability bears to the total of all applicable limits. However, any insurance we provide for a vehicle you do not own shall be excess over any other collectible insurance.

Consumer Application
Example #1: Marilyn Dodge owns three vehicles, each insured on individual policies and with different companies. Her brother is an insurance agent and wrote the policies in different companies so that he could keep his license current with all of the insurers. Marilyn had an accident with her '98 Camaro, insured with AIC, and was determined to be negligent and responsible for damages as a result of the accident. Marilyn's policy has liability limits of 100/300/50. If another policy covers such contingencies, AIC will pay up to $100,000 per person, and the other company will pay up to $100,000 per person, so she has up to $200,000 total per person limit. If the injuries total $20,000 in medical bills, each company will pay $10,000 because each is providing half of the applicable limit.

Example #2: Marilyn borrowed her boyfriend Bobby's Explorer while her Camaro was being repaired. Marilyn has another accident, and there were medical bills involved. Bobby's insurance would provide the primary coverage (because Bobby is the owner of the vehicle). However, Marilyn would be covered under the policy also because she was using the Explorer with Bobby's permission. If the medical bills do not exceed the liability limits of Bobby's policy, Marilyn's policy would not be involved.

If the medical bills are greater than the limits of Bobby's policy, then Marilyn's policy would be involved, but only over and above the limits of the other policy. If Bobby's insurance has limits of 50/100/10, and the victim's medical bills totaled $55,000, Bobby's policy would pay the first $50,000, and Marilyn's policy would pay the remainder.

Example #3: Sue Palmer is driving to the grocery story with her two children, Mark and David. At a stop light, her attention was drawn by an unruly child, and she drove her car into a Corvette, pushing it into a Toyota pickup. The driver of the Corvette, Nancy, sprains her back and neck, and suffers head cuts from hitting the windshield. Her medical bills were $15,000. Nancy's sister, Marie, is a passenger and hurts her back also. Her doctor bills and therapy total $8,000. The Corvette is damaged to the amount of $18,000. The Toyota pickup is driven by Don, who also hits his head on the windshield and suffers cuts and a concussion, hospitalized overnight for observation, with medical bills of $2,800. The truck is damaged to a sum of $2,600.

Sue Palmer sprains her wrist and cuts her legs on the steering column. Emergency room costs are $1,700. Her children are not severely injured but are checked into the emergency room for a combined cost of $1,000. Repairs to Sue's auto total $2,400.

Sue carries minimum coverage as required by the financial responsibility laws of her state: 10/20/10.

Expenses would be determined as follows:

Party

Medical Bills

Property Damage

Mark and David

$1,000

n/a

Nancy

$15,000

$18,000

Marie

$8,000

n/a

Don

$2,800

$2,000

Sue

$1,700

$2,400

Total:

$28,500

$23,000

The total of all medical bills is $28,500.

However, because liability coverage is under discussion at this time, expenses and property damage to Sue and her children are not of concern. The total for all 3 vehicles is $23,000, but Sue's auto will not be covered under liability coverage. Without Sue's expenses, the above medical bills would be $25,800, and property damage is $20,600. Sue's liability limits are 10/20/10. The maximum payable under her policy is $10,000 per person and $20,000 per accident for bodily injury. The maximum it will pay for Nancy's injuries would be $10,000, leaving Sue to pay $5,000.

Marie and Don's medical bills total $10,800. The maximum that Sue's policy will pay per accident is $20,000. Because it will pay $10,000 for Nancy, $10,000 is left for Marie and Don, leaving $800 to be paid by Sue.

Sue’s insurance company pays a total of $20,000 and Sue must pay $5,800. The property damage limit per accident is $10,000. If Don's truck is repaired first, the insurer will pay the $2,600 and will give Nancy $7,400. Sue must pay Nancy $8,000 and also pay Ron $2,600 for repairs on his pickup.

PAP: Part A - Liability Coverage
In addition to policy declarations, agreement, definitions, and endorsements, all personal automobile insurance policies consist of the following six sections or parts:

Part A - Liability;
Part B - Medical Payments;
Part C - Uninsured Motorists Coverage;
Part D - Damage to the Insured Automobile;
Part E - Duties of the Policyholder After an Accident/Loss; and
Part F - General Provisions.
Liability coverage is often referred to as "Part A" of a personal automobile policy (PAP).

Under a personal auto policy, the insured may choose between 2 kinds of liability limits: split and combined single.

Split limit coverage uses 3 dollar amounts. In the event of an automobile accident, these numbers specify the maximum amount the policy will pay for

Bodily injury for each person involved;
Bodily injury for the entire accident (regardless of the total number of persons involved); and
Property damage.
Please note that split limits are always expressed in this order. For example, policy limits expressed as 25/50/25 would provide $25,000 coverage per person, with a maximum of $50,000 for all bodily injuries, and $25,000 property damage coverage per accident.

By contrast, combined single coverage uses one dollar amount, indicating the maximum coverage for all losses – regardless of the number of people involved or the amount of property damaged.  

1. Insuring Agreement
The insuring agreement for the liability coverage states that the insurance company will pay for damages for any bodily injury or property damage, including any interest awarded against any insured(s) prior to any trial for which any insured(s) becomes liable because of an automobile accident. The term accident means something that happened at a specific time and at a specific place.

The insurer always reserves the right to settle or defend any claim or damage suits, as "deemed appropriate," including defense costs incurred by the insurer. Of course, the insurer will pay any judgment against the insured(s) up to the limits of the insurer's liability, but the insurer will not pay for any suit or judgment not covered by the policy. The insurance company's obligations to defend any suit terminates when it has paid out damages to the limit specified in the contract.

For example, if an insured is involved in a multiple car accident and his policy limits have been met in settling suits with two of the individuals involved, but two other individuals who were also involved file suit, the liability limits have been met under the policy, and the insurer is under no obligation to defend the insured in any of the subsequent suits. This is provided, of course, that the suits were all related to these accidents.

Note that defense costs (attorney's fees, filing fees, witness expenses, etc.) are considered in addition to the limits of liability because they are costs and not damages.

Prejudgment interest is the interest on the amount awarded by the court for damages. If an award of $100,000 is given to an injured person for damages suffered on January 15, and the judgment is not given until January of the following year, the court then assumes a rate of interest that the injured party may have received on the $100,000 during this period of time. Therefore, in this example, if interest is awarded at $7,000, the total award of $107,000 is considered damages and is therefore part of the liability payment.

2. Definition of the Insured
The insured is defined as the person specifically named in the policy (named insured) or any family member, or any person using the insured (covered) auto. When a person or organization other than the insured or family member is involved, the liability is only for the legal responsibility for acts or omissions of the insured or family member. If the other person or organization hires the insured vehicle or trailer, that provision does not apply.

The following would be included in the definition of the insured:

1. The named insured, a spouse resident in the same household, or any family member resident in the same household who owns, maintains or uses any auto or trailer.

2. Any person outside the household who uses a vehicle covered under the policy.

3. A person who is not a resident of the household would be an "insured" if they are found legally responsible for the driving of a regular insured (i.e., legally responsible for the operation of a motor vehicle by the named insured), while that regular insured (named insured) is using one of the vehicles listed on the declarations page of the policy.

Consumer Application
James works for the Consolidated Printing Company as a printer. His car is insured as a private passenger vehicle under his PAP. Friday, one of his best customers called and needed a rush job on 20,000 fliers for the weekend. James was able to get the fliers printed, but the delivery van was gone for the day and would not return until Monday. One of the salesmen, Ben, offered to deliver the order, but he had no transportation because he rode in a carpool. James tossed Ben his car keys, and they loaded the order in the trunk.

On the way to make the delivery, Ben, who was not used to driving a stick shift, put on the brakes without engaging the clutch, and the momentum carried him through a red light and into a passenger car, injuring the driver and a passenger.

The injured parties were the wife and daughter of an attorney, who, upon hearing that Ben was on a delivery, initiated a lawsuit against both Ben and Consolidated Printing.

Under the provisions of James' PAP, both Ben and Consolidated Printing would be covered by his policy.

Sample Policy Language
Part A - Liability Coverage Insuring Agreement

A. We will pay damages for "bodily injury" or "property damage" of which any insured becomes legally responsible because of an auto accident. Damages include prejudgment interest awarded against the "insured." We will settle or defend, as we consider appropriate, any claim or suit, or asking for these damages. In addition to our limit of liability, we will pay all defense costs we incur. Our duty to settle or defend ends when our limit of liability for this coverage has been exhausted. We have no duty to defend any suit or settle any claim for "bodily injury" or "property damage" not covered under this policy.

B. "Insured" as used in this part means

1. You or any "family member" for the ownership, maintenance or use of any auto or trailer;

2. Any person using your "covered auto;"

3. "Your covered auto," any person or organization but only with respect to legal responsibility for acts or omissions of a person for whom coverage is afforded under this part;

4. For any auto or "trailer" other than "your covered auto," any other person or organization, but only with respect to legal responsibility for acts or omissions or you or any family member "for whom coverage is afforded under this part." This provision (B.4.) applies only if the person or organization does not own or hire the auto or "trailer."

3. Supplementary Payments
Policies also provide coverage for other situations and some of the most frequently offered ones include the following:

If an accident results in bodily injury or property damage, and the insured must purchase a bail bond that is required of the accident and any related traffic violations, the policy will pay an amount (frequently $250) for the cost of the bond.
If the insurer is defending a suit, and it becomes necessary to obtain an appeal bond(s), the policy will pay for the premiums on the bonds.
If interest is due on a judgment defended by the insurance company, the policy will also pay that interest, but only up to the limit of liability of the policy.
If an insured is required to attend trial at the request of the insurer, the policy will normally pay an amount (such as $50 per day) to the insured for loss of his/her earnings.
Any other reasonable expenses incurred by the insured(s) at the request of the insurer.
Here is an illustration of a supplementary payment provision:

In addition to our limit of liability, we will pay on behalf of an "insured":

Up to $250 for the cost of bail bonds required because of an accident including related traffic law violations. The accident must result in "bodily injury" or "property damage" covered under this policy.
Premium on appeal bonds and bonds to release attachments in any suit we defend.
Interest accruing after a judgment is entered in any suit we defend. Our duty to pay interest ends when we offer to pay that part of the judgment which does not exceed our limit of liability for this coverage.
Up to $50 a day for loss of earnings but not other income, because of attendance at hearings or trials at our request.
Consumer Application
Example #1: Rob Roberts has a PAP with Automobile Insurance Company, with limits of 25/50/10, the minimum required by state law. Rob ran a red light and struck another car driven by Smith. Smith's car careened into another car driven by Brown. The result of the accident was that 5 persons were injured, and 3 automobiles were heavily damaged, including Rob's car. The bodily injury liability and property damage liability payments would be as follows:

Bodily Injury Payments

Property Damage Payments

John Smith-$30,000

Smith's car-$12,000

Mary Smith-$30,000

n/a

Jonathan Smith-$5,000

n/a

Mary Brown-$15,000

Brown's car-$8,000

Pamela Brown-$10,000

n/a

Total=$90,000

Total=$20,000

The limits chosen by Rob indicates that AIC will pay $25,000 per person, and $50,000 per accident for bodily injury. Therefore, $40,000 of the bodily injury payments will have to be paid by Rob personally.

His property damage limit is $10,000, so Rob will have to pay $10,000 personally. If John and Mary Smith are the most severely injured, under typical adjusting rules, $25,000 may be awarded to John Smith, and $25,000 to Mary Smith, which is the maximum.

AIC will pay for any one accident. Rob is personally liable for the $5,000 for each of the Smiths, and the $25,000 for the Browns.

In respect to property damage to the Smith and Brown cars, if the adjuster pays for the Smiths' car first, then Rob would have to pay the extra $2,000 on the Smiths' car, and the full $8,000 on the Browns' car.

Injuries to Rob and to his automobile are covered under a separate section and are not subject to these limits.

Example #2: Charles is a city employee and drives a city-owned truck in his job. Charles drove the truck home for lunch one day, and on the way, he hit an ice patch on the road, losing control of the truck and striking a van owned by a local florist. The driver of the van was injured and hospitalized.

The attorney for the van driver sued the city for damages and also sued Charles personally. Charles referred the matter to his PAP insurance company. The insurer informed Charles that he would not be covered under the PAP because that type of vehicle is not included in the PAP provision.

Example #3: Harry Harrison borrows his brother John's pickup to bring home some trees from the local nursery. His neighbor, Henry, accompanies him to the nursery. At this point, Harry is responsible for the safe operation of the pickup. While loading the trees into the pickup, Harry strains his back and is unable to drive home. He asks Henry to drive. Henry, however, has never driven a pickup, and while descending a hill, he loses control of the pickup and skids into a van containing two adults and three children. They are all seriously injured, including Harry and Henry.

Henry, Harry, and John all report the accident to their respective insurance companies. John's policy, as owner of the truck, will cover him as owner of the vehicle.

Harry was responsible for the truck, even though he was not driving at the time of the accident. However, Harry was responsible for Henry driving the truck.

Henry is primarily responsible because he was the driver.

All three are sued for their part in the accident with the following results:

Based upon the wording of the PAP, John is not an "insured" under Henry's PAP because he owns the truck. Harry is not excluded as an "insured" because he doesn't own the truck and he did not "hire" it from his brother, but was merely borrowing the truck with John's permission. Under the terms of the PAP, Harry would be an "insured" because he is considered "any other person" who is using the vehicle for which he is responsible for its safe operation. Even though he was not driving at the time, he should have been aware that Henry had never driven a pickup before, particularly a loaded pickup, and he should have made sure that Henry was driving carefully. Because he did not, he has "legal liability for acts or omissions of the permitted driver for whom coverage afforded under this policy (typical wording for this provision). Because Henry is covered for liability as a named insured under his own policy, Harry becomes a temporary "insured" for this one accident only under John's policy.

Example #4: Ron, an insured of AIC, is involved in an accident in which there is no clear indication of who is responsible. Before the dispute can be settled, the other party sues Ron. AIC defends Ron in the trial, but Ron loses the case. AIC decides to appeal the case, but because of the appeal, Ron must post an appeal bond. AIC cannot issue the bond, but it will pay the premium for the appeal bond. Further, if any of Ron's property was attached (withheld) as evidence in the trial, AIC will pay the premium for any bond that may be required to release that property so that Ron can use it.

Ron is found to be the negligent party in the appeal, and the judge awards monetary damages to the other party, including interest that accrued during the appeal process. AIC will pay the interest awarded.

If AIC agrees to settle the claim but Ron wants to continue the appeal process, AIC will not be responsible for any additional interest awarded.

PAP: Part B - Medical Payments Coverage
Personal auto policies provide protection for medical expenses; that section of the PAP is called "Part B - Medical Payments Coverage." The insuring agreement under this section parallels the preceding sections, except this section makes arrangements to pay reasonable expenses insured for necessary medical and funeral services because of bodily injury caused by an accident and sustained by an insured. Medical payment coverage is a single peril (automobile accident) health insurance coverage for the covered person. The amount of coverage depends on the policy and applies on a per person, per accident basis.

This section covers the insured or any other person while "occupying" the covered automobile. It covers expenses incurred within 3 years of the date of the accident, and also includes an insured or family member who was a pedestrian struck by a motor vehicle, and covers any other person while occupying the insured vehicle.

Note the 3-year rule. Many medical expenses resulting from automobile-related injuries may be incurred over a long period of time. As an often-quoted example, a child who suffers injury to teeth as the result of an auto accident may have to wait more than 1 year for the permanent teeth to be grown to the state where orthodontia services are necessary. The 3-year rule is generous because most medical treatments can be completed within that period of time.

1. Insuring Agreement
The following is an example of a typical insuring agreement for medical payments coverage:

A. We will pay reasonable expenses incurred for necessary medical and funeral services because of "bodily injury"

Caused by accident; and
Sustained by an insured.
 We will pay only those expenses incurred within 3 years from the date of the accident.

B. "Insured" as used in this part means

You or any "family member" (a) while occupying; or (b) as a pedestrian when struck by a motor vehicle designed for use mainly on public roads or a trailer of any type; or
Any other person while occupying "your covered auto."
 This definition of "motor vehicle" used in this section can be a large truck or even a bus; however, large machinery, such as mobile cranes, which is not designed to be primarily used on public roads, is excluded.

Also note the inclusion of a "pedestrian" is used only when the named insured or a family member is struck by a motor vehicle (only if the covered person is a "pedestrian").

2. Exclusions
As it pertains to the medical payments coverage in auto policies, the exclusions section specifies the injuries not covered, such as those caused by using a vehicle as a residence, during the course of employment, or as a business or livery vehicle or livery.

The following is a sample of exclusions for medical payments coverage:

Exclusions

We do not provide Medical Payments Coverage for any person for bodily injury

Sustained while occupying any motorized vehicle having fewer than four wheels;
Sustained while "occupying" your covered auto when it is being used as a public or lively conveyance. This exclusion does not apply to a share-the-expense car pool;
Sustained while "occupying" any vehicle located for use as a residence or premises;
Occurring during the course of employment if workers compensation benefits are required or available for the "bodily injury;"
Sustained while "occupying" or when struck by any vehicle (other than your covered auto) which is (a) owned by you; or (b) furnished or available for your regular use.
Sustained while "occupying," or when struck by any vehicle (other than your covered auto) which is (a) owned by any "family member" or (b) furnished or available for the regular use of any family member; however, this exclusion (B) does not apply to you;
Sustained while occupying a vehicle without a reasonable belief that that person is entitled to do so;
Sustained while "occupying" a vehicle when it is being used in the business of an insured. This exclusion (8) does not apply to" bodily injury" sustained while "occupying" a (a) private passenger auto; (b) pickup or van that you own; or (c) "trailer" used with a vehicle described in a. or b. above.
Caused by or as a consequence of (a) discharge of a nuclear weapon (even if accidental); (b) war (declared or undeclared); (c) civil war; (d) insurrection; or (e) rebellion or revolution; or
From or as a consequence of the following, whether controlled or uncontrolled or however caused: (a) nuclear reaction; (b) radiation; or (c) radioactive contamination.
3. Limits of Liability
A. The limit of liability shown in the Declarations for this coverage is our maximum, limit of liability for each person injured in any one accident. This is the most we will pay regardless of the number of

"Insureds;"
Claims made;
Vehicles or premiums shown in the Declaration; or
Vehicles involved in the accident.
B. Any amounts otherwise payable for expenses under this coverage shall be reduced by any amounts paid or payable for the same expenses under Part A or Part C.

C. No payment will be made unless the injured person or that person's legal representative agrees in writing that any payment shall be applied toward any settlement or judgment that person receives under Part A or Part C.

4. Payments
Payments under the medical payments section will be reduced by any payments paid under Parts A of another parties insurance or Part C (Uninsured Motorist) collected from their own policy. Interestingly, the claimant must promise in writing that any amounts paid under Part B Medical Payments will be credited if any payment is made under Parts A and C.

5. Stacking
The specter of "stacking" is prevalent in discussing medical payment benefits. "Stacking" is defined as an attempt to collect multiples of the policy limits based on the existence of multiple autos covered, claims made, vehicles involved, etc. Any insurance company is willing to pay full benefits but not multiples of a medical payment limit.

6. Payment Entitlement
This information indicates who is entitled, and who is not entitled, to receive medical payments benefits under a named insured's personal automobile policy. The following sample policy language assumes that the insured named on the PAP does not own or have furnished to him or her on a regular basis any vehicle that is not a "covered auto" as defined in the PAP.

The following persons are entitled to medical payments if an injury occurred:

While occupying named Insured's auto, then Named Person, Relative, Other;
As a pedestrian by the named insured's covered auto, then Named Person and Relative;
While occupying or as a pedestrian by an auto that is owned by or regularly furnished to a relative, then the Named Person and Relative;
While occupying or as a pedestrian by an auto that is owned by or regularly furnished to a relative, then Named Person and Relative; and
Struck by a vehicle with fewer than 4 wheels, while a pedestrian, then the Named person and Relative.
7. Excess Coverage
Medical payment benefits are excess when the insured is operating a non-owned automobile. If a policy that covers a vehicle not owned by the insured does not provide medical benefits or if the Medical Benefits are exhausted, then the insured's policy would be primary.

Here is sample policy language:

If there are other applicable auto medical payments, we will pay only our share of the loss. Our share is the proportion that our limit of liability bears to the total of all applicable limits. However, any insurance we provide with respect to a vehicle you do not own shall be excess over any other collectible auto insurance providing payments for medical or funeral expenses.

PAP: Part C - Uninsured and Underinsured Motorist
1. Uninsured Motorist Coverage
Uninsured motorist (UM) coverage, usually referred to as Part C, is a result of financial responsibility laws requiring motorists to have liability coverage. Parts of these laws require insurance companies to provide coverage for those who are uninsured. Some states allow the insureds to either accept or reject this coverage, and if nothing else, making the insured aware of the coverage options.

Insuring Agreement
The insurer will pay compensatory damages that an insured is legally entitled to recover from the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle because of bodily injury sustained by an insured and caused by an accident. Again, the policy makes it clear that a judgment for damages arising out of a suit brought without the explicit and written consent is not binding on the insurance company. The insurance company is concerned with protecting its own interests, as well as the interests of the insured; therefore, the insurer wishes to have a voice in your decision by their intent to sue the uninsured motorist. It does not necessarily follow that if an agreement is made between the insured and an injured party with the approval of the insurance company, the insurance company will definitely decline to participate. It is possible that the arrangement propagated by the insured may be superior to any solution available to the insurer; in that case, the insurer will acquiesce to the settlement.

Sample Policy Language
A. We will pay compensatory damages that an insured is legally entitled to recover from the owner or operator of an uninsured motor vehicle because of "bodily injury"

1. Sustained by an "insured;" and

2. Caused by an accident.

The owners' or operators' liability for these damages must arise out of the ownership, maintenance or use of the "uninsured motor vehicle."

Any judgment for damages arising out of a suit brought without our written consent is not binding on us.

B. "Insured" as used in this Part means

1. You or any "family member;"

2. Any other person "occupying" your covered auto; and

3. Any person for damages that person is entitled to recover because of "bodily injury" to which this coverage applies sustained by a person described in 1 or 2 above.

C. "Uninsured motor vehicle" means a land motor vehicle or trailer of any type

1. To which no bodily injury liability bond or policy applies at the time of the accident;

2. To which a bodily injury liability bond or policy applies at the time of the accident. In this case its limit for bodily injury liability must be less than the minimum limit for bodily injury liability specified by the financial responsibility law of the state in which your covered auto is principally garaged;

3. Which is a hit-and-run vehicle whose operator or owner cannot be identified and which hits (a) you or any "family member;" (b) a vehicle which you or any "family member" are "occupying;" or (c) "Your covered auto" or

4. To which a bodily injury liability bond or policy applies at the time of the accident but the bonding or insuring company (a) denies coverage; or (b) is or becomes insolvent.

However, "uninsured motor vehicle" does not include any vehicle or equipment

1. Owned by or furnished or available for the regular use of you or any "family member;"

2. Owned or operated by a self-insurer under any applicable motor vehicle law, except a self-insurer that is or becomes insolvent;

3. Owned by any governmental unit or agency;

4. Operated on rails or crawler treads;

5. Designed mainly for use off public roads while not on public roads; or

6. While located for use as a residence or premises.

Consumer Application
Example #1: Bernard resides in Georgia and has liability limits of 10/20. Roger resides in a neighboring state where the financial responsibility laws dictate that minimum liability limits should be 25/50. If Bernard is responsible for an accident in Roger's state, Bernard's care could be considered uninsured for purposes of the uninsured motorists law in Roger's state.

An uninsured motor vehicle may also be a "hit-and-run" vehicle that hits the insured or family member, or any vehicle in which the insured or family member is "occupying," which is the auto covered under the policy. An uninsured motor vehicle can also be a vehicle on which the insured has a bond or policy, but the bonding or insuring company denies coverage or becomes (or is) insolvent.

Other than autos owned and/or operated by the insured(s) or family members, other vehicles not considered "uninsured" are those owned or operated by a self-insurer (except if the insurer is insolvent), any government-owned vehicle, vehicles operated on rails or crawl treads, designed mainly for use off public roads (while not on public roads), or such a vehicle that is used as a residence.

Exclusions
As with the liability section, this section also has "exclusions." If any person sustains bodily injury while occupying or struck by any vehicle owned by the insured or a family member, but which is not insured under the policy for uninsured motorist coverage, including a trailer of any type used with that vehicle. Also, if any uninsured motorist claim is not approved by the insurance company, the insurer will not be liable for the claim. If the insured(s) is occupying one of the vehicles listed on the declarations page, and if it is being used as a public or livery conveyance, it will not be covered under this provision - except if it is being used in a car pool where expenses are shared. Also, if a vehicle (trailer) is located for use as a residence or premises, it is not covered.

There is also a provision that states that the uninsured motorist (UM) coverage will not apply to the benefit of any insurer (or self-insurer) under workers compensation laws or disability benefits laws.

Uninsured motorist coverage is not provided for any punitive or exemplary damages.

Exclusion B addresses a problem unique to the UM coverage inasmuch as some states do permit a workers compensation or disability income insurer to sue a negligent uninsured motorist to recover any benefits that have been paid to their injured insured. The purpose of this exclusion is to prevent the insurers from subrogating and claiming any benefit under uninsured motorist coverage as an offset against what they paid in compensation benefits.

We do not provide Uninsured Motorist Coverage for "bodily injury" sustained by any person

While "occupying," or when struck by, any motor vehicle owned by you or any "family member" that is not insured for this coverage under this policy; this includes a trailer of any type used with that vehicle;
If that person or the legal representative settles the bodily injury claim without our consent;
While occupying "your covered auto" when it is being used as a public or livery conveyance; this exclusion does not apply to a share-the-expense car pool; or
Using a vehicle without a reasonable belief that that person is entitled to do so.
 B. This coverage shall not apply directly or indirectly to benefit any insurer or self-insurer under any of the following or similar law:

Workers compensation law; or
Disability Benefits law.
We do not provide Uninsured Motorist Coverage for punitive or exemplary damages.

Consumer Application
Barry lives in a trailer in a mobile home park; therefore, the trailer would not be covered under the uninsured motorist provision. Barry has a pickup that is not insured. He decides to move his trailer from one mobile home park to another closer to his work. While pulling the trailer, the trailer drifts off the roadway and strikes Henry as he is getting into his car parked on the side of the road. Therefore, the trailer would then be treated as an "uninsured vehicle" under the uninsured motorist provisions.

Limits of Liability
As under the liability section of the policy, the same limits of liability will apply, regardless of the number of insureds, claims made, etc. Also, any damage amount will be reduced by any money paid on behalf of persons or organizations that may not be legally 1iable. Also any amounts paid under the liability portion of the policy will reduce the payments under this section.

To reiterate, the purpose of the uninsured motorist provision is that the insured has elected to protect himself, family members, and others riding in their vehicles, from losses due to bodily injury suffered in an auto accident involving an uninsured motorist. Further, it must be proved that the other driver was responsible for the accident, and that the other driver does not have insurance on his or her vehicle. Because liability is involved, the limits of the uninsured motorist coverage chosen by the insured will be in a format that matches the liability limits. In some states, the insured will have to choose uninsured motorist limits equal to their liability limits. In other states, insureds may choose uninsured motorist limits in amounts less than or equal to their liability limits. For example, in an "equal to" state, if the insured has l00/300 liability limits, he or she also must have 100/300 uninsured motorist limits. In a state where one can have uninsured motorist limits less than or equal to liability limits, the insured may choose uninsured motorist coverage of 25/50, 50/l00, or 100/300 if those coverage options are offered by the company.

The uninsured motorist limit is expressed as a per person, per accident amount with the first number indicating the maximum amount the company will pay per person. This is applied to separate accidents individually. Therefore, if the same person were involved in more than one uninsured motorist claim for different accidents, the limit would be renewed for each one. The same applies for the per accident amount.

Regardless of the number of people filing claims, or how many claims they actually file for any one accident, the amount of coverage chosen by the insured will be the maximum the company will pay for that particular loss.

Uninsured motorist limits cannot be added together (or "stacked") regardless of how many vehicles are shown in the declarations or how many vehicles are involved in the accident. Therefore 100/300 does not become 300/900 when there are three vehicles on the policy. (However, later in this unit see the discussion of the stacking option offered in some states.)

Sample Policy Language
A. The limit of liability shown in the Declarations for this coverage is our maximum limit of liability for each person injured in any one accident. This is the most we will pay regardless of the number of

"Insureds;"
Claims made;
Vehicles or premiums shown in the Declaration; or
Vehicles involved in the accident.
 B. Any amounts otherwise payable for expenses under this coverage shall be reduced by any amounts paid or payable for the same expenses under Part A or Part C.

C. No payment will be made unless the injured person or that person's legal representative agrees in writing that any payment shall be applied toward any settlement or judgment that person receives under Part A or Part C.

Other Insurance
This section duplicates the "Other Insurance" section under the liability section, except that any insurance provided with respect to a vehicle not owned by the policyholder shall be excess of any other collectible insurance.

If there is other applicable auto medical payments insurance, we will pay only our share of the loss. Our share is the proportion that our limit of liability bears to the total of all applicable limits. However, any insurance we provide with respect to a vehicle you do not own shall be excess over any other collectible auto insurance providing payments for medical or funeral expenses.

Consumer Application
Cynthia is the driver of an auto involved in an accident. She has uninsured motorist limits of 25/50. Al is her passenger and has 100/300 uninsured motorist limits on his policy. Cynthia's uninsured motorist coverage will pay for her injuries and also can pay for Al's injuries because he was a passenger in Cynthia's car. Based on the "other insurance" clause, Cynthia's portion would be 25/(25+100) +25/(125) = 1/5 of Al's bills. Al's portion would be 100/(25+100) = 100/(125) = 4/5 of his bills. Therefore, if Al's injuries totaled $20,000, Cynthia's insurance would pay $4,000, and Al's would pay $16,000.

However, because the statement of other insurance usually ends with "shall be excess of any other collectible insurance" (or words to that effect), if Al's policy is going to be used, it will be excess to the coverage of Cynthia's policy. If Cynthia has a PAP, then the Other Insurance clause does apply, and her policy will pay only $4,000 for Al's injuries. Al's policy would pay the balance of $16,000 (as indicated above).

Consumer Application
Example #1: Ron Hobson recently sold his car, so he borrowed his brother Tom's pickup to transport firewood that he had purchased locally. On the way home, he runs a stop sign and hits a car, driven by Ernie Johnson, who is hospitalized with his resultant injuries.

Ernie has a PAP with AIC, with uninsured motorists coverage limits of 100/300. Tom does not have any insurance on his pickup because he had planned to give it to charity soon, but he has insurance on 2 other cars that he owns.

The AIC adjuster decides that although Tom has auto insurance, AIC cannot file a claim against that company because it does not insure the truck. Therefore, Ernie's medical bills will be paid for out of his uninsured motorist coverage, up to $100,000. Therefore, AIC will make payment for its client's injuries, even though someone else was negligent, caused the accident, and should have been responsible for the doctor's bills.

Example #2: Martha Cunningham is involved in an accident and blames the other person, who is uninsured. Because she is furious, she hires her family attorney to sue the other driver. The court determines that Martha is right, and awards her $25,000 for her medical bills.

Martha then contacts her insurance company and asks for the money from her uninsured motorists coverage. Her company refused to pay her because the policy stated that the company must agree in writing to any lawsuit.

Had Martha gone to her company first, they probably would have come to the same conclusion as the court, and would have paid her medical bills under the uninsured motorists coverage.

Example #3: Arnie and his wife, Ellen, took their family to the beach in their minivan. In the van with them were their three children, Arnie II, Lois and Melissa; Ellen's mother, Helen; and 3 friends of the children: Ricky, Michelle and Nicole. As they exited to the highway near the beach, their van was struck in the rear by an uninsured teenager driving a pickup. The van was pushed into a station wagon containing the driver and 2 passengers. There were no serious injuries, but all persons involved had minor injuries. The pickup had no liability insurance. The minivan had 100/300 coverage and 10/20 uninsured motorist coverage. The station wagon had 100/300 coverage and 10/20 uninsured motorist coverage. The following is a chart of the cost of each person's injuries.

Person

Cost

Pickup driver

$3,000

Arnie

$1,500

Ellen

$2,500

Arnie II

$2,500

Lois

$1,500

Melissa

$3,000

Helen

$3,000

Ricky	$2,500
Michele 	$3,000
Nicole 	$1,500
Station wagon driver

$2,000
Station wagon passenger #1	$1,500
Station wagon passenger #2	$2,500
The driver of the pickup was responsible for the accident; however, because he does not have insurance, he will have to pay for his own medical bills. (If he had a PAP, his medical payments coverage would have paid for his injuries.)

Arnie's uninsured motorists coverage will be used to pay for the injuries of the people in his van. Although he only has 10/20 limits, the medical bills for each person fall below the per-person limit ($10,000), so it is sufficient to cover these medical expenses. The total of all of the expenses of those for whom Arnie is responsible total $21,000, which is $1,000 over the per accident maximum. If these expenses are paid in order (as presented above), only $500 of Nicole's expenses can be paid under Arnie's uninsured motorist coverage. If Nicole's parents have a PAP, their uninsured motorist coverage would be excess over Arnie's and could pay for the balance of Nicole's expenses. Otherwise, they will have to pay for it or get the money from the pickup driver. They might sue Arnie; however, because he was not responsible for the accident, they may not succeed. The driver of the station wagon has uninsured motorist coverage, and the medical bills for everyone in that car are below the limits of liability, both on a per-person and a per-accident basis. Therefore, that policy should pay for all of the medical expenses for the passengers and driver of the station wagon.

Stacking Option
Although it is a fundamental rule in automobile insurance that "stacking" is not allowed, some states offer it as an option in conjunction with uninsured motorists coverage. In fact, it can be an automatic coverage that can be removed from the policy only by the action of the insured, in which case there is a lower premium given for the reduction in coverage.

As stated in this coverage option, uninsured motorists coverage provides protection for bodily injury sustained by an insured in an accident caused by an uninsured driver, which includes

Drivers with no liability insurance;
Hit-and-run drivers;
Drivers insured by insurance companies that deny coverage;
Drivers other than the insured or a relative residing in the household, excluded from liability coverage under the policy, whose operation of an insured vehicle caused bodily injury to the insured or a relative residing in the household; and
Drivers whose liability limits are less than the amount of the insured's damages.
The coverage may be selected in an amount equal to the policy limits for bodily injury liability limits, or the insured may select uninsured motorists limits lower than the bodily injury limits, or the coverage may be rejected.

The option allows the purchase, at a reduced rate, of a non-stacked (limited) type of uninsured motorists coverage. Under that form, the coverage limits will not be added together to pay for damages sustained by the insured in an accident. Therefore, if the policyholder is injured in a vehicle insured under this policy, the coverage provides the insured with protection only to the extent of the coverage limits shown on the declarations page for that vehicle. If the insured is injured in someone else's vehicle, or struck as a pedestrian, the insured may select the highest limits for the coverage on any one vehicle insured under the policy.

If the insured does not elect to purchase the non-stacked coverage, the coverage limits for each vehicle insured under the policy are added together (stacked) to pay for damages sustained by the insured in an accident. Thus, the coverage limits available to the insured would automatically change during the policy period if the insured increases or decreases the number of autos insured under the policy.

Please note that this is a "reverse" presentation, i.e. the policy provides the stacking option unless there is an action to cancel the option by purchasing a "non-stacking" option.

Additional wording in regard to the stacking provision is added in the policy, which states that regardless of whether the insured chose stacked or non-stacked limits, if bodily injury is sustained in a motor vehicle accident by any person other than the insured or a resident relative, the insurers maximum limit of liability for all damages arising out of bodily injury to any person other than the insured or the resident relative is the limit of liability shown on the declarations page applicable to the vehicle the person was occupying at the time of the motor vehicle accident. This is the most the insurance company will pay regardless of the number of claims made, vehicles, or persons stated on the declarations page, or vehicles involved in the accident.

Damages payable will be reduced by all amounts paid by the owner or operator of the uninsured auto, or anyone else responsible, including all money paid under the coverage of this or any other policy. Damages also will be reduced by all amounts payable under any workers compensation law, disability benefits law, or similar law, and auto medical payments, or any similar automobile medical payments coverage, or no-fault benefits provided under this or any other auto policy.

If there is other insurance, limits of two or more insured autos may be stacked:

If the injured person was in, on, getting into or out of a vehicle that is insured for this coverage under another policy, this coverage will be excess. If more than one policy applies to the accident on a primary basis, the insurer will bear its proportionate share of the damages payable.
Limits of two or more insured autos may not be stacked if the injured person was in, on, getting into, or getting out of a vehicle the injured person did not own, insured under that particular coverage, under another policy, that coverage will be excess. This means that when the injured person is legally entitled to recover damages in excess of the other policy limit, the insurer will pay up to the policy limit, except for damages consisting of pain, suffering, mental anguish, or inconvenience unless contrary to state law or regulation. If more than one policy applies to the accident on a primary basis, the total benefits payable to anyone person will not exceed the maximum benefits payable by the policy with the highest limit for uninsured motorists benefits. The insurer will bear its proportionate share, regardless of how many autos or auto policies may be involved whether written by this insurer or another company.
2. Underinsured Motorist Coverage
Although uninsured motorists coverage will pay only if an uninsured motorist is liable for damages, the uninsured motorist is defined as one who either has no insurance, or has an amount less than the state's minimum financial responsibility limits, or it can also be a hit-and-run driver. The personal automobile policy can be endorsed (in most states) to provide underinsured motorists coverage, which pays up to the difference between the Part A (liability) limits on the covered vehicle and the liability limits on the vehicle of the driver who was at fault, even if the driver who was at fault in the accident had limits in excess of the minimum requirements of the financial responsibility law.

Underinsured motorists coverage helps an insured with bodily injury damage caused by another motorist when that motorist has insufficient coverage. UIM coverage will pay the difference between the insured's UIM limits and the at-fault driver's bodily injury limits.

Insured's UIM limits - Driver's BI limits = Amount paid by UIM coverage

For example, Bob has bodily injury limits of 25/50. Bob causes a car accident in which Zoe is injured. Zoe's bodily injury damages come to a total of $65,000. Bob's bodily injury coverage will pay for only $25,000 of Zoe's damages, leaving her with $40,000 to pay for. Here are two ways underinsured motorist coverage could respond, depending on Zoe's limits:

If Zoe's underinsured motorist limits are 100/150, her UIM coverage will pay the remaining $40,000 of bodily injury damages.
If Zoe's limits are 50/100, her UIM coverage will pay $25,000 of the $40,000 in bodily injury damages. The remaining $15,000 would not be covered by insurance. $50,000 (Zoe's UIM limit) - $25,000 (Bob's per person limit) = $25,000 (what the UIM will pay)

PAP: Part D - Physical Damage, Part E - Duties After a Loss, and Part F - General Provisions
1. Part D - Physical Damage
Insuring Agreement
Uninsured motorists coverage will pay only if an uninsured motorist is liable for damages. The uninsured motorist is defined as one who either has no insurance, or has an amount less than the state's minimum financial responsibility limits, or it can also be a hit-and-run driver. The personal automobile policy can be endorsed (in most states) to provide underinsured motorists coverage, which pays up to the difference between the Part A (liability) limits on the covered vehicle and the liability limits on the vehicle that was at-fault, even if the vehicle that was at fault in the accident had limits in excess of the minimum requirements of the financial responsibility law.

Coverage is provided under "collision" and "other than collision coverage" (comprehensive). Most policies list perils associated with “other than collision” as follows:

Missiles or falling objects;
Fire;
Theft or larceny;
Explosion or earthquake;
Windstorm;
Hail, water, or flood;
Malicious mischief or vandalism;
Riot or civil commotion;
Contact with a bird or animal; or
Breakage of glass (except if the breakage is caused by a collision).
Definitions
Physical damage is a term used to group two coverages – collision and comprehensive –that provide protection for the insured against loss to their own vehicles. Each of the coverages insures against certain kinds of losses.

Collision coverage pays for the repair or replacement of the insured's vehicle if it is damaged in a collision with another vehicle or any other object (e.g. a tree or a telephone pole) and for overturn. The insured's company will pay for the loss regardless of who was at fault. As a means of holding down the costs of providing this coverage and to discourage small claims, the company will require that the insured choose a deductible, which will be subtracted from the amount of the loss before payment is made. If the other party is at fault, the insured's company will first pay to repair or replace the insured vehicle, then try to collect all of the money from the other driver or their insurance company, if they have one, including the deductible.

Comprehensive coverage is sometimes called "other than collision" because those are the kinds of losses for which it pays. It covers losses caused by theft, vandalism, fire, glass breakage, falling objects, explosion, flood, and other acts of God. Once again, there may be a deductible involved, which would be absorbed by the insured. For comprehensive coverage, though, the company may allow the insured to have no deductible or to buy back the deductible. "Buying back" means the insured will pay a higher premium for the coverage. In fact, for both physical damage coverages, the insured can control the premium by changing the deductibles. Some companies may allow an insured to choose comprehensive coverage only, without selecting collision coverage.

There are also several minor but important optional coverages that may be available to an insured that chooses the physical damage package. They include towing and labor, substitute transportation, rental reimbursement, and CB radio coverage. There may be others depending on the company, but these are the basics.

Consumer Application
Example #1: Larry has a PAP with glass breakage included under "collision" coverage. If the insured chooses "collision," or "other than collision," or both, depending upon the options offered by the particular company, he will have to decide which deductibles he wants for each coverage for each vehicle he owns. Few (if any) offer a "no deductible" collision coverage; therefore, the insured must choose a collision deductible. However, he has the choice of "no deductible" for comprehensive coverage, which, if he elects, and there is glass breakage in a collision loss, he may choose to have the glass replaced under the "other than collision" coverage (no deductible applied). If he has a comprehensive coverage deductible (which will reduce the premium), he can choose to have the glass breakage as part of the collision loss so that only one deductible is applied to the entire loss.

Larry has a collision, with a loss of $3,000 and a $200 deductible, glass breakage is $200, with a $200 comprehensive coverage deductible. If Larry chooses to keep the 2 losses separate, the company will deduct $200 from the collision amount and pay $2,800. The company will deduct $200 from the comprehensive amount and pay nothing for the glass. Larry receives $2,800. However, if the insured combines the glass breakage with the collision loss, the total damages will be $3,200 under "collision." The company will then deduct $200 from that total and will pay Larry $3,000. The comprehensive deductible doesn't come into play.

Example #2: LeRoy bought a Mustang with expensive Bose stereo equipment installed by the previous owner. The provision differentiates between "total" theft and "partial" theft. If his Mustang is stolen and never recovered, it is a "total" theft. If the stereo equipment is stolen from the car, then there IS a "partial" theft and the car IS recovered but the stereo IS gone, then payments are still considered theft payments because the damage would not have occurred if the car had not been stolen.

If there is a loss to an automobile that is considered "non-owned," the broadest coverage applicable to any covered auto is provided, as shown in the declarations. Non-owned means any private passenger car, pickup, van, or trailer not owned or furnished to the insured or a family member, but in the custody of or being operated by the insured or a family member, or an automobile or trailer that is not owned by the insured(s) but is being used as a temporary substitute while a covered automobile is being repaired or serviced, etc. Note that previous discussions involved a vehicle the insured did not own, and therefore the policy did not provide coverage. This section covers situations where the insured will be covered if the vehicle that is damaged is owned by someone else.

The insuring agreement is necessarily broad because the insurer agrees to pay for direct and accidental loss to "your covered auto" and any "non-owned auto." Also, collision is defined here because the insured has the option of insuring against loss by

Collision;
Perils other than collision; or 
Both; or
Neither.
It may be noted that the term "collision" also includes "upset." As an example, a motorist who lost control of his vehicle and ended up in a ditch has had an "upset" collision, even though he never "collided" with anything other than the ditch itself.

Example #3: John Murphy has PAP that covers three cars. Vehicle #1 does not have Part D coverage. Vehicle #2 only has other than collision, and vehicle #3 has collision and other than collision coverage.

John borrows his neighbor's pickup to deliver a piano to his home. On the way home, he accidentally side-swipes a van parked on the side of the road. Damage was minimal to the truck. Therefore his vehicle #3 coverage would provide the broadest coverage.

A. We will pay for direct and accidental loss to "your covered auto" or any "non-owned auto," including their equipment, minus any applicable deductible shown in the Declarations. We will pay for loss to your covered auto caused by

Other than "collision" only if the Definitions indicate that "Other Than Collision Coverage" is provided for that auto;
"Collision" only if the Declarations indicate that collision coverage is provided for that auto. If there is a loss to a "non-owned auto," we will provide the broadest coverage applicable to your "covered auto" shown in the Declarations.
B. "Collision" means the upset of "your covered auto" of a "non-owned auto" or their impact with another vehicle or object.

Loss caused by the following is considered other than collision:

Missiles or falling objects;
Fire;
Theft or larceny;
Explosion or earthquake;
Windstorm;
Hail, water or flood;
Malicious mischief or vandalism;
Riot or civil commotion;
Contact with a bird or other animal; or
Breakage of glass.
If breakage of glass is caused by a "collision," you may elect to have it considered a loss caused by "collision."

C. "Non-owned auto" means

Any private passenger auto, pickup, van or trailer non-owned by or furnished or available for the regular use of you or any "family member" while in the custody of or being operated by you or any "family member;" or
Any auto or "trailer" you do not own while used as a temporary substitute for "your covered auto" which is out of normal use because of its (a) breakdown; (b) repair; (c) servicing; (d) loss; or (e) destruction.
Transportation Expenses
In case the automobile insured is stolen, transportation expenses will be paid (if the other than collision coverage is elected), and the policy also will pay for "loss of use" expenses under these conditions. However, the insurance company will pay only for a stipulated period (such as 48 hours) after the theft, and until the stolen automobile is recovered or the insured is paid for the loss.

In addition, we will pay without application of a deductible, up to $15 per day to a maximum of $450, for

Transportation expenses incurred by you in the event of the total theft of "your covered auto." This applies only the Declarations indicate that Other Than Collision Coverage is provided for that auto; and
Loss of use expenses for which you become legally responsible in the event of the total theft of a non-owned auto. This applies only the Declarations indicate that Other Than Collision Coverage is provided for any "your covered auto."
We will pay only expenses incurred during the period beginning 48 hours after the theft and ending when "your covered auto" or the "non-owned auto" is returned to use or we pay for its loss.

Exclusions
The following are typical exclusions under the personal auto policy. Note, however, that they do not apply if an auto has been stolen.

Basic exclusions include the following:

 Any insured auto used for business or as a public or livery conveyance;
Damage due to wear and tear, freezing, mechanical/electrical breakdown or failure; or
Road damage to tires.
Losses due to or as a consequence of the following:

 Radioactive contamination;
Nuclear weapon discharge;
War, declared or undeclared;
Civil war;
Insurrection; or
Rebellion or revolution.
Electronic equipment losses:

Electronic equipment designed for reproduction of sound, such as radios, stereos, tape decks or CD players; or
Other electronic equipment that receives or transmits audio, visual or data signals, such as CB radios, telephones, 2-way mobile radios, scanning monitor receivers, television monitors, video or audiocassette records or personal computers.
Confiscation by governmental or civil authorities because of illegal activities of the insured, or family member, or because of failure to comply with EPA or Department of Transportation, standards will not be covered under this section.

Coverage will not be provided for loss to any nonowned automobile used by the insured or any family member without a reasonable belief that the insured or the family member are entitled to do so.

Note: This is an exclusion that is present in other parts of the policy. This exclusion means that if the insured or "family member" borrows another person's automobile without that person's knowledge or approval, then this policy will not cover any claims arising from the usage of that auto. However, if there was a reasonable expectation that they were using the car legally, then the policy coverage would apply.

Losses to awnings or cabanas, of vehicles designed to create additional living facilities, or equipment used to detect radar (fuzz-busters), loss to any custom furnishings or equipment on a pickup or van (such as special carpeting, furniture facilities for cooking or sleeping, murals or graphics, or extending roofs) are not covered under this section.

Also not covered is any loss to non-owned autos used while employed in selling, repairing, servicing, storing or parking vehicles or to any loss to a non-owned auto being used for any business.

Note: These exclusions show that the PAP is not intended to cover the normal wear and tear of vehicles or parts of vehicles. However, even though such things as worn out mufflers, worn tires, torn seat fabric, faded paint, etc., will not be covered, in those cases when the car has to be repaired because of a covered accident, certain things will be replaced or repaired. An example would be a faded hood, which would be replaced if damaged in an accident. The hood would be painted the original color. If the covered auto is stolen and the thieves severely damage the tires, the tires will be replaced.

Also, only permanently installed equipment in the auto is covered under the policy. If a Walkman radio is stolen from the seat of the car, it is not covered under the PAP. Items such as cell phones, CB radios, television, and VCRs cannot be insured; however, coverage can be purchased as an endorsement for an additional premium.

The confiscation provision of the policy is called into play because of the ongoing "war on drugs" and subsequent legislation. If an insured uses his or her covered motor home (or van or auto) for the transport of drugs, the government can, and will, confiscate the vehicle, and this would be not covered under a PAP.

Many policies have statements such as, "This exclusion does not apply to the interest of Loss Payees in your covered auto." This applies to the government confiscation. This protects a lien holder if the insured purchased the car with an auto loan.

Consumer Application
Bert's PAP states as an exclusion under Part D, "Loss to any 'non-owned auto' when used by you or any 'family member' without a reasonable belief that you or that 'family member' are entitled to do so."

Bert buys a new pickup on Monday then leaves on Tuesday on a business trip. His brother, Steve, visits Bert's wife on Tuesday to check out the new truck. Bert's wife tells Steve that his brother is out of town, but she gives him the truck keys so that he can take it for a drive. Steve decided that he would use the truck to haul several railroad ties he was going to use for landscaping. While loading the ties, one fell and smashed the side of the pickup bed and badly scratched the back of the cab.

Steve filed a claim for damage to the truck under his PAP but was not covered because of the provision stated above. (Bert could have the damage paid for under his own comprehensive coverage.)

Limit of Liability
The limit of liability under this section will be the lesser of: (a) the actual cash value of the stolen or damaged property; or (b) the amount necessary to repair or replace the property.

However, there may be a maximum amount for a trailer as a non-owned vehicle, such as $500.

In determining the actual cash value under this section, an adjustment for depreciation and physical condition will be made in determining actual cash value at the time of loss. This provision is short and succinct as it appears frequently and causes settlement problems during settlement. Invariably, a person will attach a higher value to an automobile than the offer that is made by the insurance company. If, for instance, the automobile was recently overhauled, painted, with a new interior and new tires, etc., insurance companies may offer more for actual cash value if this is pointed out to them and given proof the condition exists. If an older vehicle in superb condition is being insured, it may be wise to ask the insured to have the auto appraised, or at least take frequent pictures of the vehicle showing its condition.

1. Our limit of liability for loss will be the lesser of the

A. Actual cash value of the stolen or damaged property; or

B. Amount necessary to repair or replace the property.

However, the most we will pay for loss to any non-owned auto which is a trailer is $500.
2. An adjustment for depreciation and physical condition will be made in determining actual cash value at the time of loss.

Consumer Application
Jerry owns a 3-year-old Buick LeSabre and is involved in a single-car accident, causing extensive damage to his car. When the adjuster from the insurance company receives the necessary information, it is determined that the cost to replace the vehicle would be $13,000 with the same equipment as the original car.

The adjuster also discovered that Jerry put considerably more mileage on the car than expected, which reduces the value of the car by $2,000. Therefore, Jerry's insurer will pay $11,000 to replace the auto if necessary.

When the adjuster receives the estimates to repair the car, it is discovered that it would cost $6,000 to restore it to its pre-accident condition. Therefore, the insurer only has to pay for the repair of the car, or $6,000.

2. Part E - Duties After an Accident or Loss
Duties after an accident or loss is referred to in some policies as "Part E." As there are duties of an insurance company to provide services or funds under stipulated conditions, there are duties of the insured also. Even though the great majority of policyholders never read their policies, they would automatically perform most of these duties, as again, common sense applies.

The insurer must be notified promptly as to how, when and where the accident loss happened. One cannot assume that the police report will suffice as notification to the insurer, or that the other driver will file a report with their company, which will then notify all other insurers involved. The original notice should contain as much information as possible, including the names and addresses of the other parties, whether injured or not, and the names of any witnesses.

Normally, insureds call their agents and ask them what to do, but the phone call by itself is not sufficient for an insurer to take the appropriate action.

The insured must cooperate with the insurance company during all stages of the claim, including investigation, settlement, or through the defense procedures of any claim or suit. Any legal papers received by the insured must be sent promptly to the insured.

The insured (or driver, if family member) may be required to take a physical examination by designated doctors (paid for by the insurer), and possibly be required to submit to an examination under oath.

The insured must authorize the insurance company to receive copies of medical reports and any other pertinent records, and to complete any proof of loss when required by the insurer.

If a person is seeking uninsured motorists coverage, they must promptly notify the police if a hit-and-run driver is involved, and if a suit is brought, the person must send those papers directly to the insurer. The police need to be quickly informed because there is a possibility of criminal charges being filed in a hit-and-run.

If an insured (or family member) is seeking coverage for damage to the insured automobile, the person must take reasonable steps after the loss to prevent any further loss of the auto or equipment. Example: If a car is burglarized through a broken window, the window must be repaired or other steps taken so that other equipment gained by access through the window does not become stolen. If the car is stolen, the police must be promptly notified.

The insurance company reserves the right to inspect and appraise the damaged property before it is repaired or disposed of.

Consumer Application
Doug leaves his car in the mall parking lot while shopping for a birthday present for his wife. When he returns to his car, he sees that someone had "keyed" the car (i.e., dragged a car key or other sharp instrument down the side of the car). Doug asks everyone he sees if they knew who did it to his new car, but was unable to find the culprit.

The next day he calls his brother's body shop for an estimate to repaint the car. The estimate seems reasonable, so he authorizes his brother to paint the car. The paint job was perfect, so Doug sent the bill to his insurance company. Doug's insurance company does not have to pay the bill, because

Doug did not notify the police about the vandalism. Even though that may not be "required" under his contract, it would support his claim of vandalism.
Doug should not have had his car painted without having an adjuster or appraiser from the insurance company look at the car first.
We have no duty to provide coverage under this policy unless there has been full compliance with the following duties:

A. We must be notified promptly of how, when and where the accident or loss happened. Notice should also include the names and addresses of any injured persons and of any witnesses.

B. A person seeking any coverage must do the following:

1. Cooperate with us in the investigation, settlement or defense of any claim or suit;

2. Promptly send us copies of any notices or legal Papers received in connection with the accident or loss;

3. Submit, as often as we reasonably require (a) to physical exams by physicians we select. We will pay for these exams; (b) to examination under oath and subscribe the same;

4. Authorize us to obtain (a) medical reports; and (b) other pertinent records; and

5. Submit a proof of loss when required by us.

C. A person seeking uninsured motorists coverage must also do the following:

1. Promptly notify the police if a hit-and-run driver is involved; and

2. Promptly send us copies of the legal papers if a suit is brought.

D. A person seeking coverage for damage to your auto must also do the following:

1. Take reasonable steps after loss to protect your covered auto or any non-owned auto and their equipment from further loss. We will pay reasonable expenses incurred to do this;

2. Promptly notify the police if your covered auto or any non-owned auto is stolen; and

3. Permit us to inspect and appraise the damaged property before its repair or disposal.

3. Part F - General Provisions
The policy's general provisions are those that apply to all sections of the policy. They usually appear toward the end of the policy, prior to any endorsements. However, some policies have the general provisions immediately following the declarations page. Some of the provisions are required by law or regulations. In most policies, they are not voluminous.

Payment of Loss
The insurance company has the right to either pay for any loss in money to the insured, or repair or replace the damaged or stolen property. The insurance company also has the right to return the property to the insured. The company will pay for any damage resulting from the theft. The insurance company may keep all or part of the property at an agreed or appraised value.

We may pay for loss in money or repair or replace the damaged or stolen property. We may, at our expense, return any stolen property to

You; or
The address shown in this policy.
If we return stolen property, we will pay for any damage resulting from the theft. We may keep all or part of the property at an agreed or appraised value.

No Benefit to Bailee
This insurance shall not directly or indirectly benefit any carrier or other bail for hire.

Other Sources of Recovery
If another insurer also covers the loss, the insurance company will only pay its share of the loss, which is the proportion that its limit of liability bears to the total of all applicable limits. However, if the auto is a nonowned auto, insurance provided under the policy would be excess of any other coverage provided by the owner of the nonowned auto, or any other applicable physical damage insurance, or any other source of recovery applicable to the loss.

Arbitration
This section has provisions for arbitration, which is very common and typical of auto contracts. Basically, if the insurance company and the insured(s) do not agree as to whether the person is legally entitled to receive damages, or as to the amount of damages, then either party can make a (written) demand for arbitration. Each party will then select an arbitrator, and the two of them select the third arbitrator. If they cannot agree within a specified period (usually 30 days) as to whom the third arbitrator will be, either of the appointed arbitrators can request a judge to appoint the third. Each party pays the expenses it incurs and shares equally the expenses of the third arbitrator.

The decisions of the arbitrators are binding unless the amount exceeds the minimum limit required under the financial responsibility laws of the state. In that case, within 60 days, either party can demand the right to a trial.

Usually, the arbitration hearings are held somewhere in the home county of the insured, whose laws pertaining to arbitration apply.

A. If an "insured" and we do not agree

Whether that person is legally entitled to recover damages under this part; or
As to the amount of damages; then
Either party may make a written demand for arbitration. In this event, each party will select an arbitrator and the two arbitrators will select a third. If they cannot agree within 30 days, either may request that selection be made by a judge of a court having jurisdiction.
B. Each party will

Pay the expenses it incurs; and
Bear the expenses of the third arbitrator equally.
C. Unless both parties agree otherwise, arbitration will take place in the county in which the insured lives. Local rules of law as to procedure and evidence will apply and a decision agreed to by two of the arbitrators will be binding as to

Whether the "insured" is legally entitled to recover damages; and
The amount of damages. This applies only if the amount does exceed the minimum limit for Bodily Injury liability specified by the financial responsibility law of the state in which your covered auto is principally garaged. If the amount exceeds that limit, either party may demand the right to a trial. This demand must be made within 60 days of the arbitrators' decision. If this demand is not made, the amount of damages agreed to by the arbitrators will be binding.
Appraisal
If the insurance company and the insured do not agree on the amount of loss, either party can demand an appraisal of the loss. Similar to arbitration, each party will appoint a competent appraiser, who will select an "umpire." The appraisers will then state their estimate as to actual cash value and amount of loss, and if they disagree, the umpire will make the final decision.

In order to keep every claim of this type from being contested in an effort to get an inflated cash value appraisal, the policy provides that if such appraiser arbitration is effected, each party must pay the charges for their chosen appraiser and pay the expenses of the appraisal and umpire equally.

Although this provision is similar to other such provisions, there is one apparent difference. No other rights are abrogated by agreeing to an appraisal. This means that if an appraisal sets the amount of loss in excess of the insurer's determination, the insurer may still decide to repair the vehicle. Appraisal is concerned only with determining the amount of the loss, and not the amount payable.

1. If we and you do not agree on the amount of loss, either may demand an appraisal of the loss. In this event, each party will select a competent appraiser. The two appraisers will select an umpire. The appraisers will state separately the actual cash value and the amount of loss. If they fall to agree, they will submit their differences to the umpire. A decision agreed to by any two will be binding. Each party will

A. Pay its chosen appraisal; and

B. Bear the expenses of the appraisal and umpire equally.

2. We do not waive any of our rights under this policy by agreeing to an appraisal.

Bankruptcy
If the insured becomes insolvent or declares bankruptcy, the insurance company will not be relieved of any obligations under the policy. This provision helps third-party claimants by not relieving the insurer of any duties to pay if the covered person becomes bankrupt.

Bankruptcy or insolvency of the insured shall not relieve us of any obligations under this policy.

Changes
The policy provisions may not be changed or waived except by endorsement issued by the insurance company. This statement relieves the insurer of any liability as a result of a verbal statement by an agent or company employee. Further, it limits the contract between the insurance company and the insured exactly to the written policy and to nothing else.

If the insurance company broadens coverage during the premium paying period without charge, the policyholder will have the new features if the policyholder has the coverage. This would pertain generally to mandated coverages.

The premium on the policy is derived from information in the hands of the insurance company; therefore, any changes in the information in the possession of the insurer allows the insurer to make adjustments in premiums. Any rate change will be made using the rules, rates, and forms on file in the state of residence of the insured.

Sometimes (actually quite frequently) coverages under an insurance policy are improved or made more liberal. Many changes can be made without additional premium charges, and the insured will not have to wait to take advantage of the new provisions, nor will the insured have to cancel his or her policy and purchase a new policy with the more liberal provisions. Because there are a lot of changes continually being legislated by the various states, this provision allows the policy to be automatically interpreted to provide the better coverage on the date the coverage would become effective for all of the insurance companies in that state.

Consumer Application
Basil purchased a PAP on his Acura when it was used to drive to and from work one day a week (he belonged to a carpool). Basil changed jobs, which entailed using his own car for sales trips throughout the state. His annual mileage increased from 8,000 a year to approximately 15,000 a year. Basil's insurance company sends their policyholders questionnaires each year on renewal, asking for present odometer readings.

The first year that Basil reported the odometer reading, it was higher than the previous year, but the large increase did not show until the renewal date following his second year of heavy traveling. Upon receipt of the questionnaire, the insurance company increased his premium by reclassifying his automobile as to usage.

1. This policy contains all the agreements between you and us. Its terms may not be changed or waived except by endorsement issued by us.

2. If there is a change to the information used to develop the policy premium, we may adjust your premium. Changes during the policy term that may result in a premium increase or decrease include, but are not limited to changes in:

A. The number type or use classification of insured vehicle;

B. Operators using insured vehicle;

C. The place of principal garaging of insured vehicles;

D. Coverage deductible M limits;

E. If a change resulting from A or B requires a premium adjustment we will make the premium adjustment in accordance with our manual rules.

3. If we make a change which broadens coverage under this edition of your policy without additional premium charge, that change will automatically apply to your policy as of the date implemented with a general revision that includes both broadening and restrictions in coverage, whether that general program revision is implemented through introduction of

F. A subsequent edition of your poll; or

G. An Amendatory Endorsement.

PAP: Provisions and Endorsements
1. General Provisions
Fraud
The insurer does not provide coverage for any insured who has made fraudulent statements, or engaged in fraudulent conduct in connection with any accident or loss for which coverage is sought under the policy.

Legal Action Against the Insurance Company
This provision states that the insured cannot take legal action against the insurance company until such time that the insurance company and the insured agree (in writing) that the insured has an obligation to pay or the amount has been determined by judgment after trial.

This provision also excludes the insurer from any action to determine the liability of an insured.

1. No legal action may be brought against us until there has been full compliance with all the terms of this policy. In addition, under Part A, no legal action may be brought against us until

A. We agree in writing that the "insured" has an obligation to pay; or

B. The amount of that obligation has been finally determined by judgment after trial.

2. No person or organization has any right under this policy, to bring us into any action to determine the liability of an "insured."

Right to Recover Payment
Sometimes called the "subrogation" provision, this provision states that if the insurance company makes a payment under the policy, and the person to or for whom payment was made has a right to recover damages from another source, the insurance company shall be "subrogated" (substituted) to that right. The policyholder must cooperate fully with the insurer in these cases, and may not hinder any action taken for the insurer to recover these funds. Further, the person who has received funds from others must hold in trust for the insurance company these funds, and reimburse them to the company.

This provision usually comes into play when a company compensates its own policyholder without determining liability and the liability is determined later when the case is finally settled.

Consumer Application
Betty is driving her new Pontiac when she collides at an intersection with Bruce's Olds. They both receive traffic citations because it was not apparent as to who caused the accident - there were no traffic signals involved (only a 4-way stop), and there were no immediate witnesses. Therefore, because both drivers had PAP coverages, the companies each covered the medical expenses of their own insureds.

Betty's insurance company later finds a witness who is willing to testify that Betty was at fault because she went through the 4-way stop without stopping. The witness said that Betty was apparently looking for something on the floor of her vehicle when she went through the intersection. She also testified that Bruce had arrived at the stop sign first, stopped, and then proceeded.

Based upon the new information, Betty's insurance company agreed to a settlement. Therefore, the expenses of Bruce, which had been paid by his insurer, would be reimbursed by Betty's company.

1. If we make a payment under this policy and the person to or for whom payment was made has a right to recover damages from another, we shall be subrogated to that right. That person shall do

A. Whatever is necessary to enable us to exercise our rights; and

B. Nothing after loss to prejudice them. However, our rights in this paragraph (A) do not apply under Part D against any person, using your covered auto with a reasonable belief that that person is entitled to do so.

2. If we make a payment under this policy and the person to or for whom payment is made recovers damages from another that person shall

C. Hold in trust for us the proceeds of the recovery; and

D. Reimburse us to the extent of our payment.

Policy Period and Territory
Standard wording applies: "The policy period is shown in the declarations page, and applies only to losses and accidents that occur within the United States of America, its territories or possessions, Puerto Rico, or Canada."

Coverage to include Mexico can be purchased and added as an endorsement by most companies. However, a Mexican coverage endorsement can be purchased, but liability insurance must be purchased through a Mexican insurer in order to comply with Mexican laws. This endorsement only provides coverage for trips for a limited number of days. Coverage can be easily obtained at most border crossing points.

Coverage during transport applies only to the covered auto, not a non-owned vehicle, and only between points in the United States, its possessions, and Canada. Interestingly, distance makes no difference. An automobile shipped to London from New York will not be covered; however, an automobile shipped to Honolulu from San Francisco would be covered.

1. This policy applies only to accidents and losses which occur

A. During the policy period as shown in the Declarations; and

B. Within the policy territory.

2. The policy territory is

C. The United States of America;

D. Its territories or possessions (e.g. Puerto Rico); or

E. Canada.

This policy also applies to loss to, or accidents involving your covered auto while being transported between their ports.

Termination
The policy may be canceled during the policy period by returning the policy to the insurance company, or giving advance notice of the date of cancellation. The insurer can cancel by mailing to the insured a notice at least 10 days if the cancellation is for nonpayment of premiums, or, if the notice is mailed during the first 60 days the policy is in effect. Otherwise, 20 days' notice must be given.

Note: These periods of time are typical, but vary by state.

If the insured obtains other insurance on the covered auto, similar coverage under this policy will automatically terminate on the date that the coverage on the other auto became effective.

If the insured is entitled to a premium refund, the insurer will compute the premium refund according to its manuals and according to state laws or regulations.

Some states have a provision that the policy may not be canceled by the insured during the first 2 months following the issue date, except if the insured auto was totally demolished, ownership was transferred to another person, or if another policy covering the insured auto was purchased. The insurer may cancel during the first 60 days of coverage if the check remitted was dishonored. After 60 days, the insurer may cancel for the normal reasons.

The reason for this variance is that states that require financial responsibility want to make sure that the policy that is in force when the vehicle is licensed remains in force for at least 60 days.

If the insurer elected not to renew or continue the policy, notice of 20 days prior to the renewal date will suffice. If the insurer offers to renew or continue, and the insured does not accept, the policy will automatically terminate at the end of the current policy period. Failure to pay the premium means the insured has not accepted the offer. Some states require more than the 20 days' notice. Mid-term cancellations by the insurer may be accomplished only by nonpayment of premium, licenses suspensions or revocations, or material misrepresentation.

Some policies also have a stipulation that after 60 days, the company will cancel only if the insured's driver's license or that of any driver who lives with the insured, or any driver who customarily uses the covered auto has been suspended or revoked. This must have occurred during the policy period; or since the last anniversary of the original effective date if the policy period is other than one year; or since the last anniversary of the original effective date if the policy period is other than one year; or if the policy was obtained through material misrepresentation. Material misrepresentation is interpreted as the insured withholding or lying about information on the application, which, if the company had been aware of this information, the company would have declined to accept the application.

Consumer Application
Bob is a new insurance agent for AIC, and while working in the local office, he received a telephone call from a lady who identified herself as Bernie W., a policyholder whose agent has since retired. She wanted to cancel the insurance on her automobile because she was moving to Virginia and would get a new policy and insurance agent in that state. She stated she had no idea as to where her policy was, but Bob looked it up on the computer, and the information she gave appeared to be correct. Bob asked for a written notice, and when it arrived, he notified the insurance company and filled out the necessary forms for return of unearned premium, which was such a small amount as to be insignificant.

Three weeks later, a claim is filed by Bernie W. for an accident that had just occurred. Her claim was denied because the policy had been canceled. Bernie hired an attorney, who informed the insurance company that Bernie had never canceled her auto insurance, had not moved to Virginia, and had no intention of taking out new insurance with another company.

Further, her former sister-in-law had a history of harassing Bernie on financial matters. Upon the insistence of the attorney, it became apparent to the insurance company that the signature on the letter was a forgery.

Most insurers will check a signature before they cancel a policy. This is another reason that the company requests that the policy be returned but does not require it to be surrendered. In an event such as this, the policy is reinstated as though it had not been terminated.

Cancellation. This policy may be canceled during the policy period as follows:

The named insured shown in the Declarations may cancel by: (a) returning the policy to the insurer; or (b) giving the insurer advance written notice of the date cancellation is to take effect.
The insurer may cancel by mailing to the named insured shown in the Declarations at the address shown in the policy: (a) at least 10 days' notice if cancellation is for nonpayment of premium or if notice is mailed during the first 60 days this policy is in effect and this is not a renewal or continuation policy; or (b) at least 20 days' notice in all other cases.
After the policy is in effect for 50 days, or if this is a renewal or continuation policy, the insurer will cancel only: (a) for nonpayment of premium; or (b) if the driver's license or that of any driver who lives with the insured; or any driver who customarily uses the insured's "covered auto," has been suspended or revoked. This must have occurred:
During the policy period; or
Since the last anniversary of the original effective date if the policy period is other than 1 year.
If the policy was obtained through material misrepresentation.
Non-renewal. If we decide not to renew or continue this policy, we will mail notice to the named insured shown in the Declarations at the address shown in this policy.

Notice will be mailed at least 20 days before the end of the policy period.
If the policy period is other than 1 year, we will have the right not to renew or continue it only at each anniversary of its original effective date.
Automatic Termination. If we offer to renew or continue and you or your representative do not accept, this policy will automatically terminate at the end of the current policy period. Failure to pay the required renewal, or continuation premium when due shall mean that you have not accepted our offer.

If you obtain other insurance on "your covered auto," any similar insurance provided by this policy will terminate as to that auto on the effective date of the other insurance.

Other Termination Provisions. If the law in effect in your state at the time this policy is issued renewed or continued: (a) requires a longer notice period; (b) requires a special form or procedure for giving notice; or (c) modified any of the stated termination reasons, we will comply with those requirements.

We may deliver any notice instead of mailing it. Proof of mailing of any notice shall be sufficient proof of notice;
If this policy is canceled you may be entitled to a premium refund. If so, we will send you the refund. The premium refund, if any, will be computed according to our manuals. However, making or offering to make the refund is not a condition of cancellation. The effective date of cancellation stated in the notice shall become the end of the policy period.
Transfer of Interest
Any rights and/or duties under the policy cannot be assigned without the written consent of the insurance company. However, if the insured should die, coverage will be provided for the surviving spouse (if living at the same address at time of death), and in effect, the surviving spouse will become the insured. If there is no surviving spouse, the legal representative shall become the insured. In any event, coverage will be provided only until the end of the policy period.

TRANSFER OF YOUR INTEREST IN THIS POLICY

1. Your rights and duties under this policy may not be assigned without our written consent. However, if a named insured shown in the Declarations dies, coverage will be provided for

A. The surviving spouse if resident in the same household at the time of death. Coverage applies to the spouse as if a named insured shown in the Declarations;

B. The legal representative of the deceased person as if a named insured shown in the Declarations. This applies only with respect to the representative's legal responsibility to maintain or use your covered auto; or

C. Coverage will only be provided until the end of the policy period.

Two or More Auto Policies
An interesting but common provision in automobile policies states that if the policyholder has another automobile insurance policy issued by the same insurer, and if they apply to the same accident, the maximum limit of liability under all policies shall not exceed the highest applicable limit of liability under any one policy.

If this policy and any other auto insurance policy issued to you by us apply to the same accident, the maximum limit of our liability under all the policies shall not exceed the highest applicable limit of liability under any one policy.

2. General Endorsement
The basic endorsement is called the general endorsement, and may also be referred to as a "blank" or "manuscript" endorsement. It is used whenever no other pre-printed endorsement is appropriate for the kind of change desired.

Even the general endorsement has preprinted lines for the key information concerning the policy (such as the policy period, name of insured, and effective date of the change), but the blank sections of the general endorsement are used to describe the actual changes being made. Even correcting a name on a policy must be done by endorsement because the policy is a legal document, and it states in the policy that all changes must be by endorsement.

Whenever any of these endorsements is attached to the policy at the time the policy is issued, the endorsement numbers will be printed on the policy declaration page. Note the statement at the end of the Sample Declaration Page earlier in this text. When it is necessary to add an endorsement after a policy has been issued, generally the change endorsement also must be issued. Only the general endorsement and change endorsement provide the effective date of the original coverage and effective date of the change.

It is not feasible to describe all endorsements because of the variety of state regulations and laws, and the number of insurance companies. For purposes of this text, examples of some of the most used endorsements are listed below.

Miscellaneous Vehicle Types
The miscellaneous vehicle types endorsement is used to provide coverage for motor vehicles that are not covered under a PAP, including motor homes, motorcycles, all-terrain vehicles, golf carts or dune buggies. It also can extend coverage for a private passenger auto owned jointly by two or more relatives (other than husband and wife) or other individuals who reside in the household. Normally, the private passenger auto jointly owned would be insured under its own policy. The format of this endorsement is much like a "mini-policy" because it is comprised of several sections relating to the particular part of the PAP form.

Extended Transportation Expenses
In the discussion of Part D, coverage for damage to your auto, it is mentioned that transportation expenses coverage is automatically available to a policyholder if they have other than collision coverage for the covered automobile, and such vehicle is stolen. Under the terms of the typical PAP, the insured would probably be able to purchase similar coverage for other types of losses, which is provided by this endorsement.

This endorsement extends the Part D provisions to allow (as examples, amounts may vary by state or company) $15 per day (to a maximum of $450) to rent a substitute vehicle if the covered automobile, or a nonowned automobile cannot be used for more than 24 hours because of a loss covered under the PAP. Note that the insured auto must be covered under Part D and is not subject to exclusion. (For example: An engine that has to be replaced because it has operated for 300,000 miles would not be a covered loss).

Secondly, the loss must not be a total theft; however, if the car is stolen, the transportation expenses of Part D would apply and would pay for the rental car.

This particular endorsement example allows for the coverage to be increased $30 a day with a maximum of $900.

Extended Nonowner Coverage
Exclusions in the PAP stated that liability will not be provided for vehicles owned by the named insured, a resident spouse or family member, furnished or available for the regular use of the named insured or any family member, if the vehicle is not listed on the policy. This endorsement eliminates that restriction and extends the coverage. It is most frequently used to extend PAP provisions to a car furnished by an employer.

Under Part B - Medical Payments Coverage, there are similar exclusions that exclude payments if the insured or a family member were injured while occupying a covered vehicle or struck by an owned or regularly available vehicle that is not on the policy. This endorsement again extends this coverage.

Underinsured Motorists Coverage
This endorsement has been mentioned previously in the text. The intent of this endorsement is to compensate the insured if the other driver responsible for the accident has liability limits that are too low to pay for the entire claim.

As an example, Joe has a PAP with medical payments coverage of $1,000, and $100,000 of uninsured motorists coverage. Joe feels safe because he believes that he has adequate coverage for any contingency. However, Joe was backing out of his driveway when his neighbor's 17-year-old son loses control of his car in the street and collides with Joe's car, causing serious injuries to Joe. Joe is entitled to receive $78,000 for his injuries. However, his neighbor's policy only has the minimum required coverage: $15,000. Therefore, his neighbor is not "uninsured" but is "underinsured." Joe can recover $15,000 from his neighbor's policy and $1,000 of medical payments from his own policy. Joe must come up with $62,000, and, of course, he can sue his neighbor.

Audio, Visual, and Data Electronic Equipment and Media
This endorsement covers such items as CB radios, mobile radios, televisions, VCRs, cell phones, and others up to specified limits. In addition, coverage is provided for the various media used with the equipment, such as tapes, records, or compact discs up to $200.

Towing and Labor Costs
This endorsement shows a particular limit of liability per disablement. This would indicate the maximum the company would pay each time the covered auto has to be towed and/or serviced on the road. It will not pay for repair work that is ultimately performed at a service station or automotive center.

The towing and labor costs endorsement provides a basic limit of $25 for towing and labor costs incurred at the place a vehicle is disabled. Higher limits are available for an additional premium. Coverage applies to a covered auto or a nonowned auto, but only applies to costs incurred at the place of disablement.

3. Nonstandard Automobile Insurance
All states now either require that all automobiles be insured by their owners, or encourage insurance as the best and most practical way to comply with the laws (some states allow self-insurance). Driving is a privilege awarded by the government; however, the insurance companies must either decide who can or cannot drive, or offer insurance coverage to all licensed drivers. Therefore, the insurance industry has made available insurance that is adequate to comply with any minimum requirement compulsory insurance laws. This is accomplished through one of two methods: substandard automobile insurance companies or assigned risk plans.

Substandard Automobile Insurance Companies
Certain "specialty" insurance companies offer insurance at rates considerably higher than those offered by "standard" automobile insurance insurers. Some of these rates may be 150% to 200% of the standard rates. Many times the rates are a function of the number of traffic violation points and are an alternative to auto insurance policies. Although most states have "assigned risk plans" (discussed next), at times the rates charged for assigned risk policies are higher than those charged by a substandard automobile insurance company.

Assigned Risk Plans
Because most states have financial responsibility laws (where auto insurance is required) and/or no-fault insurance laws, insurance must be available if these laws are to work. Therefore, special plans have been established in every state.

When an applicant for auto insurance has been rejected by two or more insurers, the application is then submitted to the assigned risk plan manager. If the applicant meets the requirements of the Assigned Risk Pool, the applicant is then assigned to an insurer licensed to do business in that state. The insurer must accept that risk and issue a policy. Licensed insurance companies "take turns" in accepting such risks as assigned to them (hence, "assigned risks").

Participation can be denied only in extreme cases, such as narcotics dealers, habitual alcoholics, etc. Surcharges are assigned to the established rates, and can be as much as 200%.

Usually, the assignment is normally for a 3-year period, and at the end of that period of time, the insured can return to a "standard" insurance company. Assigned risk policies usually provide full coverage, with a limit on the amount of liability, but some states provide only minimum limits as provided by that state's laws.

Other Plans
There are two other plans to provide automobile insurance for those who have a difficult time purchasing it in the usual market. These plans were devised because so many insured considered it a "social stigma" to be assigned to the assigned risk pool. The difference between the two is principally that of the method of administration.

In joint underwriting through associations, premiums, expenses, and losses of the substandard insured are pooled and shared by all of the participating insurers. There is a limited number of servicing insurance companies for this business that adjust claims and provide all other services needed for plans of this type.

In a reinsurance facilities plan, each insurer must provide coverage for every licensed driver who applies. If the applicant does not meet the insurer's underwriting criteria, the application is transferred to the reinsurance facility, and the premiums, expenses and losses are shared by all insurers that participate in the reinsurance plan.

Consumer Application
Patrick is a 19-year-old student who has had 3 speeding tickets during the past 3 years, which is not enough to suspend his license under state laws. His father gave him a 1997 Trans-Am for graduation. Patrick's father had been able to keep him under a family policy covering 3 other autos in the family, but when Patrick left for college with his new Trans-Am, the insurance company refused to accept him under their standard policies.

Patrick's father appealed to the agent who handled all of his insurance, who suggested a sub-standard insurance company; however, the premiums for the Trans-Am would be almost as high as standard coverage on the other 3 cars. Further checking revealed that the assigned risk would be a little more expensive.

Because the sub-standard auto company would accept Patrick with his present driving record, and he would not have the stigma of "assigned risk," they elected to apply with the sub-standard company.

If Patrick picks up another ticket, he would probably have to be covered by the assigned risk pool, whether he likes it or not.

Homeowners (HO) Insurance
There is probably no country on earth that places greater importance on the right to own property than the United States. For most of us, the national yearning to own property translates into the "American dream" of owning our own homes.

But with the fulfillment of that dream comes risk, the potential of losing one's home due to physical destruction of the property, or personal liability for the injuries of others. Homeowners insurance is designed to mitigate the consequences of these losses.

All homeowner's policies include the following components:

Declarations;
Insuring Agreement;
Definitions;
Section I - Property Coverages, Perils Insured Against, Exclusions, Conditions;
Section II - Liability Coverages, Exclusions, Additional Coverages, Conditions; and
Conditions applicable to both Section I and Section II.
1. Declarations
The first items on the declarations page usually are the policy number and the policy period. In most states, the policy periods begin at 12:01 a.m., standard time at the insured location. The date coverage begins is known as the inception or effective date. The name of the insurance company will also be included in this section of the declarations.

The next items on the declarations page are the name and mailing address of the insured. If the address of the residence to be insured is not the same as the insured's mailing address, the address of the insured residence is also included.

The coverages under Section I and Section II are listed and a limit of liability is shown for each coverage. The amount of the premium also is included in this part of the declaration page.

The HO form under which coverage is provided is also indicated on the declarations page. Endorsements are listed by number, and any change resulting from an endorsement is shown in the same section of the declarations page.

Next, the deductible to be applied to property is listed. The standard deductible is $250. The amount of the deductible may be increased or decreased with a corresponding decrease or increase in premium. Homeowners deductibles are discussed in a later section.

If the insured owns another residence for which Section II coverage is to be provided, the location of that residence must be shown.


Example: If an insured owns a vacation home, the insured's HO policy covering the primary residence also can provide liability protection for the vacation home. The insured can then purchase separate insurance covering only the property loss exposures arising out of ownership of the vacation home.

Finally, if the insured premises are mortgaged, the mortgagee's name and address must be listed on the declarations page. This gives the mortgagee specific rights under the policy.

2. Insuring Agreement
The insuring agreement, which applies to all coverages, states the following:

We will provide the insurance described in this policy in return for the premium and compliance with all applicable provisions of this policy.

A contract requires consideration from both parties. The insurer's consideration is its obligation to provide the specified insurance coverage for the policy period. The insured's consideration has two parts: the obligation to pay the policy premium, and the obligation to comply with the policy conditions.

3. Definitions
When a contract is drawn up by one party and accepted by the other party, it is known as a contract of adhesion. Any ambiguities in a contract of adhesion are constructed against the party that drew the contract. Because the homeowners policy is a contract of adhesion, it is necessary to clearly define the terms used in the contract.

The terms "you" and "your" are defined in the HO-3 as referring to the "named insured" as shown in the declarations, and the spouse if a resident in the same household. The terms "we,""us" and "our" refer to the insurer providing the coverage.

The term "resident premise" is also defined. It means the one family dwelling, other structures and grounds, or that part of any other building in which the insured resides.. "Residence premises" also means a two, three or four-family dwelling where the insured resides in at least one of the family units and which is shown as the "residence premises" in the declarations. Most of the other terms defined at the beginning of the HO policy refer to Section II - Liability and are discussed later.

4. Section I - Property Loss Exposures
For our purposes, property is any item with value. Different kinds of property have different qualities that affect the owner's exposure to loss.

Property can be classified in a number of different ways. One common approach is to distinguish between real property (land and attachments to the land, such as buildings) and personal property (all property that is not real property). Insurance people use categories that relate to the Insurance treatment of property.

Dwelling
Buildings include more than bricks, mortar, and other building materials. Most also include plumbing, wiring, heating and air conditioning equipment that can lead to leaks, electrical fire, and explosions. Most buildings contain some basic equipment: fire extinguisher, snow shovels, lawn mowers, outdoor furniture used to service the building and surrounding land. Property permanently attached to the structure, such as carpets, shelving, built-in appliances, or paneling is considered part of a building. 

The exterior shell of a building, the outside walls and the roof, is exposed to damage from natural forces (such as hail) and from human forces (such as vandalism). Other events, such as a plumbing leak, may damage a building's interior primarily. Fire is a severe threat to both the exterior and interior of a building.

 

 

Personal Property
A dwelling's contents may include furniture, televisions, stereo equipment, appliances, kitchenware, groceries, clothing, sports equipment, tools, gardening equipment, and many other items usual to the occupancy of a home. All of these items are referred to as the personal property, or simply contents. These items are grouped together for several reasons. First, they are normally located in the dwelling, and they are exposed to essentially the same perils as the dwelling. Second, many of these items usually can be determined easily in the event or a loss.

High-Value Property
Some items of personal property, many of which otherwise would be classified as dwelling contents, are worth considerable sums of money. This type of property can be insured separately. Such items might include coins, money, securities, silverware, precious metals, jewelry, gems, watches, furs, and firearms. High Value items can use up a significant amount of coverage in the personal property section of the policy. One of the benefits of insuring separately is saving the primary limit of coverage for regular household items.

Property with Intrinsic Value
Property with intrinsic value is property whose value comes from its essential nature of unique characteristics. It needs to be separately identified in the analysis of personal property loss exposures. An antique chair is an example of this type of property. Such items would need to be separately insured because property insurance contracts typically settle personal property losses on the basis of the cost to repair, the time to repair, or its replacement cost less depreciation. Property with intrinsic value to the owner may not be replaceable at any cost, and its value needs to be established at the time that insurance coverage is purchased. In addition to antiques, other items with high intrinsic value might include works of art, stamp collections, valuable papers and records, photographs and negatives, and computer software and media on which data are stored.

Business Personal Property
This is personal property owned by an individual's business or employer. Most personal property insurance contracts are written to provide only limited coverage for business property. An individual who keeps business personal property at home may be financially responsible in the event of a loss to that property. Depending on the type of property insurance the individual carries and the value of the business personal property kept at home, additional insurance may be required to cover this exposure.

Motor Vehicles, Watercraft and Other Mobile Property
Personal insurance covering dwellings and their contents typically excludes or provides only very limited coverage for mobile property. Physical damage to motor vehicles used on public roadways, as well as aircraft, usually is excluded from coverage. Limited coverage may apply to watercraft and trailers. If a family owns any of these kinds of mobile property, it should be identified as such so that separate insurance may be purchased.

5. Section II - Liability Loss Exposures
A standard homeowners policy includes liability coverages for Personal Liability and Medical Payments To Others in Section II of the policy.Liability loss exposures put all of an individual's financial resources at risk of loss when a court orders an individual to pay.

The fact that all of an individual's assets, plus his/her future income may be required to pay for liability damages makes the possibility of a liability loss a particularly threatening exposure.

By combining coverage for liability losses as well as property losses, homeowners policies provide individuals with a comprehensive package of coverage for the most common and devastating risks they face.

6. Causes of Loss
Many insurance policies contain either a list of covered perils or a list of excluded perils. If a policy lists individual perils it is known as a Named Peril policy. If a policy just lists excluded perils it is known as an Open Peril policy.

Covered Perils
Fire
Fire is one of the most serious of perils; however, not every fire is a cause of loss. A gas fire on a kitchen range, an oil fire in a home furnace, and a wood fire in a fireplace cause no loss unless they get out of control.

Sometimes the term friendly fire is used to refer to fires that remain in their intended place. Fires that leave their intended place are called hostile fires. If a book were accidentally dropped into a fireplace, causing sparks to fly from the fireplace setting the house on fire, a hostile fire would have occurred, and the damage would be covered by fire insurance.

Extinguishing a fire also may cause damage as firefighters knock holes in windows and roofs, and spray water on property to keep it from burning. Heat, smoke, and water spraying could be considered separate perils. When these conditions occur because of a fire, the fire is the proximate cause of the entire sequence of damaging conditions or events. The proximate cause of a loss is the event that sets in motion an unintended chain of events contributing to the loss.

Sometimes fire takes place following another peril. Lightning may crack the walls of the house and set it on fire. An explosion may knock down a wall and start a fire. An earthquake may crack the foundations of a building and break gas lines, leading to a fire.

It is standard practice that policies covering the peril of fire also state that they cover the peril of lightning. The peril of explosion is almost always included in the same policy. Although many property insurance policies do not cover damage directly caused by an earthquake or flood, they do cover damage by a fire that might "ensue."

Damage caused by fire includes damage resulting from those conditions accompanying the fire (such as flame, heat, and smoke) and those events that can be linked back to the fire in an unbroken chain of causation (such as explosion or collapse), resulting from the fire or damage by firefighting units or devices. It does not matter that the fire itself was caused by some other peril such as an earthquake.

If an insured had insurance covering the peril of fire but not the peril of earthquake, damage from fire would be covered even if the fire resulted directly from the earthquake. Through the eyes of the insurance policy, fire caused a portion of the loss. That policy would not cover the portion of the loss caused by earthquake damage. A logical question is how to draw the portion of the loss confined solely to earthquake damage and the portion caused by fire because the insurer will pay only for the latter. The answer will be quite difficult, but the problem is not one unusual to the property insurance field. For now, the key point is the general concept of proximate cause rather than the practical loss adjustment dilemma.

Windstorm
Like fire, windstorms can cause serious damage to buildings and their contents, as well as to other property. Windstorms include hurricanes and tornadoes, but the definition is not confined to those notorious disturbances. Less severe winds also can produce damage.

Water damage due to flood, storm surge, waves, or spray may accompany a windstorm. Many insurance policies cover windstorm but not water damage. When a loss occurs, it is not always easy to determine which damage is done by wind and which by water.

Hail
Hail consists of ice particles created by freezing atmospheric conditions. Hailstones the size of marbles, golf balls or baseballs can cause substantial damage to autos, buildings, and other property in the open. Aluminum siding is susceptible to dimpling caused by hail.

 

Aircraft
Aircraft damage occurs when an airplane or satellite, or part of such an object, strikes property on the ground. Although such incidents are rare, the damage can be severe. Property near a flight path is more likely to incur aircraft damage than property at other locations.

Vehicle Damage
Vehicle damage refers to damage by a motor vehicle to some other kind of property, such as a building. When a car runs into a house, the house suffers vehicle damage, and the car suffers collision.

Riot and Civil Commotion
Although there may be legal distinctions between riot and civil commotion, both terms refer to approximately the same kind of unruly mob behavior. Insurance covering riot invariably covers civil commotion. Although losses from these perils do not occur very often, they can be quite large.

Explosion
An explosion is a violent expansion or bursting accompanied by noise. Explosions include combustion explosions resulting from the igniting of gases, dust or other explosive materials. Combustion explosions are often followed by fire. Explosions also may occur when a pressurized object bursts, as in the case of the bursting of a tank containing compressed air. An explosion can destroy an entire building. Explosion of boilers and other pressurized objects can unleash "unguided" missiles with enough force to match the damage done by the dropping of a small bomb.

Smoke
Normal cooking in a home sometimes produces smoke. Sudden or accidental release of large amounts of smoke can result in considerable damage to walls and other objects.

Some property is susceptible to smoke damage. When damaging smoke comes from a fire, the fire is generally considered to be the proximate cause of the loss. However, the sudden malfunction of a home's oil-burning furnace may result in the discharge of clouds of grimy, sooty smoke. This are referred to as “puff backs” and can cause significant smoke damage. In that case, the resulting damage is not caused by fire. An independent peril from the fire has occurred. Fortunately, property insurance policies naming the peril of fire almost always name smoke as a covered peril as well. Smoke damage that is caused by industrial or agricultural operations is not covered.

Vandalism
Vandalism is the willful and malicious damage or destruction of property. Examples of vandalism include crafty spray-painting onto building walls, defacement of statues or other objects of art, and the multiple incidents of mischief that usually occur on Halloween. Some insurance policies refer to vandalism and malicious mischief. Others simply use the term "vandalism."

The peril of vandalism can present a problem if a home becomes vacant, no people or personal property, as insurance policies will limit the amount of time a home can be vacant. For example, if a home is vacant for more than 60 days many policies will exclude vandalism as a covered peril.

Volcanic Action
Volcanic action is a peril that covers the result of lava flow and ash discharge due to an eruption. This peril does not include earth movement, tremors or earthquakes that are part of the eruption.

Broad Form Perils
Many basic property insurance policies cover damage caused by the specific perils discussed above. Other property insurance policies, often referred to as broad form policies, add coverage against an additional group of perils. These other perils include

Breakage of Glass - Glass may break as a result of causes other than the perils named earlier;
Falling Objects - Tree or other objects falling into a building; and
Water Damage - Damage to carpets, floors, or ceilings caused by sudden leaks.
Crime Perils
Theft — A general term meaning any act of stealing. It encompasses actual loss of property and damage due to attempted theft of property. Theft is not covered if done by the insured, occurs in a dwelling under construction, to certain types of property (watercraft, trailers, campers) while of the residence premises and if a student has not occupied a dorm room within 60 days of the theft.

Uninsurable Perils
Discussions to this point have concentrated on perils that can be covered by insurance policies. Numerous other perils also can cause loss to property. Some of these are classified as maintenance perils:

Wear and tear;
Marring and scratching;
Rust;
Gradual seepage of water; and
Damage by termites, pets, or vermin.
These perils may not be covered even in the broadest property insurance policies. Insurance works well for definite and accidental losses. Some of these excluded perils (rust, wear and tear, marring and scratching) involve the results of ordinary use and aging rather than unexpected damage. Others (water seepage, termites or pet damages) are preventable through property care and maintenance.

HO Forms
1. HO-3 Special Form
The most widely used HO policy is the HO-00-03 Special Form, and it is the basis for much of the following discussion. Two other widely used homeowners forms, HO-00-04 Contents Broad Form (for apartment renters) and HO-00-06 Unit Owners Form (for condominium owners), are discussed later in the course.

The HO-3 policy includes the following 5 types of property coverage:

Coverage A - Dwelling;
Coverage B - Other Structures;
Coverage C - Personal Property;
Coverage D - Loss of Use; and
Additional Coverages - The description of each type of coverage includes definitions and exclusions intended to clarify the intent of the coverage.
Coverage A and Coverage B
Coverages A and B - Coverage for the insured's real property, the dwelling and other structures (such as a detached garage), is provided under coverages A and B.

Coverage A - Coverage A applies to the dwelling and attached structures on the residence premises. In addition, coverage is provided for building materials and supplies located on or next to the residence premises for use in construction alteration, or repair of either the dwelling or other structures on the residence premises. Coverage A does not apply to land, including the land on which the dwelling is located.

Coverage B applies to other structures on the residence premises that are detached from the dwelling. The policy clarifies the distinction between attached and detached structures by stating that a structure connected to the dwelling only by a fence or utility line is considered to be detached. Once again, land is specifically excluded. Other structures used in whole or in part of business are excluded. Other structures rented to someone other than a tenant of the dwelling are also excluded unless such a structure is used solely as a private garage.

The homeowners policy uses the phrase limit of liability to identify the amount of insurance applicable to each of the coverages. The phrases "amount of insurance,""amount of coverage," and "coverage amount" are used in insurance practice and in this course as synonyms for limit of liability.

When a HO-3 is purchased, the insured chooses the Coverage A limit of liability based on the value of the covered dwelling. The Coverage B limit of liability is automatically set at 10% of the amount of insurance for Coverage A unless the insured purchases a higher amount of insurance. An insured whose residence premises contains a large detached garage, workshop, barn, guest house or several smaller detached structures may need to increase the Coverage B limit of liability beyond the amount automatically provided.

Although the covered perils are the same for Coverages A and B, the determination for which coverage applies to a garage or a shed is important. A policy with a $100,000 Coverage A limit of liability would automatically provide $10,000 of additional insurance for a detached garage or shed. If the same structure were attached to the insured's dwelling, it would be included in the $100,000 Coverage A limit of liability.

Exclusions
The HO-3 insures against risks of direct loss to property described in Coverages A and B. The loss is further determined by the peril involved. In the HO-3 policy, for Coverages A and B, there is not list of perils. Instead, coverage applies, unless an exclusion exists in the Exclusion section of the policy.

Exclusions - Some of the exclusions that limit the property coverages in Section I apply only to Coverages A and B. Other exclusions apply to all of the Section I coverages.

Exclusions Applying Only to Coverages A and B - The exclusions are the key to analyzing the peril insured against under Coverage A and B because direct physical loss to property is covered unless specifically excluded. The following exclusions apply only to Coverage A and B.

Collapse
Losses involving collapse is specifically excluded unless the cause of the collapse is described under the Additional Coverages Provision.

Freezing
When the dwelling is occupied, vacant, unoccupied, or under construction, the insured must maintain heat in the building or shut off the water supply and drain the system and appliances of water. Otherwise, freezing of a plumbing, heating, air conditioning, automatic fire protective system, or household appliance is not covered. Damage caused by discharge, leakage, or overflow from within such a system or appliance is excluded unless the preceding precautions have been taken.

Vandalism and Malicious Mischief
There is no coverage for vandalism and malicious mischief if the dwelling has been vacant for more than 30 consecutive days immediately before the loss. A dwelling being constructed is not considered vacant. There is a distinction between "vacant" and "unoccupied." A vacant dwelling is empty and unfurnished. An unoccupied dwelling is furnished, but the residents are not on the premises. Therefore, if an insured from Vermont spends January and February in Florida, the Vermont dwelling is unoccupied but not vacant while the insured is in Florida.

Dwelling Under Construction
Theft in or to a dwelling under construction is excluded. The theft exposure is much greater during construction than it is after construction is completed and the property is occupied.

Foundations, Retaining Walls, and Non-Building Structures
Loss by freezing, thawing, pressure, or weight of water or ice to fences, swimming pools, foundations, retaining walls, piers, wharfs, or docks also is excluded. This exclusion applies whether or not the water or ice was driven by wind; therefore, there is no coverage even if a loss to any of these structures was the result of a windstorm.

More Exclusions
Coverages A and B insure property against risks of direct physical loss that are not specifically excluded. Policies that provide such broad coverage generally contain an exclusion that lists specific causes of loss that are not insured. Thus, coverages A and B also do not insure losses caused by any of the following:

Wear and tear, marring, deterioration;
Inherent vice, latent defect, mechanical breakdown;
Smog, rust or other corrosion, mold, wet or dry pot;
Smoke from agricultural smudging or industrial operations;
Discharge, dispersal, seepage, migration, release or escape of pollutants (unless caused by a peril covered under Coverage C);
Settling, shrinking, bulging or expansion, including resultant cracking of pavements, patios, foundations, walls, floors, roofs or ceilings;
Birds, vermin, rodents or insects; or
Animals owned, or kept by, an insured.
There is coverage if any of the listed perils cause water damage (not otherwise excluded) from a plumbing, heating, air conditioning or automatic fire protective sprinkler system or household appliance. This includes the cost of tearing out and replacing any part of a building in order to repair the system or appliance. There is NO coverage for loss to the system or appliance from which the water escaped.

Concurrent Causation
Sometimes there is more than one peril involved in a loss. As such, each peril may be called a concurrent cause of the loss, and insurance problems can arise if one of the perils is covered and another is excluded.

The HO-3 and many other insurance policies that provide coverage for risks of direct physical loss contain provisions intended to resolve problems arising from losses including concurrent causation. Thus, the HO-3 does not insure for loss to property described in Coverages A and B if the loss is caused by any of the following:

Weather Conditions – This exclusion applies only to conditions that contribute to a loss that would otherwise be excluded. Example: Damage caused by windstorm would not be affected by this exclusion.
Acts or Decisions of Others – This exclusion denies coverage when loss results from acts or decisions, including the failure to act or decide, of any person, group, organization or government body.
Faulty, Inadequate, or Defective Plans or Actions – This exclusion eliminates coverage for any loss resulting from improper planning, zoning, development, surveying, settling, design, specifications, workmanship, repair, construction, renovations, remodeling, grading, soil compacting, materials, or maintenance of any property on or off the residence premises. However, these exclusions do not apply to any ensuing loss to property if such loss is not excluded or excepted by some other policy provision.
Section I General Exclusions
The HO-3 contains 8 general exclusions that apply to all of the coverage in Section I. Those exclusions include the following:

Ordinance of Law - Loss caused by enforcement of any ordinance or law regulating the construction, repair, demolition of a building or other structure is covered unless specifically provided under the policy.

Example: An old dwelling not meeting the current building code is damaged. Because of the provisions of a building ordinance, repairs would have to include extensive modifications to the dwelling's wiring, plumbing and foundation. The additional cost of these modifications is not covered because of the Ordinance or Law Exclusion.

Earth Movement - There is no coverage for property damage from earthquake (including land shock waves associated with a volcanic eruption), landslide, mine subsidence, mud flow, earth sinking, rising, or shifting. However, if direct loss by fire, explosion, breakage of covered glass or safety glazing material, insurance coverage is provided for the ensuing loss. The earth movement exclusion does not apply to loss by theft, such as looting following an earthquake.

Water Damage - The water damage exclusion is often referred to as the flood exclusion, but in fact, it also excludes other types of water damage to which dwellings and their contents are exposed. Water damage from the following is excluded:

Flood, surface water, waves, tidal water, overflow of a body of water, spray from any of these whether or not driven by wind;
Water that backs up through sewers or drains or that overflows from a pump; or
Water below the surface of the ground, including water that exerts pressure on, or seeps or leaks through a building, sidewalk, driveway, foundation, swimming pool, or other structure. However, direct loss by fire, explosion or theft resulting from water damages is covered. Example: If the dwelling is flooded and the insured is evacuated, the flood damage would not be covered, but furnishings stolen from the dwelling by looters would be covered.
 Power Failure - Loss caused by the failure of power or other service utility is excluded if the failure occurs off the residence premises. Therefore, if a hurricane knocked out the power from the local electric company and a freezer full of meat spoiled, there would be no coverage for the loss of the meat. If the power failure is caused by an insured peril on the residence premises, any resulting loss is covered. If lightning strikes the dwelling causing a power interruption, the consequent freezer food spoilage would be covered.

Neglect - If the insured neglects to use all reasonable means to save and preserve property at and after the time of loss, there is no coverage for any damage that results from the insured's neglect. This exclusion encourages the insured to take reasonable steps to protect endangered property. The requirement that property must also be protected following the loss encourages the insured to exercise the same degree of care for the insured property as he/she would if the property were not covered by insurance.

War - This exclusion applies to war, as well as, to any of the following types of actions and any consequences of these actions:

Undeclared war, civil war, insurrection, rebellion, or revolution;
Warlike acts by military force or military personnel; and
Destruction, seizure or use for a military purpose.
Discharge of a nuclear weapon is considered a warlike act even if such discharge is accidental. The War Exclusion takes away some of the worldwide coverage for personal property ordinarily provided under Coverage C. Therefore, the loss would not be covered if the insured's luggage and its contents were damaged when rebellion breaks out in the foreign country the insured is visiting.

Nuclear Hazard - Losses caused directly or indirectly by nuclear hazard are excluded but direct loss by fire resulting from the nuclear hazard is covered. This exclusion is unusual in that the actual Nuclear Hazard Exclusion is part of tile Section I - Conditions discussed later in this section.

Intentional Loss - There is no coverage for any loss arising out of any act committed by or at the direction of an insured with the intent to cause a loss. Not only must the act be intentional, but the loss also must be intended. This exclusion eliminates coverage for all insured when an intentional loss is committed by or at the direction of any insured. Example: There is no coverage available to the innocent spouse of an arsonist who burned down the family home.

2. Homeowners for Tenants: HO-4 Contents Broad Form
Insurance for tenants represents an important market. The number of apartment dwellers is already large and increasing for a number of reasons. The high price of single-family homes has forced many younger people to postpone home ownership and to continue renting apartments. There are also older people who move to apartments from large single-family homes, as well as workers who rent apartments in urban areas to avoid commuting. The HO-4 Policy is a combination of personal property and liability coverages designed for apartment renters and other tenants.

Types of Losses
The three major types of loss exposures faced by tenants are loss to additions, loss to personal property and legal liability. Liability will be discussed in more detail in a later unit, but we'll touch on it here as it relates to tenants.

Additions and Alteration - Property exposures for tenants include additions and alterations the tenants may have made in the dwelling itself. These additions and alterations may include new paneling or electrical fixtures that become part of the building and, as such, are real property. Such additions and alterations are sometimes referred to as "tenant's improvements and betterment."

Personal Property - Personal property owned by the tenant represents the most significant property exposure. Personal property includes such items as furniture, bedding, clothing, televisions, videocassette recorders, stereos, and record tape collections. Such items often are referred to as contents.

Loss of Use - Similar to the HO3, if an apartment dweller was forced to leave their residence due to a covered cause of loss, this coverage would afford additional living expenses above and beyond their normal costs. For example, if a fire in an apartment complex made Jim’s unit uninhabitable this coverage would afford protection for a hotel stay until he could find some other living arrangement.

Legal Liability - Tenants have a premises liability exposure for people who enter their home. For example, a guest may be injured after tripping over a loose carpet in an apartment, and may seek damages on the basis of negligence liability. Apartment dwellers also have a liability exposure for injuries to other tenants and damage to the property of other tenants or the owner of the apartment building.

Example: If an apartment dweller allows a bathtub to overflow, the water may damage the contents of the apartment below and the apartment building itself, resulting in liability actions against the forgetful tenant. Finally, tenants face legal liability exposure that arises out of their off-premises activities, such as golf or hunting.

HO-4 Eligibility
Eligibility - A tenant of either a single-family residence or an apartment is eligible for the HO-4. There is no limit on the number of units in the apartment building, although the number of units affects the rate.

The owner-occupant of a dwelling, cooperative unit or apartment building that is not otherwise eligible for one of the Other Homeowner Policies may also purchase the HO-4.

Example: A person might own a five-unit apartment building, reside in one of the units and rent the other four. Such occupancy would not be eligible for a HO-3 for his or her unit. Commercial coverage would be purchased to provide coverage for the property and liability exposures represented by the apartment building itself.

HO-4 Endorsements
Most of the endorsements described in a later chapter can be used with the HO-4. However, the two endorsements discussed below apply specifically to the loss exposures of tenants.

Building Additions and Iterations (HO-4-51) - As an additional coverage within the policy, the HO-4 insures building additions and alternations that a tenant has installed. The limit of liability is 10% of the Coverage C limit, but a person who has made substantial alterations to a rented unit is likely to require a higher limit. The HO-4-51 Endorsement increases the limit of liability beyond the 10% included in the form for the insured's building additions and alterations for an additional premium. To avoid ambiguity, the endorsement shows both the increase in the limit of liability and the total limit of liability.

Insurance for Condominium Unit Owners - Many homeowners do not reside in one- or two-family dwellings. A special form of homeowners insurance is available for owners of condominium units and cooperative apartments.

Condominiums and Cooperative Apartments - Condominium ownership has two distinguishing characteristics. First, each unit owner has individual ownership and the right to exclusive occupancy of his or her unit. The unit is commonly defined as the space between the walls, ceiling, and floor. This is called the bare walls definition of exclusive ownership. Sometimes the unit owner is also responsible for parts of the unit beyond the bare walls, such as exterior glass or a lean-to porch. The unit owner's responsibilities are usually outlined in the condominium agreement and bylaws. As defined in the condominium agreement, the unit is an area of space. The unit owner may occupy, sell, lease, or will that space.

Second, each unit owner also has an undivided interest with the other members of the condominium association in the common areas of the property. Common areas include the land, stairways, halls, parking, and storage areas, and the heating and cooling systems. Usually, the condominium complex is managed by an association of unit owners.

The owner of a cooperative apartment does not own the individual unit, as is the case with a condominium. Instead, the owner has an ownership interest in the cooperative association or corporation that owns all of the units. As a consequence of that ownership, the cooperative apartment owner has a right to a perpetual lease to occupy a specific unit.

Particularly in urban areas, both condominiums and cooperative apartments have become increasingly popular. Both young couples and older people prefer ownership of such units because of their convenient urban locations and because the owners do not have to perform their own maintenance.

The policy often used in these living situations is the HO-6 Form. It is a hybrid form. It has elements of a renters policy merged together with elements of a traditional homeowners policy.

HO-3 and HO-4 Compared
Because the HO-4 provides insurance for tenants, the policy does not include coverage for the dwelling and other structures provided by Coverages A and B of the HO-3. Such coverage is not needed in the HO-4 because the tenant does not have an insurable interest in the building.

The limit of liability for Coverage C - Personal Property in the HO-4 is the primary limit for property coverage. In the HO-3, the limit of liability for Coverage A determines the limits for the other coverages. There is no other difference in Coverage C between the two policies.

Under the HO-4, the limit of liability for Coverage D - Loss of Use is 20% of the Coverage C limit, and coverage applies if a peril insured under Coverage C makes the residence uninhabitable. Under the HO-3, the limit of liability for Coverage D is 20% of the limit for Coverage A and applies to loss of use resulting from a peril covered by Coverage A. In all other respects, Coverage D is the same under both policies. There are three differences in the additional coverages provided by the two policies. First, the limit in the HO-4 for trees, shrubs, and other plants is 10% of the Coverage C limit. The limit for such property in the HO-3 is 5% of the Coverage A limit.

Second, both policies will pay up to $1,000 for the insured's share of a loss assessment. The HO-4 pays for loss assessment that results from a peril insured against under Coverage C, and the HO-3 pays if the loss assessment results from an insured peril under Coverage A. (Neither policy pays if the loss assessment results from earthquake or volcanic eruption.) Because Coverage A of the HO-3 insures against risks of direct losses that are not otherwise excluded, the coverage for loss assessment under the HO- 3 is broader than that provided by the HO-4.

Third, the HO-4 covers building additions and alterations. Coverage is provided for building improvements or installations made or acquired at the insured's expense to that part of the residence premises used exclusively by the named insured. This coverage represents additional insurance and has a limit of liability equal to 10% of the Coverage C limit. There is no corresponding coverage in the HO-3, but the coverage for landlord's furnishings in the HO-3 is not provided by the HO-4.

Because the HO-4 does not cover the dwelling and other structures, the perils insured against exclusions and conditions are different in the two policies. The insured perils in the HO-4 apply only to Coverage C, but they are the same perils insured under Coverage C of the HO-3. The corresponding section in the HO-3 also lists the perils that are excluded with regard to Coverages A and B. The HO-4 does not contain the concurrent causation exclusions that are in the HO-3.

3. HO-6 Condominium Unit Owners Form
Loss Exposures
The three major loss exposures for condominium unit owners are loss to real property, loss to personal property, loss of use of the property, and legal liability. Liability will be discussed in more detail in a later unit, but we’ll touch on it here in regard to condominium ownership as we did in the discussion of HO-4.

Real Property - Real property exposures for the unit owner include alterations, appliances, fixtures, and improvements that are part of the residence premises. The residence premises consists of that part of the area occupied exclusively by the unit owner. This would include any patio, yard, or parking area adjacent to the unit portion of the building occupied exclusively by the unit owner. The real property exposure also includes the common areas of the property. This exposure is usually insured in a separate policy, by the condominium or cooperative association.
Personal Property - The personal property exposures of the unit owner are similar to those of a tenant. The unit owner's personal property can include furniture, clothing, television, stereo equipment, books, records, compact discs and tapes. Any appliances not considered part of the building structure would constitute personal property. Carpets and rugs that are placed over finished floors could be considered personal property; wall-to-wall carpeting installed over a rough sub-floor or concrete slab is considered part of the building.
Loss of Use - Similar to the HO-3 and HO-4, if a condominium unit owner was forced to leave their residence due to a covered cause of loss, this coverage would afford additional living expenses above and beyond their normal costs.
Legal Liability - The legal liability exposure for the unit owner include all of those previously discussed for tenants. The unit owner's interest in the common areas carries with it a corresponding legal liability exposure for events that occur in/on those areas. This common areas liability exposure usually is covered in a separate policy obtained by the condominium association or the cooperative apartment ownership association or corporation. A loss assessment can be collected from all unit owners to pay the damages.
The HO-6 is designed to meet the unique insurance requirements of owners of condominium units and cooperative apartments. The property coverage provided is for the insured's dwelling, as well as for personal property and loss of use.

An owner-occupant of a residential condominium unit or a cooperative apartment is eligible for an HO-6 regardless of the number of units in the complex. Because the residence premises are defined as the unit where the insured resides, the unendorsed HO-6 cannot be used to insure a unit owned by the insured but rented or leased to others.

HO-6 Endorsements
Just as certain endorsements relate specifically to the exposures of tenants insured by the HO-4, there are endorsements to the HO-6 that further tailor the policy to meet the needs of unit owners. Five of these endorsements are discussed.

Unit Owners Coverage A - Special Coverages (HO-17-32) - This endorsement can be used to change Coverage A of the HO-6 to provide coverage for risks of direct loss. When this endorsement is used, the perils insured under Coverage A of the HO-6 become identical to the insured by the HO-3 and are subject to exclusion only.

The HO-17-32 endorsement also adds the concurrent causation exclusions that are otherwise omitted under the HO-6. This reflects the fact that concurrent causation is a problem only when policies provide coverage for risks of direct loss on an exclusion basis.

Unit Owners Rental to Others HO-17-33 - This endorsement provides property and liability coverage for the unit owner while the resident premises is regularly rented or held for rental to others. Theft coverage is provided for personal property in a rented condominium, but high-value items such as money, securities, jewelry, watches, and furs are excluded. The HO-17-33 Endorsement also provides liability and medical payments coverage on behalf of the unit owner for occurrences at or from the resident premises when rented or held for rental to others.

Loss Assessment Coverage HO-O4-35 - For an additional premium, the HO-O4-35 endorsement increases the limit of liability for the additional coverages for loss assessment provided in Section I and Section II. For an additional premium, the insured's share of coverage loss assessment at additional locations can be covered. These additional locations must be listed on the face of the endorsement. Coverage for an assessment that results from a deductible in the insurance purchases by a corporation or association of property owners is limited to $1,000.

A review of the unit owner's deed, the condominium declarations (also known as the master deed) and the condominium association bylaws will define the common areas. It is for damage to and the use of these areas that the unit owner will be assessed in the event of a covered loss. By determining the current coverage carried by the association, the value of these areas, the possibility of damage to more than one of these areas in one loss, and the number of unit owners who will be assessed, the individual unit owner can determine whether his/her exposure is greater than the $1,000 provided by the unendorsed HO-6. If the exposure is greater than $1,000, the HO-4-35 endorsement should be considered.

Loss Assessment Coverage for Earthquake (HO-O4-36) - This endorsement provides coverage for a loss assessment made against the unit owner by a corporation or association of property owners due to the peril of earthquake. Loss assessments charged against the unit owner of a corporation or association of property owners by any governmental body are not covered. Flood and tidal waves are also excluded.

This coverage is subject to a percentage deductible based upon the limit of liability for the unit; the percentage is stated in the endorsement. The deductible amount will not be less than $250 in any one assessment.

Unit-Owners Coverage C - Special Coverage (HO-17-31) - This endorsement changes the HO-6 to provide for risks of direct loss to property insured under Coverage C, from broad form perils to special form or open perils. The typical exclusions that apply to this type of coverage are listed in the endorsement (the exclusions are similar to those for Coverage A of the HO-3). Coverage is provided under the HO-17-31 endorsement with the understanding that the insured occupies the unit in which the covered property is located.

HO-6 and HO-3 Compared
The primary difference between HO-6 and HO-3 forms is the coverage provided for the insured's dwelling.

Coverage A -Dwelling - Coverage A of the HO-6 applies to the insured's real property. This coverage is provided on a named-perils basis and is separated into four categories. The first category includes the alteration, appliances, fixtures, and improvements that are part of the building contained within the residence premises. This usually includes built-in appliances and cabinets, electrical fixtures, interior partitions.

The second category relates to items of real property that pertain exclusively to the residence premises, including such items as exterior glass or trees and shrubs located in a patio that is part of the residence premises. In addition, although it is in excess of the association's coverage, the coverage provided would apply to any part of the owner's portion of the building itself in the event that the association's limits proved to be inadequate.

The third category includes property that is the responsibility of the unit owner under an agreement of a corporation or association of property owners. Insurance for this category of property provides coverage for any portion of the common areas of the building for which the association agreement has made the unit owner responsible for the insurance.

The fourth category of property relates to structures owned solely by the insured at the location of the residence premises but not a part of the residence premises. An example would be a private garage that was not adjacent to the residence premises but located elsewhere in the condominium complex.

All additional difference between Coverage A of the HO-6 and the corresponding coverage in the HO-3 is that the HO-6 provides no coverage for building materials and supplies.

Coverage A of the HO-6 does not cover structures used in whole or in part for business, or structures rented to others unless used solely as a private garage. A similar exclusion is found under Coverage B of the HO-3. This illustrates the fact that Coverage A of the HO-6 combines Coverages A and B of the HO-3.

The basic limit of liability under Coverage A of the HO-6 is $1,000. This can be increased if necessary. If the association policy is written on a bare walls basis, the Coverage A of the HO-6 would have to provide coverage for the entire interior or the unit, including all fixtures, built-in appliances and, in a multi-story unit, the floors, stairs and ceilings between the lowest floor and the highest ceiling in the unit. This is why it is important to review the condominium or cooperative association's coverage to determine whether the basic limit for Coverage A of the HO-6 is adequate.

Coverage C - Personal Property - Coverage C provides the same coverage as the corresponding section of the HO-3. The difference is that the usual amount of Coverage C of the HO-3 is based upon the limit of liability for Coverage A. In the HO-6, the insured selects the limit of liability for the Coverage C.

Coverage D - Loss of Use - The limit of liability for Coverage D in the HO-6 is 40% of the Coverage C limit. Coverage is provided for a loss caused by an insured peril to the covered property or to the building containing the property that makes the residence premises not fit to live in.

Additional Coverages - Additional coverages in HO-6 differ from the HO-3 in two ways:

In the HO-6, the coverage for trees, shrubs, and other plants is 10% of the limit of liability for Coverage C.
In the HO-3, the corresponding limit of liability is 5% of the Coverage A limit. In addition, the HO-6 does not include the coverage for landlord's furnishings provided by the HO-3.
Perils Insured Against - The covered perils in the HO-6 are virtually identical to the perils insured against under Coverage C of the HO-3. Thus, the HO-6 covers loss to the insured's dwelling only if the loss is caused by the specified perils. Under HO-3, the insured's dwelling is covered for risks of direct loss that are not otherwise excluded.

Exclusions - Because the HO-6 is written on a named- peril basis, the Section I-Exclusions does not contain the current causation exclusions of the HO-3. In all other respects, the Section I-Exclusions of the two policies is virtually identical.

Conditions - The only difference between the HO-3 and HO-6 with respect to the Section I- Conditions is found in the loss settlement paragraphs. In the HO-6, real property (building items and land) under Coverage A is covered at the actual cost to repair or replace, if the damage is repaired or replaced within a reasonable time. In the HO-3, replacement cost coverage is provided for buildings insured under Coverages A and B, subject to an 80% insurance-to-value requirement.

HO Policies: Coverage C, D and Other Coverages
1. Coverage C - Personal Property
Coverage C provides insurance for personal property of the insured. Special limits apply to some types of property, and some property is excluded from coverage.

Covered Property
Coverage C provides worldwide coverage for personal property owned or used by an insured. At the insured's request, coverage is extended to personal property owned by others while the property is on the part of the residence premises occupied by an insured. The requirement that the property be on the part of the residence premises occupied by an insured is designed to eliminate coverage from the personal property of a tenant.

At the request of the insured, personal property owned by a guest or a residence employee is covered while the property is in any residence occupied by an insured.

If personal property is scheduled (described and listed separately) on another policy or endorsement such as the scheduled personal property endorsement, such scheduled property is not covered under Coverage C. For this reason, the subject matter of Coverage C is at times called unscheduled personal property. The overall limit of liability for Coverage C is 50% of the Coverage A figure. A limitation of 10% of the Coverage C amount exists for personal property usually located at a secondary residence. There is a minimum of $1,000 coverage for such property.

For example, assume that John and Marsha Marshall, residents of Miami, have a HO-3 with a Coverage A limit of $200, 000. The limit of liability under Coverage C would be $100,000 (50% x $200,000). The Marshalls also own a summer cabin home in North Carolina. The HO-3 with their Miami house would provide $10,000 (10% x $100,000) coverage for personal property usually located at the secondary residence in North Carolina. Furniture, appliances and household items left year-round in North Carolina would be subject to the $100,000 limitation. If the Marshalls regularly carried their television, videocassette recorder and clothing back and forth from Miami to North Carolina, these items would not fall under the $10,000 limitation.

Covered Perils
Insurance is provided under Coverage C for direct physical loss to personal property from the following sixteen perils.

Fire or Lightning - The fire insurance provided by a HO policy is one of the most important coverages for the typical homeowner. The homeowners policy, following the practice in property insurance forms that preceded it, does not define the term fire. Insurers rely instead on the definition of fire that has grown out of court cases relating to insurance coverage. The courts have generally held that fire means combustion or oxidation rapid enough to cause a flame or glow. In addition, the courts have held that insurance coverage applies only to "hostile fires," fires that are not within their intended confines. A fire that remains within its intended confines, such as a fireplace, charcoal grill, or stovetop is termed a "friendly" fire.

No coverage is provided for damage caused by friendly fires.

For example: No coverage is provided for scorching of the finish on a chair that was set too close to a fireplace, unless the chair itself caught fire. Likewise, there would be no coverage for fire damage to a pair of eyeglasses that melted after being accidentally dropped into a charcoal grill.

Lightning, although not specifically defined in the HO policy, is generally considered to be a discharge of atmospheric electricity.

Windstorm or Hail - The windstorm peril includes damage from violent winds, such as hurricanes and tornadoes. The coverage for loss due to windstorm or hail excludes loss to property located within a building caused by rain, snow, sleet, sand, or dust unless the direct force of the wind or hail created an opening in the roof or wall through which these elements could enter. Windblown rain entering through an open window or around the crevices of a poorly fitted one is not covered. Wind or hail damage to a boat and its equipment is covered only if the boat is located inside a fully enclosed building.

Explosion - Explosion is not defined in the policy. A loss to the contents of a dwelling caused by an explosion off the property, such as an industrial explosion or blasting work, would be covered. Other covered explosions include water damage, bursting pipes, and sonic booms.

Riot or Civil Commotion - The term riot is defined by state laws. One state defines riot as public activity involving 3 or more persons with a common purpose who carry out that purpose with a show of force. A civil commotion is generally considered to be a large or prolonged riot. Damage to personal property resulting from a riot or civil commotion is covered.

Aircraft - Damage from aircraft, including self-propelled missiles and spacecraft is covered.

Vehicles - HO policies provide coverage for damage to the insured's property by a vehicle, even a vehicle owned by an insured.

For example: If a motorist lost control of a vehicle and crashed into the insured's patio furniture, the loss of the furniture would be covered under all forms of the HO policy. In addition, if the insured's son ran over a lawn mower while putting the family car into the garage, the loss to the lawn mower would be covered.

Smoke - Sudden and accidental damage from smoke is covered.

For example: Damage to carpets, drapes, and furniture caused by smoke suddenly discharged from a faulty fireplace or heater is covered. Coverage is not provided for damage to personal property caused by smoke from agricultural smudging or industrial operations.

Vandalism or Malicious Mischief - These perils are not defined in the policy, but coverage is provided for willful or malicious damage to property caused by one or several persons without the violence associated with a riot.

Theft - The theft peril includes attempted theft and loss of property from a known place when it is likely that the property has been stolen.

For example: An insured checks in at an airline gate 1 hour before the flight departs, places some carry-on luggage in the passenger waiting area and leaves to buy a cup of coffee from a nearby vending machine. Upon returning to the waiting area, the insured finds that the carry-on luggage has disappeared. If the airline personnel at the gate have no knowledge of what happened to the luggage, the most likely presumption is that it was stolen. This type of loss would be covered, and the actual cash value of the luggage and its contents, in excess of the policy deductible, would be paid to the insured.

Falling Objects - Damage caused by a falling object to personal property contained within a building is covered only if the roof or an outside wall of the building is first damaged by that falling object.

For example: It would be possible for a tree to fall against the exterior wall of a masonry home with sufficient force to knock a mirror off an interior wall and onto the floor without actually damaging the exterior wall. In such a case, the damage to the mirror would not be covered. If the exterior wall were damaged, loss to the mirror would be covered subject to the policy deductible.

Weight of Ice, Snow or Sleet - Coverage is provided for personal property within a home damaged by the weight of ice, snow, or sleet. Therefore, if the weight of snow collapsed the roof of the home, the resulting damage to the contents of the home would be covered.

Accidental Discharge or Overflow of Water or Steam - This policy covers loss resulting from accidental discharge or overflow of water or steam from within a plumbing, heating, air conditioner, and automatic fire protective sprinkler system or from a household appliance.

For example: If an automatic dishwasher malfunctions and floods the kitchen, water damage to the kitchen furniture would be covered. Coverage is not provided for the damage to the system or appliance from which the water or steam escaped. Any loss or damage from freezing is covered under the terms of the freezing peril.

Sudden and accidental tearing apart, cracking, burning, or bulging of a steam, hot water, air conditioning, automatic fire protective sprinkler system, or appliance for heating water - Coverage for this peril includes damage to the objects or systems and the ensuing damage to personal property, such as might occur when a water heater suddenly explodes.

Freezing of plumbing, heating, air conditioning, automatic fire protective sprinkler system, or of a household appliance is covered as long as the heat is maintained or the water is turned off and drained from the plumbing system.

Sudden and accidental damage from artificially generated electrical current - Most damage of this type is caused by power surges due to sudden increases of the current in an electrical system. Damage to a tube, transistor or similar electronic equipment is excluded. If a power surge caused an electric clothes dryer to burn out, the loss would be covered.

Volcanic Eruption - Loss caused by a volcanic eruption is covered except for loss caused by earthquake, land shock waves or tremors. Property damage caused by volcanic explosion, volcanic ash, lava flow, or airborne shock waves would be covered.

Property Subject to Special Limits of Liability
Special limits of liability in HO policies are as follows:

$200 for money, bank notes, bullion, gold, silver (excluding goldware and silverware), platinum, coins, and other metals;
$1,500 for securities, accounts, deeds, evidences of debt, letters of credit, notes other than bank notes, manuscripts, passports, tickets, and stamps;
$1,500 for watercraft and their trailers, furnishings, equipment, and outboard motors;
$1,500 for other trailers;
$1,500 for theft of jewelry, watches, furs, precious, and semiprecious stones;
$2,500 for theft of firearms;
$2,500 for theft of silverware and silver-plated ware, goldware and gold-plated ware, and pewterware, including flatware, hollowware, tea sets, trays, and trophies;
$2,500 for property on the premises used for business purposes;
$1,500 for property away from the premises used for business purposes;
$1,500 for loss of portable electronic equipment that produces, receives, or transmits audio, visual, or data signals while in a motor vehicle; and
$250 for loss of antennas, wires, or any media used with the electronic equipment in a motor vehicle.
Exclusions
There are nine categories of property not covered under Coverage C of the HO-3.

There is no coverage for articles separately described and specifically insured in this or other insurance. Coverage C provides unscheduled or, blanket coverage. Example: If a particular item, a diamond ring, is scheduled on a Personal Articles Floater Endorsement, then it is excluded from blanket coverage under Coverage C. This applies if the scheduled coverage is provided by an endorsement to the HO policy or if it is provided under a separate policy. This eliminates duplicate coverage and possible disputes about which coverage should be primary in the event of a loss.
Animals, birds, or fish are excluded from coverage. Household pets are difficult to value and even more difficult to insure. They are subject to loss from a variety of causes including theft, illness, and simply becoming lost. Property policies have traditionally excluded household pets from coverage.
There is no coverage for motor vehicles, all other motorized land conveyances and their equipment and accessories. Also excluded is electronic apparatus that can be operated solely by power from the electrical system of a motor vehicle land conveyance. However, the exclusion applies to equipment, accessories, and electronic apparatus only while such property is in or upon the vehicle or conveyance. Coverage C does provide coverage for vehicles or conveyances not subject to motor vehicle registration and that are used to service an insured's residence or designed for assisting the handicapped.
Aircraft and parts are also excluded. An aircraft is defined as any conveyance used or designed for flight; except model or hobby aircraft not used or designed to carry people or cargo.
Property of roomers, boarders, and other tenants (except property of roomers and boarders related to an insured) is excluded. Any non-related tenant should have his/her own insurance. This exclusion is consistent with the description of property of others that the policy would cover at the insured's option.
There is no coverage for property in an apartment that is regularly rented or held for rental to others by an insured. This refers to property such as furniture owned by the insured and used to furnish a rental apartment. This exclusion does not apply to the landlord's furnishings, which are subject to an additional coverage discussed later.
Property rented or held for rental to others off the residence premises is also excluded. This section makes it clear that property related to an insured's rental operations is excluded whether on or off the residence premises.
There is no coverage for business data, such as that stored in bonds of account, drawings, paper records, electronic data processing tapes, wires, records, disks, or other software media. Coverage is provided for the cost of blank recording or storage media and of prerecorded computer programs available on the retail market. Business records, including computer floppy disks, could be covered under valuable papers and record policy or electronic data processing policy if they are to be insured at all. The HO-3 is not intended to provide coverage for a business exposure of this nature.
Credit cards and fund transfer cards are excluded except as provided in the additional coverages section described later.
2. Coverage D – Loss of Use
In the event of a loss under Coverage A, such as fire damage to the dwelling, the insured may lose the use of the dwelling because it is uninhabitable while repairs are being made. The act of civil authority, such as the evacuation ordered because of a nearby fire, also may cause the insured to temporarily lose the use of the dwelling. Coverage D - Loss of Use provides compensation to the insured in the event of such loss of use.

Compensation for loss of use allows two options of coverage that will depend on the insured’s situation.

The first option of coverage is the insured's additional living expenses, which is the insured's necessary increase in living expense required to remain in the household's normal standard of living.

For example: If a family were forced to move out of its home for 2 weeks, additional living expenses would typically include the costs of motels, restaurant meals, and laundry service, less the cost of normally prepared meals at home and any reduction in utility bills during the period of repairs.

The second option applies only if the insured rents a portion of their home. This option is called fair rental value, which is the amount of rent that would have been collected or could have been charged for the premises, less any expenses that do not continue while the premises are not fit for habitation.

Loss of Use Resulting from Coverage A Losses
Payment for this loss is made for the shortest time required for repairing or replacing the damage to the dwelling. If the insured chooses to permanently relocate rather than move back into the dwelling, payment is made for the shortest time required to relocate. This basis on which the insured is compensated depends on the use of the premises at the time.

Loss of Use Resulting from Action of a Civil Authority
To be covered, loss of use must result when a civil authority prohibits the insured from using the residence premises because of a peril insured against under the policy causes damage to a neighboring property. Loss payment is made for no more than 2 weeks on the basis of additional living expense or fair rental value, whichever applies to the insured’s situation.

3. Additional Coverages
The following additional coverages are included in the HO-3 to provide protection, subject to certain limitations, in the event of specific perils and types of losses:

Debris removal;
Reasonable repairs;
Trees, shrubs and other plants;
Fire department service charge;
Property removed;
Credit card, fund transfer card, forgery, and counterfeit money;
Loss assessment;
Collapse;
Glass or safety glazing material; and
Landlord furnishings.
Debris Removal - Coverage is provided for the reasonable expense incurred for removal of debris of covered property if the loss was caused by a covered peril – for example, the cost of removing debris from a house after a fire.

The cost of debris removal is included in the limit of liability that applies to the damaged property. In the event that the loss for actual damage to the property plus debris removal exceeds the policy limit, an additional 5% of the coverage limit of liability is available for debris removal expense.

The insurer will pay up to $1,000 to remove fallen trees that damage a covered structure on the residence premises. Payment will be made for the following:

The insured's tree(s) felled by windstorm or hail;
The insured's trees felled by weight of ice, snow or sleet; or
A neighbor's tree(s) felled by a peril that is, covered under Coverage C.
The total amount of coverage included for tree removal is $1,000 with a sublimit of $500 for the removal of any one tree.

Reasonable Repairs - Coverage is provided for the reasonable cost incurred by the insured following a loss from a peril insured against, a necessary measure to protect covered property from further damage.

For example: If part of the roof of the insured's house is blown off during a tornado, coverage for reasonable repairs would pay for the purchase of plywood, tarps, and other material to protect household goods from rain and weather damage until permanent repairs could be made.

Trees, Shrubs, and Other Plants - Coverage is provided for trees, shrubs, plants, or lawns on the residence premises for loss caused by fire, lightning, explosion, riot or civil commotion, aircraft, vehicles not owned or operated by a resident of the resident premises, vandalism, malicious mischief and theft.

The limit for this coverage is 5% of the Coverage A limit of liability, but not more than $500 of this limit will be paid from any one tree, shrub or plant.

Fire Department Service Charge - Up to $500 of coverage is provided for fire department service charges incurred when the fire department is called to save or protect covered property from an insured peril. Coverage is not provided if the property is located within the limits of the city, municipality, or protection district furnishing the fire department response.

Property Removed - Covered property is insured against direct loss from any cause while being removed from a premises endangered by an insured peril. This coverage extends for no more than 30 days while the property is removed.

Credit Card, Fund Transfer Cards, Forgery, and Counterfeit Money - Up to $500 of coverage is provided for the following:

The legal obligation of an insured to pay because of the theft or unauthorized use of credit cards issued to or registered in an insured's name;
Loss resulting from theft or unauthorized use of a fund transfer card used for deposit, withdrawal or transfer of funds issued to or registered in an insured's name;
Loss to an insured caused by forgery or alteration of any check or negotiable instrument.
Coverage is not provided for use of a credit card or fund transfer card by a resident of the insured's household or by a person entrusted with either type of card. Coverage is similarly not provided if the insured has not complied with all the terms and conditions under which the cards are issued.

When the limit of liability is being determined, all losses resulting from a series of acts committed by any one person is considered to be one loss. This coverage is additional insurance. No deductible applies to this coverage.

Loss Assessment - Up to $1,000 of coverage is provided for loss assessment by a corporation or association of property owners charged against the insured as owner or tenant of the residence premises. This coverage is provided only when the assessment is made as a result of direct loss to the property owned collectively by all members and the loss is caused by a peril insured under Coverage A.

For example: Suppose four families with adjoining lakeside properties decide to construct a pier for docking their boats. To do this, they form an association to build and maintain the pier. Sometime later, the pier is struck by lightning and burns to the water line. Repairs to the pier cost $6,000, and each property owner is assessed 25% of the cost ($1,500) to repair the pier. For any property owner who had insured his or her lakeside property under the NO-3, the insured's NO-3 policy would provide $1,000 toward this loss.

Collapse - Coverage is provided for direct physical loss to covered property involving collapse of a building or part of a building caused only by one of the following:

Perils insured against in Coverage C;
Hidden decay;
Hidden insect or vermin damage;
Weight of contents, equipment, animals, or people;
Weight of rain that collects on a roof; or
Collapse during construction, remodeling or renovation due to the use of defective materials or methods.
Loss to non-building structures, underground pipes and structures, retaining walls and piers, wharfs and docks is not covered under items 2 through 6 above, unless the loss is a direct result of the collapse of a building. Collapse does not include settling, cracking, shrinking, bulging, or expansion.

This coverage does not increase the limit of liability that applies to the damaged-covered property.

Glass or Safety Glazing Material - Coverage is provided for breakage of glass or safety glazing material that is part of a covered building, storm door, or storm window; and for damage to covered property that is caused by such glass or safety glazing material. However, there is no coverage for loss on the residence premises if the dwelling has been vacant for more than 30 consecutive days immediately before the loss occurs.

Coverage for glass and safety glazing materials does not increase the applicable limit of liability.

Landlord's Furnishings - Up to $2,500 will be paid for loss of appliances, carpeting, and other household furnishings in apartments on the residence premises that the insured regularly rents or holds for rental to others. Coverage applies to losses caused by the perils insured against in Coverage C except that there is no coverage for theft. The $2,500 limit is the most that will be paid regardless of the number of items of landlord's furnishings involved in a loss.

Conditions - The conditions applicable to Section I of the HO-3 policy primarily deal with the rights and duties of the insured and the insurer following a property loss. With few exceptions, the conditions apply to all of the Section I -Property Coverages. The Section I Property Coverages also are subject to the Section I and II conditions, discussed in the next section. These conditions deal with matters such as the policy period, cancellation non-renewal, assignment, subrogation, and other matters that apply to both the property and liability coverage in the policy. The Section I conditions are examined in the balance of this section.

This condition states that the basic insurance principal for any insured's loss recovery is limited to the extent of that insured's insurable interest.

4. Duties After Loss
If there is a loss to covered property, the insured must make certain that the following duties are performed:

Prompt Notice - Prompt notice must be given to the insurer or its agent. The police must be notified of a theft loss. The issuer of a credit card or fund transfer card must be notified of loss, theft, or unauthorized use of one of these cards. This helps prevent fraudulent losses and limits the amount of loss.
Protect the Property - The insured must protect the property from further damage, make reasonable and necessary repairs to protect the property, and keep an accurate record of repair expenses. Payment for these expenses comes from additional coverage for reasonable repairs.
Prepare an Inventory - The insured must prepare an inventory of damaged personal property showing the quality, description, actual cash value, and amount of loss. The insured should be able to justify the figures in the inventory with bills, receipts, and related documents.
Show the Damaged Property - As often as the insurer reasonably requires, the insured must show the damaged property and provide records and documents. The insured must submit to questions, under oath, while not in the presence of any other insured, again, as often as the insurer reasonably requires.
File a Proof of Loss - Within 60 days of the insurer's request, the insured must submit a signed, sworn proof of loss. This must include, to the best of the insured's knowledge and belief, the time and cause of loss; the interest of the insured and all others in the property, including all liens on the property, other insurance covering the loss, and other relevant information. This helps the company to determine insurable interest, to investigate the loss, and to coordinate payment with any other insurance.

HO Policies: Section II - Liability Coverage
Section II of homeowners policies covers bodily injury and property damage for which the insured is legally liable. Coverage is also provided for medical expenses incurred because of bodily injury to others.

1. Coverage E - Personal Liability
Coverage E - Personal Liability - Coverage E provides liability coverage if a claim is made or suit is brought against an insured because of bodily injury or property damage caused by a covered occurrence. Coverage E provides a basic limit of liability of $100,000 for damages, which may be increased for an additional premium. Damages include pre-judgment interest awarded against the insured. Costs of investigating claims and defending against lawsuits are not included in the liability limits but are paid in addition to any payments made for damages.

The coverage statement for Coverage E incorporates many of the terms set forth in the policy's definitions section. The term “bodily injury” means bodily harm, sickness, or disease, including required care, loss of services and death that may result. The term “property damage” is defined as physical injury to, destruction of, or loss of use of tangible property.

This coverage is on an "occurrence basis." Occurrence means an accident, including continuous or repeated exposure to substantially the same general harmful conditions, which results in bodily injury or property damage during the policy period.

Coverage E provides liability protection for the named insured and members of the named insured's household who are relatives. Other persons under the age of 21 who are in the care of a household member are also covered. With respect to animals or watercraft to which the policy applies, coverage is extended to any persons or organizations legally responsible for animals or watercraft that are owned by a household member. With respect to any vehicle to which the policy applies, coverage is provided for any person employed by the named insured or a family member and other persons using the vehicle on a covered location with the insured's consent.

An important part of Coverage E is premises liability coverage. The policy defines an insured location to include not only the residence premises but also other premises used by an insured as a residence, permanently or temporarily. The definition of an insured location also includes vacant land owned by the insured, cemetery plots, and any part of a premises occasionally rented to an insured for other than business purposes. For example: A neighbor's child ran into a closed sliding glass door at the insured's home and was injured. Other occurrences that might result in a premises liability claim could include a neighbor's child drowning in the insured's swimming pool or a passerby being bitten by the insured's "friendly" dog.

In addition to the premises liability coverage, Coverage E provides liability protection for off-premises, non-business activities of the insured anywhere in the world. Off-premises occurrences include sport and hobby accidents. For example: While playing baseball with friends, the insured may injure another player by throwing the bat in the excitement of getting a hit.

Coverage E also provides defense for liability suits even if the suit is groundless, false, or fraudulent. The duty to defend on the part of the insurance company is broader than the duty to indemnify. Therefore, if there is doubt about coverage, the insurer often will defend the case but reserve its rights to withdraw from the defense if it determines that the occurrence is not covered.

The insurer may investigate and settle any claim or suit that it decides is appropriate without the permission of the insured. The insurer's duty to defend ends when the amount paid for damages resulting from the occurrence equals the limit of liability.

If the homeowner's assets are much greater than the liability limits of his or her homeowner's policy, it would be prudent to purchase an additional umbrella policy that will extend the liability coverage to $1 million or more. It starts paying after the regular policy has reached its limit. Umbrella policies also extend the liability coverage to the personal auto policy.

Umbrella policies provide broader coverage than typical homeowners policies. In addition to bodily injury and property damage, they cover false arrest, wrongful eviction, libel, slander, defamation of character, and invasion of privacy. A homeowners policy requires an endorsement called personal injury, to get similar coverage. Such policies usually cost about $150 to $200 a year for $1 million in coverage.

2. Coverage F - Medical Payments
Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others - Coverage F will pay the necessary medical expenses that are incurred or medical expenses ascertained within3 years from the date of the accident causing bodily injury. Coverage applies to accidents that occur on the insured premises or as the result of an action by the insured at any location. The basic limit under Coverage F is $1,000 per person, but the insured may select a higher limit. By prompt payment of physicians and hospital bills for an accident, for which the insured might be responsible, troublesome litigation often can be avoided.

Coverage F is not intended to provide accident insurance for the named insured's family. Therefore, any insured under the policy is excluded from coverage.

3. Exclusions to Coverages E and F
The liability coverage in Section II provides broad protection for the insured; however, the exclusions in Section II limit or eliminate coverage for specified types of occurrences. Some of the exclusions apply to both Coverage E and F; others apply only to Coverage E or Coverage F. The following exclusions are applicable to Coverages E and F:

Expected or intended injury or damage;
Insured's business;
Premises rented or held for rental;
Professional services;
Non-insured locations;
Motor vehicles;
Watercraft;
War;
Aircraft;
Communicable disease;
Abuse or sexual molestation;
Controlled substances; and
Home day-care (excluded by endorsement in most states).
These exclusions are described in the following paragraph. The exclusions relating to the non-insured location, motor vehicles, watercrafts, and aircraft do not apply to bodily injury to a residence employee if the injury arises out of or in the course of employment by an insured.

Expected or Intended Injury or Damage - Bodily injury or property damage that is expected or intended by the insured is excluded. For example: An insured breaking a window in a neighbor's house following an argument.

Insured's Business - Bodily injury or property damage arising out of or in connection with a business engaged in by an insured is excluded. The homeowners policy is intended to provide only personal liability coverage. Business activities must be covered under an appropriate lines policy.

Premises Rented or Held for Rental - There is no coverage for liability arising out of the rental or holding for rental of any part of any premises by an insured. However, this exclusion does not apply to rental of an insured location:

On an occasional basis if used only as a residence;
In part for use only as a residence unless more than two roomers or boarders are lodged in a single family unit; or
In part as an office, school, studio or private garage.
Professional Services - Liability arising out of the rendering of, or failure to render, professional services is excluded. Professional services would include, for example, the services of an insurance agent, physician, nurse, engineer, or architect.

Non-Insured Locations - An insured location is defined in the definition section as noted above. The policy excludes coverage for liability arising out of any premises owned, rented, or rented to others by an insured that is not an insured location as defined in the policy. Premises, other than the residence, that the insured uses as a residence must be shown in the declarations or acquired during the policy period in order to be considered an insured location. It is important for the insured to list all owned and rented locations in the policy declarations.

Motor Vehicles - With a few exceptions, homeowners polices exclude coverage for liability arising out of an insured's use of a motor vehicle or motorized land conveyance, including trailers Notice that the exclusions are broader than motor vehicles and apply to any motorized land conveyance.

With regard to the vehicle described above, homeowners polices provide no coverage for liability arising out of their ownership, maintenance, use, loading or unloading, or entrustment to another person. Also excluded is vicarious liability, whether or not statutorily imposed for the actions of a child or minor, with regard to such a vehicle. This exclusion applies to any vehicle an insured owns, operates, borrows, or rents. Liability resulting out of the use or ownership of motor vehicles and motorized land conveyance is covered under the following circumstances:

A trailer while it is not being towed by or carried on a motorized land conveyance;
A motorized land conveyance designed for recreational use off public roads, not subject to motor vehicle registration, which is not owned by an insured. For example: An unregistered snowmobile rented by an insured. Liability arising out of the use of a similar vehicle owned by an insured is covered only while on an insured location;
A motorized golf cart when used to play golf on a golf course;
A vehicle or conveyance not subject to motor vehicle registration that is used to service an insured's residence, designed for assisting the handicapped or in dead storage on an insured location. An example of a covered vehicle for each category would be a garden tractor, a motorized wheelchair, and an unlicensed antique car in dead storage.
This limited coverage applies to the named insured, resident relatives and employees of the insured on the insured's premises and off the insured’s premises in limited circumstances. Coverage for others using one of the above vehicles with the insured's permission applies only on the insured's premises.

Watercraft - The policy excludes certain defined watercraft. The exclusion applies to the ownership, maintenance use, loading or unloading of this watercraft. Similarly the entrustment by an insured of such a watercraft to any person is excluded. The exclusions extend to vicarious liability, whether or not imposed by statute, for the actions of a child or minor using such watercraft. The watercraft exclusions do not apply while the watercraft is stored.

Excluded watercrafts are boats that are designed to be propelled principally by engine power, electric motor, or sailing vessels that are owned by or rented to an insured. Therefore, the following types of watercraft are among those excluded:

Inboard or inboard-outboard powerboats owned by an insured;
Boats with inboard or inboard-outboard motor power of more than 50 horsepower that are rented to an insured;
Boats powered by one or more outboard engines or motors of more than 25 total horsepower, provided the engines or motors are owned by an insured; and
Sailing vessels with or without auxiliary power that are 26 feet or more in length and are owned, by or rented to an insured.
 Aircraft - The ownership, maintenance, use, loading, and unloading of an aircraft is excluded. As with moving vehicles and watercraft, the aircraft exclusion extends to the entrustment of an aircraft by an insured to any person or vicarious liability, whether or not imposed by statute, for the action of a child or minor using an aircraft. Hobby aircraft not used or designed to carry people or cargo are afforded coverage.

War - Homeowners polices exclude bodily injury, property damage caused directly or indirectly or as a consequence of war. The definitions of war include civil war, insurrection, rebellion, revolution, warlike acts by a military force or military personnel, destruction or seizure, use for a military purpose, or discharge of a nuclear weapon. These are deemed to be warlike acts, even if they are accidental and are excluded.

Communicable Disease - Bodily injury or property damage that arises out of the transmission of a communicable disease by an insured is excluded. This exclusion responds to a series of court decisions that found coverage in the homeowners policy for the insured's liability for damages as the result of infecting another person with the herpes virus. Such coverage was never contemplated by homeowners actuaries when setting the rates for the policy, and this exclusion makes that intent clear.

Abuse or Sexual Molestation - Liability or bodily injury or property damage arising out of sexual molestation is excluded. Also excluded is liability resulting from corporal punishment and physical or mental abuse.

Controlled Substances - Homeowners policies also exclude liability for bodily injury or property damage arising out of the use, sale, manufacture, delivery, transfer, or possession of a controlled substance. This includes, but is not limited to, cocaine, marijuana, LSD, and all other narcotic drugs. This exclusion does not apply to the legitimate use of prescription drugs by a person following the orders of a licensed physician.

Home Day Care - Coverage for a home day care business is limited under Section I and excluded under Section II. To emphasize that there is no coverage for liability arising out of a home day care business, most states require insurers to add the HO-O4-86 Endorsement to homeowners polices. This endorsement does not constitute a reduction of coverage, but it represents a clarification of certain exclusions pertaining to a home day care business. The endorsement states that if an insured regularly provides home day care services to a person or persons other than the insured and receives monetary or other compensation for such services, that enterprise is a business. However, the rendering of home day care services by an insured to a relative of an insured is not considered a business.

The endorsement points out that because home day care conducted for compensation is a business, there is no liability coverage whatsoever because of the business exclusion discussed above. Further, the HO-O4-96 endorsement highlights the Section I exclusion pertaining to other structures under Coverage B, where the other structures are used in whole or in part for business. The endorsement also states the Section I limits on business property on the residence premises, and off the residence premises that apply to the home day care business.

 

The exclusions to Coverage E - Personal Liability restrict or eliminate coverage provided for bodily injury or property damage. These exclusions apply to the following:

Loss assessment (unless provided in additional coverage, see below);
Property owned by the insured;
Property in the care, custody or control of the insured;
Bodily injury covered by compensating law;
Nuclear liability; and
Bodily injury to an insured.
The exclusions applicable to Coverage E are described in the following paragraphs:

Loss Assessment - If a condominium association were found liable, coverage would have to be found on the association's own policy and not the homeowners policies of the individual members. An association of owners of single-family dwellings could be exposed to a similar liability situation with respect to their individual homeowners policies. Reimbursement of certain loss assessments is provided as an additional coverage.

Property Owned by the Insured - Property owned by the insured is excluded from property damage liability coverage under Coverage E. Coverage for damage to the insured's property is provided under Section I.

Care, Custody, or Control - The care, custody, or control exclusion is found in virtually all liability policies. Damage to property rented to, occupied or used by, or in the care of the insured is excluded. This exclusion does not apply to property damage caused by fire, smoke, or explosion. Therefore, liability coverage is provided for a tenant insured by a HO-4 who is found to be responsible for a fire that destroys the apartment building.

Bodily Injury Covered By Workers Compensation - The policy excludes bodily injury to any person eligible to receive any benefits either voluntarily provided or required to be provided by the insured under a workers compensation law. The exclusion applies to benefits payable under workers compensation, non-occupational disability, or occupational disease laws.

Nuclear Liability - Bodily injury or property, for which an insured is covered under the homeowners policy, is also an exclusion under a nuclear energy liability policy. This exclusion also applies in the case where the insured would have been an insured under a nuclear energy liability policy issued by American Nuclear Insurers, Mutual Atomic Energy Liability Underwriters, and the Nuclear Insurance Association of Canada.

Bodily Injury to an Insured - There is no liability coverage for claims arising from bodily injury to an insured resident of the household. This exclusion applies to the named insured, related residents of the same household, and other persons in their care who are under the age of 21. 

Coverage for medical payments to others is restricted or eliminated by the following exclusions that apply only to Coverage F:

Residence employee off-premises;
Bodily injury covered by a workers compensation law;
Nuclear reaction, radiation or contamination; and
Other regular residents.
Residence Employee Off-Premises - Medical payment coverage is not provided in the case of bodily injury that is suffered by a residence employee while off the insured location unless the injury arises out of, or in the course of, employment by an insured. This emphasizes the fact that certain exclusions to Coverages E and F (discussed earlier) do not apply to residence employees who suffer bodily injury arising out of and in the course of employment for the insured.

The phrase "for the insured" is important. A part-time gardener who works once a week for the insured might be injured in the course of ordinary employment while working at someone else's house. Coverage would not be provided under the insured's policy because the injury, while arising out of the course of employment, did not arise out of employment for the insured. If the injury occurred while the gardener was purchasing seed for the insured at a hardware store, then coverage would apply.

Bodily Injury Covered By Workers Compensation Law - This exclusion is broader than the corresponding exclusion applicable to Coverage E, which refers to benefits voluntarily provided, or required to be provided by the insured. The Coverage F exclusion refers to benefits voluntarily provided, or required to be provided under any workers compensation, non-occupational disability, or occupational disease law. Thus, the Coverage F Exclusion applies to anyone coming under the coverage of such a law, regardless of who provides, or is required to provide, the coverage.

The Nuclear Exclusion - Medical payments coverage does not apply to bodily injury arising from any nuclear reaction, radiation, or radioactive contamination. This exclusion applies whether the reaction, radiation, or contamination was controlled or uncontrolled and however it was caused. Any consequences of such an occurrence are also excluded.

Other Regular Resident - Medical payments coverage is not provided for bodily injury to any person, other than a resident employee, regularly residing on any part of the insured location. This parallels the Coverage E Exclusion that applies to members of the insured's household.

Section II of the homeowners policy also provides four additional coverages related to an insured's liability exposures. Any amounts paid under these additional coverages are in addition to the limits of liability shown on the declarations page for Coverage E and F. Subject to certain limitations, coverage is provided for the following:

Claim expenses;
First aid expenses;
Damage to property of others; and
Loss assessment.
Claim Expenses - Defense costs are considered claim expenses and include those expenses incurred by the insurer and costs taxed against an insured in any case the insurer defends. These defense costs can be considerable and include the expenses of claim adjusters, defense attorneys, investigators, and expert witnesses. These claim expenses represent additional coverage beyond the limit of liability and do not count against it. Therefore, there is no upper limit to the amount of claim expenses that might be paid under the policy. Other claim expenses that are paid include the following:

Premiums on bonds required in a suit defended by the insurer but not for bond amounts that are more than the limit of liability for Coverage E.
Up to $250 per day for expenses incurred by an insured, at the insurer's request, while assisting in the investigation or defense of a claim or suit; the reasonable expenses include actual loss of earnings but not loss of other income.
Post-judgment interests prior to the time the insurer tenders or deposits in court that part of the judgment that does not exceed the applicable limit of liability.
First Aid Expenses - Coverage is provided to pay expenses for first aid to others incurred by an insured for bodily injury under the policy. This coverage does not extend to the named insured or any other insured. This additional coverage is separate from any medical payments made under Coverage F and has no limits stated in the policy.

Damage to Property of Others - Replacement cost coverage is provided at $1,000 per occurrence for property damage to the property of others caused by an insured. This coverage is excess insurance over any amount recoverable under Section I of the policy.

Property damage to property owned by an insured is excludable from this coverage. This additional coverage also does not pay for property damage:

Caused intentionally by an insured who is 13 years of age or older;
To property owned by, or rented to, a tenant of an insured or a household resident;
Arising out of a business engaged in by an insured;
Arising out of any act or omission in connection with a premises owned, rented or controlled by an insured other than an insured location; or
Arising out of the ownership, maintenance, use of aircraft, watercraft, motor vehicles, or other motorized land conveyances, a motorized land conveyance designed for off-road recreational use, not subject to motor vehicle registration and not owned by an insured, is exempt from this exclusion and, therefore, would be covered.

HO Policies: Conditions and Endorsements
1. Conditions
Common Conditions
Certain conditions in homeowners policies, referred to as common conditions, apply to both Section I and Section II. These common conditions outline the rights and responsibilities of the insured and the insurer. The common policy conditions are as follows:

Policy period;
Concealment or fraud;
Liberalization clause;
Waive or change of policy provisions;
Cancellation;
Nonrenewal;
Subrogation; and
Death of named insured.
Policy Period - Homeowners policies cover only losses that occur during the policy period. The Section II coverage is on an occurrence basis, meaning that the claim does not have to be filed during the policy period as long as the occurrence giving rise to the loss occurs during the policy period.

Concealment or Fraud - Coverage is not provided for an insured who has intentionally concealed any material fact or circumstances relevant to the insurance policy, either before or after a loss. Concealment or misrepresentation must be intentional and material in order for the insurer to void the policy. A fact of circumstances is considered to be material if it would affect the insurer's underwriting of the policy had the insurer been aware of it.

The policy also will be voided if any insured has made false statements or engaged in fraudulent conduct relating to the policy.

Liberalization Clause - If the insurance company adopts a revision that would broaden the coverage under the policy without additional premium, the broadened coverage will automatically apply to the policy on the date the revision is implemented in the insured's state. The implementation date must fall within 60 days prior to the inception of the policy or during the policy period. The liberalization clause does not apply to changes that are implemented because a subsequent edition of the policy has been introduced.

Waive or Change of Policy Provisions - A waiver or change of any policy provision must be in writing by the insurer in order to be valid. A request by the insurer for an appraisal or examination does not waive any of the insurer's rights.

For example: If an insurer requests to examine damaged property following loss, the insurer's request does not waive its right to deny coverage if its investigation determines that the cause of the loss is not a covered peril.

Cancellation - The insured may cancel a homeowners policy at any time by returning it to the insurer or by informing the insurer in writing of the date the cancellation is to take effect. The insurer may cancel the policy only under certain conditions. If a HO policy is canceled, the premium for the period from the date of cancellation to the expiration date is refunded on a pro-rata basis, regardless of who cancels.

The insurer may cancel the policy at any time for nonpayment of premium, provided the insured is generally given 10 days written notice. Also, during the first 60 days of the policy term, the insurer may cancel for any reason by providing a 10-day written notice.

If the policy has been in effect for 60 days or more, including subsequent renewals, then the insurer may cancel only under two circumstances: if there has been a material misrepresentation of fact, which, if known to the insurer, would have caused it not to issue the policy. The insurer also may cancel if there has been a substantial change in the risk since the policy was issued. After the policy has been in effect for 60 days or more, 30 days written notice of cancellation is required.

Pro rata vs. Short Rate

When a policy is cancelled upon its effective date, it is considered a flat cancellation, and there is generally no premium penalty.

When the insurance company cancels a policy mid-term, the insured will receive a pro rata refund. This is calculated by determining how many days coverage were paid minus how many days the policy was in force. The unused (or unearned) premium is returned to the insured in full.

For example, Keith has a homeowner's policy with Excel Insurers. His policy runs January 1-December 31, and he pays the $730 premium annually. Keith receives notice that Excel Insurers is cancelling his policy effective June 1. Because Keith's policy was in effect 183 days, he will receive a refund of $364.

365 days (year) - 183 days used = 182 days to refund.
$730 annual premium/ 365 days = $2/day cost of insurance.
182 days to refund x $2/day = $364 refunded to Keith.
Short rate cancellation is applied when the insured cancels the policy prior to its renewal date. Short rate allows for the insurance company to impose a penalty (generally 10%) on the refund of unearned premium.

For example, Keith has a homeowner's policy with Excel Insurers. His policy runs January 1-December 31 and he pays the $730 premium annually. Keith notifies Excel Insurers he is cancelling the policy effective June 1. Excel Insurers will refund Keith $327.60

365 days (year) - 183 days used = 182 days to refund.
$730 annual premium/ 365 days = $2/day cost of insurance.
182 days to refund x $2/day = $364 -10% penalty of $36.40 ($364 x .9) = $327.60 refunded to Keith.
Nonrenewal - The insurer may elect not to renew the policy for any reason. Nonrenewal requires 30 days' written notice. Proof of mailing is considered sufficient proof of notice for either cancellation or nonrenewal.

Assignment - Assignment of the policy to another person or persons is not valid without written consent of the insurer. This follows from the fact that an insurance policy is a personal contract between the insurer and the insured.

Subrogation - An insured may waive, in writing, before a loss, all rights of recovery against any person. Such waivers are often found in property leases. If the insured's right has not been waived in writing prior to a loss, the insurer may require an assignment of rights of recovery for a loss to the extent that payment is made by the insurer.

The policy requires the insurer to sign and deliver all related papers and to cooperate with the insurer if an assignment of subrogation rights is sought. Subrogation does not apply under Section II -Medical Payments to Others or to Damage to Property of Others.

Death of Named Insured - In the event of the death of the named insured or resident spouse, the legal representative of the deceased is insured, only with respect to the premises and property of the deceased covered under the policy at the time of death. The policy does not extend to the deceased's entire estate, which might include property not insured under that particular homeowners policy.

This condition includes a revised definition of "insured." In the event of the death of the named insured or spouse, the new definition of insured includes any member of the named insured's household at the time of the insured's death, but only while that household member is a resident of the residence premises. With respect to property of the named insured, in the event of the named insured's death, the definition of insured includes the person having proper temporary custody of the property until a qualified legal representative is appointed.

Section II Conditions
There are certain policy conditions that apply specifically to Section II – Liability. These conditions are listed and described below:

Limit of liability;
Severability of insurance;
Duties after loss;
Duties of an injured person under Coverage F;
Payment of claim under Coverage F;
Suit against the insurer;
Bankruptcy of an insured; and
Other insurance under Coverage E.
Limit of Liability - The limit of liability for Coverage E for all damages resulting from any one occurrence is the amount shown in the declarations regardless of the number of insureds claims made or persons injured.

For example: Damages payable is restricted to the policy limit for a single occurrence, regardless of the number of insureds under the policy who are held liable. Therefore, if a husband and wife insured under an HO policy are each found liable for $75,000 in damages resulting from a covered occurrence, and the Section II limit of liability is $100,000, the policy will pay only $100,000 of the combined $150,000 in damages. In both of the above examples, defense costs would be paid in addition to the limit of liability.

The limit under Coverage F for all medical expenses for bodily injury to one person, as the result of one accident, is shown in the declarations. The basic limit is $1,000; therefore, in the case of 2 injured golfers, each would be eligible for separate $1,000 limits under Coverage F, while the occurrence would be subject to a sing1e limit of $100,000 under Coverage E.

Severability of Insurance - Insurance in a HO policy applies separately to each insured. The concept of severability of insurance can be illustrated by a New Hampshire case in which the 17-year-old son of an insured allegedly assaulted another minor. The parents of the insured child sued both the son and his parents, alleging that the parents, through their neglect, allowed the assault to occur. The insurer denied coverage for both the son and his parents, relying on the exclusion regarding "bodily injury which is expected or intended by the insured." The court agreed that there would be no coverage for the son because coverage of intentional acts is excluded. However, the court found that there would be coverage for the parents because the suit alleging their negligence would not be affected by the exclusion that applied to their son. The policy required that the insurer respond to the suit against the parents, even though it does not respond on behalf of their son.

In some situations, both the named insured and another party for which the policy provides coverage may be sued for different actions or omissions that result in one occurrence.

For example: An insured loaned a canoe to a local scout troop. The policy would provide liability coverage on the canoe. If a scout was injured while using the canoe, the scout could make a claim against the named insured, alleging poor maintenance of the canoe and against the scout troop, alleging improper supervision of the use of the canoe. The insurer would respond on behalf of both the insured and the scout troop. However, the limits of liability would not be increased even though two separate insureds were involved.

Duties After Loss - In case of an accident or occurrence, the insured has certain duties. Not all of these duties will necessarily apply to a given occurrence. The insured's duties after a loss are as follows:

To give written notice to the insurer or its agent as soon as practical, setting forth the identity of the policy and name of the insured. The notice should also include reasonable available information on the time, place and circumstances of the accident or occurrence and the names and addresses of any claimants and witnesses;
To promptly forward to the insurance company every notice, demand, summons, or notice of suit. They frequently have a time limit during which an answer may be entered. Failure to answer will result in a default judgment. Therefore, the claimant might prevail with a groundless suit;
To assist the insurance company, at its request, to make settlement and to enforce any right of contribution of indemnity against any person or organization who might be liable to an insured. The insured also must assist with the conduct of suit by attending hearings and trials, by securing and giving evidence, and obtaining the attendance of witnesses. This section asks the insured to cooperate vigorously in the defense of any suit, just as the insured would if there were no insurance available;
When claims are made for damage to the property of others, the insured, at the insurer's request, must submit a sworn statement of loss within 60 days after the loss. If the damaged property is still in the insured's control, it must be shown to the insurer on request;
The insured must not voluntarily make payment, assume obligation, or incur expense other than for first aid to others at the time of bodily injury. Any other voluntary payment or assumption of liability on the part of the insured is at his/her own expense.
Duties of an Injured Person Under Coverage F - Under Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others, the injured person, or someone acting for that person, must send the insurer a written proof of claim as soon as is practical. The insurer may require the proof of claim to be written under oath. The injured person must also authorize the insurer to obtain copies of medical reports and records. The final duty for the injured person is to submit to a physical exam by a doctor selected by the insurer when and as often as is reasonable.

Payments of Claim Under Coverage F - When a claim is paid under Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others, such payment does not constitute an admission of liability by an insured or the insurer. Medical payments claims are often paid in situations where the insured feels a moral obligation to a guest or other person on his/her premises although no legal liability exists. This provision points out that payment under Coverage F does not mean that the claimant can automatically collect under Coverage E.

Suit Against Insurer - The first provision of this condition states that no legal action can be brought against the insurer unless there has been compliance with the policy provisions.

The second provision states that no one has the right to add the insurer as a party to any action against an insured. This means that a claimant, or a co-defendant involved in a lawsuit against the insurer, cannot name the insurer as a party to that lawsuit.

A jury might be swayed by its decision regarding the award of damages by knowing that an insurance company, rather than the individual defendant, was responsible for payment.

A third provision states that no action with respect to Coverage E can be brought against the insurer until the obligation of the insured has been determined by a final judgment or an agreement signed by the insurer. An action may be brought at that time to compel the insurer to pay.

Bankruptcy of an Insured - Bankruptcy or insolvency of an insured does not relieve the insurer of its obligations under the policy. Recall that Section II - Liability Coverage is designed to pay damages for which the insured is legally liable. An insured that is bankrupt is not likely to be able to pay damages for which he/she may be liable. As a matter of social policy, liability insurers have assumed the obligation of paying covered liability damages on behalf of the insured, even though, in the absence of insurance, the insured could not pay the damages because of personal bankruptcy.

Other Insurance - Coverage E - Coverage E - Personal Liability is excess over any other valid and collectible primary insurance. This provision does not apply with respect to insurance specifically written as excess over the limits of liability provided by the HO policy.

For example: Assume that an insured carries the basic $100,000 Coverage E limit. An excess policy is purchased by the insured for $1,000,000. Excess of loss of $100,000 would be recognized as specifically written excess insurance.

2. Use of Endorsements
A variety of endorsements can be used to modify homeowners policies.

Need for Endorsements — A homeowners policy may be endorsed to meet the needs of insureds, the underwriting requirements of insurers, or state insurance regulations.

Insured's Needs — Endorsements may be used to customize the standard coverage under a particular HO form according to the needs of the insured.

Property and liability loss exposure vary considerably from one household to another, and therefore, so do their insurance requirements. Endorsements provide flexibility in meeting these individual needs.

Insurer's Underwriting Requirements — Homeowners policies provide a very broad range of coverages to the insured. An insurer may not be willing to extend this breadth of coverage, for insurance, on a dwelling located in an area where homes regularly suffer windstorm damage. An endorsement excluding windstorm damage may be required by an insurer as a condition to providing coverage on a dwelling located in such an area.

State Regulation Requirement — The laws of the various states often required that certain homeowners policy provisions be amended. A series of HO endorsements have been developed by ISO to reflect the various modifications required by individual states. These "special provisions" endorsements typically modify standard HO policy provisions in ways that are advantageous to insureds.

Affected policy provisions often include one or more of the following areas: cancellation and nonrenewal, definitions such as actual cash value and intentional loss, suit against the insurer, duties of the insured, loss payment and valuation of property.

3. Effects on Coverage
When homeowners policy endorsements are used, they affect the coverage provided by the basic policy and the premium charged for coverage.

Coverage
Endorsements can be used to change many aspects of coverage under homeowners policies, including the following:

Personal property covered;
Property covered;
Perils covered;
Activities covered;
Limits of liability;
Insurance to value requirement;
Loss settlement valuation method; and
Applicable exclusions.
The endorsements may affect coverage only under Section I, only under Section II, or under both.

Effects of Premiums
When the coverage provided by an HO policy is changed by an endorsement, the premium charged for the policy is often affected. A change in premium may occur in one of three ways:

Adjusting the base premium;
Making an additional premium charge for an increase in coverage and adding this charge to the base premium; or
Giving credit for a decrease or restriction in coverage and subtracting the credit from the base premium.
Effects on Section I Coverages
Some of the endorsements in this group modify all of the Section I coverages. Others modify only one or two of the coverages. Two of the homeowners endorsements affect all of the Section I coverages: inflation guard endorsements and the earthquake endorsement.

Inflation Guard Endorsement (H0-04-04) — The inflation guard endorsement increases the limits of liability for Coverage A, B, C, and D. The endorsement permits the insured to select the percentage of annual increase, which applies pro-rata throughout the policy year. For instance, if the insured selects an 8% annual increase, at the end of six months, the limits would be increased 4%.

Earthquake Endorsement (H0-04-54) — The earthquake endorsement adds back an excluded peril to the Section I coverages of the policy. This endorsement is priced by means of an addition to the base premium. Earthquake coverage is always written with a deductible. In most areas, the deductible is 5% of the limit of liability for each applicable coverage section, subject to a $250 minimum.

The HO-04-54 endorsement excludes loss resulting directly or indirectly from flood of any nature or tidal wave, whether caused by or resulting from an earthquake. Exterior masonry veneer may be either excluded or covered. If masonry veneer is covered, the entire structure is rated as masonry.

4. Coverage A and B Endorsements
Four of the endorsements that affect only Coverages A and B are discussed below:

Premises alarm or fire protection system (HO-O4-06);
Ordinance or law coverage (HO-O4-77);
Other structures - increased limits (HO-O4-48); and
Special loss settlement (HO-O4-56).
Premises Alarm or Fire Protection System (HO-O4-16) - In order to encourage loss control on the part of the insured, premium credits are given for premises alarm or fire protection systems, such as central station reporting burglar or fire alarms. The credit is applied by multiplying the base premium by the appropriate factor. With a 5% credit, the factor would be 0.95, $100 x.0.95 = $95 adjusted base premium.

The endorsement acknowledges the installation of an approved alarm or automatic sprinkler system on the residence premises for a premium credit. It also provides that the insured agrees to maintain this system in working order and to notify the insurer promptly of any change made to the system or its removal.

Ordinance or Law Coverage (H0-04-77) - Older buildings often do not conform to modern building or zoning codes. If the building is damaged, any repairs or new construction would have to conform to the present zoning or building codes. The basic coverage in the homeowner policy provides for repair or replacement of like kind and quality. If the present code requires more costly repairs, the insured has a potential gap in coverage. This gap can become quite substantial if the code requires demolition of the damaged dwelling. Many city ordinances require demolition of non-conforming buildings if they are damaged to 50% of their value.

For example: Assume Mary's old non-conforming dwelling valued at $100,000 suffers a $50,000 fire loss. The homeowners policy would pay for the $50,000 loss, but if the city ordinance requires that the building be demolished, Mary has suffered another $50,000 loss. This loss is not covered in the basic policy due to the effect of the building ordinance, not the fire.

The ordinance or law coverage endorsement provides that, for an additional premises, loss for damage by an insured peril to covered property or the building containing the covered property will be settled on the basis of any ordinance or law that regulates the construction repair or demolition of this property. This endorsement changes the policy by changing the loss settlement valuation method employed.

Other Structures - Increased Limits (HO-04-48) - The limit of liability for Coverage B -Other Structures can be increased from 10% of Coverage A by the additions for this endorsement. The additional premium developed for this endorsement is $2 per $1,000 of insurance. Each structure on the residence premises for which increased limits are sought is listed on the HO-04-48 endorsement, and the limit of liability is shown. The limits of liability shown on the endorsement are in addition to the 10% of Coverage A provided in the basic policy.

Special Loss Settlement (HO-O4-56) - The standard homeowners policy provides loss settlement on a replacement cost basis if the Coverage A limit of liability represents the requirement and can be modified to 50%, 60%, or 70% of replacement value as shown in the policy declarations. The endorsement is typically used on a policy written to cover a home for which the replacement cost is substantially greater than its market value. Insurers are reluctant to issue replacement cost coverage on such dwellings because of the potential for moral hazard. By adding the HO-04-56 endorsement and purchasing a Coverage A limit in line with the dwelling's market value, an insured may obtain Replacement Cost Coverage for small and medium-sized losses.

For example: If a dwelling had a replacement Cost of $100,000 but a market value of only $60,000, the insured could purchase a homeowners policy with a $60,000 Coverage A limit, endorsed with HO-04-56 to reduce the replacement cost requirement to 60%. In this way, the insured could have Replacement Cost Coverage on dwelling losses up to $60,000 without the penalty for failing to insure 80% of replacement value, and the insurer would avoid providing coverage in excess of the dwelling's market value.

The endorsement also provides for the settlement of losses to personal property, awnings, carpeting, household appliances, outdoor antennas, outdoor equipment (whether or not attached to buildings), and non-building structures at actual cash value at the time of loss but not more than the amount required to repair or replace.

5. Coverage C Endorsements
The following are the endorsements that affect Coverage C - Personal Property:

Coverage C increased Special Limits of Liability (HO-O5-65);
Scheduled Personal Property (HO-04-61); and
Special Personal Property Coverage Form HO-O3.
Coverage C - Increased Special Limits of Liability (HO-4-65) - The blanket coverage on personal property under Coverage C has special limits of liability for particular types of property. For an increased premium, these special limits may be increased. A similar endorsement (HO-O4- 66) is used for HO-3 policies that include the HO-00-15 endorsement described below.

Scheduled Personal Property (HO-O4-61) - The scheduled personal property endorsement is used to provide coverage for risks of direct loss for certain special classes of scheduled property. This endorsement is actually an inland marine personal articles floater.

Scheduled coverage may be provided for jewelry, furs, cameras, musical instruments, silverware, golfer's equipment, fine arts, postage stamps, and rare and current coins. The rating for these coverages is based on standard inland marine rating procedures. A different rate per $100 of value applies to each category of property.

For scheduled musical instruments, coverage applies only to amateur musicians. The endorsement states that the insured agrees not to perform with the covered instrument(s) for pay unless the policy specifically provides for such performance. Coverage for professional musicians requires payment of a significantly higher premium.

The endorsement provides only limited named-perils coverage for breakage of fine arts. Upon the payment of an additional premium, specific fine arts articles may be covered on a risks of direct loss basis.

The advantage of scheduled coverage under the HO-O4-61 endorsement for these classes of special property is twofold. First, the schedule coverage provides limits of liability of any amount required. The homeowners policy has limitation with respect to these types of property. Second, the endorsement provides coverage for risks of direct loss.

For example: If Marie dropped her expensive camera into the surf while photographing an ocean sunrise, the loss would not be covered under Coverage C of her homeowners policy. If the camera were scheduled on the HO-O4-61 endorsement, the loss would be covered.

When writing these classes of property on the HO-O4-61, certain types of underwriting information must always be provided. Each item should be carefully described and identified, including serial numbers where applicable. Appraisals should be periodically updated. Expensive jewelry items should be photographed.

Special Personal Property Coverage (HO-04-90) - This homeowners policy covers personal property on an actual cash value basis. Therefore, if an insured's 4-year-old television set is stolen, the loss payment will be reduced by a deduction for depreciation and will fall short of the amount required to replace the television with a new one.

The HO-04-90 Endorsement changes the basis of loss settlement for personal property from actual cash value to replacement cost. The endorsement also extends replacement cost coverage to certain articles or classes of property if they are separately described and specifically insured in the policy. These types of property include jewelry, furs, cameras and related equipment, musical equipment, silverware, goldware, pewter, and golfer's equipment.

The endorsement states that the payment at the time of loss will be no more than the least of the following amounts:

Replacement cost at the time of loss without deduction for depreciation;
The full cost of repair at the time of loss;
The limit of liability that applies to Coverage C, if applicable;
Any special limits of liability stated in the policy; or
The limit of liability that applies to any item separately described and specifically insured in the policy.
When the replacement cost for the entire loss under the endorsement is more than $500, the insurer will pay no more than the actual cash value until the actual repair or replacement is complete. After repair or replacement is complete, the insurer may, within 180 days of the date of loss, make claim for the difference between actual cash value and replacement cost. This clause enables the insurer to ascertain that the insured actually replaces the property before payment is made on a replacement cost basis. Because the insured receives new for old and is to that extent better off later after the loss, this provision is designed to reduce moral hazard.

6. Endorsements Affecting Section II - Coverages
Various endorsements are available to extend the personal liability coverages of Section II. Many of these endorsements provide an opportunity to "buy back" coverage excluded in the basic homeowners contracts. The following are among the endorsements that affect Section II of a homeowners policy:

Watercraft (HO-24-25);
Snowmobile (HO-24-65);
Business Pursuits (HO-24-7l);
Personal Injury (HO-23-82); and
Additional Residence Rented to Others (HO-04-70).
Watercraft (HO-24-75)
This endorsement provides liability and medical payments coverage for certain watercraft. For an additional premium, Coverage E - Personal Liability and Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others are extended to bodily injury and property damage arising out of the ownership, maintenance, use, loading or unloading of a watercraft described in the endorsement. Losses arising out of entrustment of the described watercraft are also covered. Further coverage is provided for vicarious liability, whether or not imposed by statute, for the actions of a child or minor using the described watercraft.

The endorsement provides for the listing of the horsepower and description of watercraft powered by outboard engines or motors of more than 25 total horsepower. It also includes other watercraft with inboard or inboard/outdrive power. Sailing vessels that are 26 feet or more in length, with or without auxiliary power, are described in a separate paragraph. The descriptions and other information about the watercraft are used both for underwriting purposes and for rating.

Watercrafts, other than sailing vessels, are not covered while being operated in or practicing for a prearranged or organized race. With respect to watercraft with inboard or inboard/outdrive motor power and sailing vessels, coverage does not apply to bodily injury to any employee of an insured arising out of an "in the course of employment by the insured" if the employee's principal duties are in connection with the maintenance or use of the watercraft. Many large inboard motor vessels have a paid captain or deckhand that operates and maintains the vessel. An insured with such an employee would have to obtain separate coverage for the employee. With respect to the same type of watercraft, no coverage is provided if the watercraft is used to carry persons for a charge or is rented to others. Notice that the last two exclusions do not apply to watercraft with outboard motors.

In some areas of the country, watercrafts are used only during part of the year and are stored or not in use the rest of the year. The part of the year during which watercrafts are used is called the navigational period. Although coverage in the HO-24-95 endorsement must be written for the entire policy period, a pro-rata adjustment may be made in the premium for the endorsement to reflect the navigational period of each year.

Snowmobile Endorsement (HO-24-64)
Coverage may be provided for liability arising from the operation of owned snowmobiles by adding the HO-24-64 endorsement to a homeowners policy.

Business Pursuits Endorsement (HO-24-71)
When the Business Pursuits (HO-24-71) endorsement is used, Coverage E - Personal Liability and Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others apply to those specified in the endorsement. When the insured is a teacher, liability for corporal punishment may be added for an additional charge.

There is no coverage for liability arising out of business pursuits of the insured in connection with a business partnership that the insured owns or financially controls. Liability arising out of professional services of any nature, other than teaching, is also excluded, as is bodily injury to an employee. When the insured is a member of the faculty or teaching staff of any school or college, there is no coverage for liability arising but of the use of draft or saddle animals, aircraft, motorized land conveyances, and watercraft when used for instructional purposes.

Personal Injury (HO-24-82)
The Personal Injury (HO-24-82) endorsement may be used to add personal injury coverage to Coverage E - Personal Liability. Personal injury is defined in the endorsement as injury arising out of false arrest, detention or imprisonment, malicious prosecution, libel, slander, defamation of character, invasion of privacy, wrongful eviction, or wrongful entry. The HO-24-82 endorsement contains a special set of exclusions pertaining to this coverage. These provisions exclude liability assumed by the insured under contract or agreement except for any indemnity obligation assumed by the insured under a written contract directly relating to the ownership, maintenance, or use of the premises.

Further exclusions apply to injury caused while violating a penal law or ordinance, injury directly or indirectly related to the employment of a person by the insured, injury arising out of a business engaged in by the insured, or civic or public activities performed for pay by an insured and injury to an insured.

Additional Residence Rented to Others Endorsement (HO-24-70)
The definition of insured location under Coverage E - Personal Liability and Coverage F - Medical Payments to Others is broadened under the HO-24-70 Endorsement to include an additional residence rented to others. The residence may not house more than 4 families. The endorsement provides for the listing of the location of this additional residence and indication of the number of families that occupy it.

7. Section I and Section II Endorsements
Certain endorsements affect both Section I and Section II of the homeowners policy. The following three endorsements that affect both the property and liability Coverage are discussed below:

Permitted Incidental Occupancies Residence Premises (HO-04-42);
Home Day-Care Coverage (HO-04-97); and
Additional Insured - Residence Premises (HO-04-41).
Permitted Incidental Occupancies – Residence Premises (HO-04-02)
If an insured owns a business conducted on the residence premises, property and liability loss exposure arising out of that business may be insured through the use of the HO-04-42 endorsement (Permitted Incidental Occupancies - Residence Premises). The business constituting the incidental occupancy is listed in the endorsement, which also provides the indication of whether the business is conducted in the dwelling or in a separate structure. The location of the business on the residence premises affects the rating of the endorsement.

When the HO-04-42 Endorsement is added to the policy, the $2,500 special limit of liability on business personal property applies only to business personal property not used in the covered business. Consequently, in the event of a loss, personal property that is used in the business and is insured under the endorsement is covered, along with the insured, up to the limit of liability for Coverage C. The endorsement provides that Coverages E and F shall apply to occurrences that arise out of the insured's incidental use of the premises for the business covered by the endorsement.

Home Day Care Coverage Endorsement (HO-04-97)
Home day care centers represent a special kind of incidental occupancy. In recent years, increased litigation involving home day care centers has made this exposure difficult to underwrite. The use of this endorsement may vary by state.

The number of persons receiving day care services is listed on the Home Day Care Coverage Endorsement (HO-04-97). As is the case with the Incidental Occupancies Endorsement, information is required about the location of the day care center, whether it is in the dwelling or in another structure on the resident's premises. If another structure is involved, a limit of liability is indicated and a rating charge per $1,000 of coverage is made. The endorsement extends the Coverage C limit of liability to property used in the day care business. Thus, the $2,500 limit for personal property on the residence premises used for business purposes does not apply to the property used in the day care business.

When the HO-04-97 Endorsement is used, coverage under Section II of the homeowners policy applies to bodily injury and property damage arising out of the day care business. However, there is no coverage for liability arising out of the use of draft or saddle animals, vehicles for use with those animals, aircraft, motorized land conveyances and watercraft. Bodily injury to any employee of an insured, other than residence employee, is also excluded. This endorsement does not alter all the exclusions in Section II of the homeowners policy. For example, abuse and molestation remain excluded even though this endorsement is attached. Coverage of these types of incidents can be secured using a commercial insurance product.

The endorsement includes an annual aggregate limit of liability applying to both Coverages E and F. This limit applies regardless of the number of occurrences, insureds, or claims made of persons injured. A similar aggregate annual limit of liability applies under Coverage F for any one person. Therefore, the most that will be paid under Coverage F for medical expenses payable for bodily injury to anyone person is the dollar amount shown in the declarations for Coverage F. This does not increase the aggregate limit of liability.

Additional Insureds – Residence Premises Endorsement (HO-04-41)
The insured in a homeowners policy is usually an owner-occupant. There are some other situations in which more than one person or entity may have an insurable interest in the dwelling.

The Additional Insureds - Residence Premises (HO-O4-41) endorsement may be used to cover the interest of the grantor of a life estate. Additionally, if a two-family dwelling is co-owned by two persons, each of whom has a distinct residence with a separate entrance, only one of the co-owners may be shown as the named insured under the homeowners policy that insures the dwelling. The interest to the co-owner not shown as the named insured may be partially protected by use of the HO-O4-41 Endorsement, but there would be no coverage for bodily injury to an employee of the co-owner.

For example: Bob is a purchaser-occupant who has entered into a long-term installment contract for the purchase of a dwelling. However, the title does not pass to Bob from Sally, the seller, until all the terms of the installment contract have been satisfied. Sally retains the title until completion of the payments and in no way acts as a mortgagee. In this case, Bob could purchase a homeowners policy as the named insured on the declarations page, and Sally could be covered as an additional insured by using the HO-04-41 Endorsement. The endorsement would show not only Sally's name but also the extent of her insurable interest.

Dwelling and Other Policies
The previous sections described the homeowners policies used by a large number of people to insure their real and personal property. This section discusses other types of residential insurance.

Owners of mobile homes and farms can insure their residences under homeowners policies that include endorsements specifically designed for these types of residences, or under dwelling policies. These are monoline policies that provide property coverage similar in many ways to the property coverage in homeowners policies. In some instances, the owner of a residence may not be able to purchase homeowners insurance because the location of the residence does not meet underwriting requirements. The owners of such residences may be able to purchase property insurance through FAIR plans or beachfront plans, which are assigned risk plans for property that is difficult to insure in the standard insurance market.

1. Residences
Some residences are not eligible for homeowners coverage. In some cases, the value of the dwelling is below the homeowners program minimum. In other cases, the residence may not be owner-occupied, or it may not be eligible because of underwriting reasons.

In other cases, the insured may not want the full range of homeowners coverages, preferring a monoline approach. A final reason for purchasing alternative coverage is cost. An individual may be able to afford only the minimum insurance required by the lending institution holding the mortgage on the dwelling. In this case, the homeowners package of coverages may appear to be too expensive.

2. Dwelling Programs
The dwelling program provides property coverage for dwellings and their contents. The dwelling program includes 3 forms: DP-00-01, DP-00-02 and DP-00-03, which offer dwelling and contents coverage similar to that offered under Section I of the HO-l, HO-2, and HO-3, respectively. The policy structure and approach to property coverage is like that found in the homeowners policies.

The following discussion compares the monoline coverage in the dwelling forms with the coverage in the homeowners policies.

The dwelling forms are similar to those of the homeowners policy. The insuring agreements are identical. The first major difference occurs in the definition section.

The dwelling forms only define "you" and "yours" (the named insured and the spouse, if a resident of the same household) and "we,""us," and "our" (the insurance company). The remainder of the definitions in the homeowners policy pertain to the liability and medical payment coverage of Section II. Because the dwelling forms do not have liability or medical payments coverage, these definitions are unnecessary.

Coverages A-D
The dwelling forms provide coverage for the insured's dwelling, other structures on the described location, the insured's personal property, and loss of use of the dwelling.

Coverage A - Dwelling - The dwelling forms refer to the "described location," while the homeowners policy refers to the "residence premises." When referring to the dwelling on the described location, the dwelling forms specify that it is used principally for dwelling purposes. The dwelling forms also specifically state that if not covered elsewhere in the policy, building equipment and outdoor equipment used for the service of and located on the described location are covered. The remainder of the Coverage A language is identical in the dwelling and homeowners forms.

Coverage B - Other Structures - There are some minor differences in wording between the Dwelling and Homeowners Forms, but the coverage is essentially the same.

Coverage C - Personal Property — The coverage for personal property in the Dwelling forms applies to personal property, usually to the occupancy of a dwelling owned for or used by the insured or resident family members, while the property is on the described location. This is a more restrictive description to the covered property than is in the homeowners policy, which covers personal property owned or used by an insured while it is anywhere in the world.

There are no special limits of liability in the dwelling forms with respect to any type of property, while the homeowners policy provides special limits of liability on many types of property excluded in the dwelling forms.

For example: The dwelling forms exclude boats, other than rowboats and canoes, but the homeowners policy provides a limit of $1,000 on watercrafts, including their furnishings, equipment, and outboard motors.

The homeowners policy has special limits on theft losses to jewelry, furs, firearms, silverware, and similar types of coverage. The unendorsed dwelling forms have no theft coverage, only coverage for damage done by burglars.

The Coverage C limit of liability in the dwelling forms is chosen by the insured. In the homeowners policy, the Coverage C - limit of liability is a set percentage of Coverage A and can be increased at the insured's option. If the insured is a landlord, the insured can choose to purchase only Coverage A under the dwelling program.

There is no such option with the homeowners policy. A tenant may choose to purchase only Coverage C under a dwelling form, thereby obtaining property coverage similar to that provided by a HO-4 policy.

Coverage D - Fair Rental Value and Coverage E - Additional Living Expenses - Coverage D and E in the dwelling forms correspond to Coverage D - Loss of Use in the homeowners policy. The only distinction between the forms concerns Fair Rental Value. The homeowners policy provides fair rental value coverage only if the residence premises where the loss occurred is the principal place of residence of the insured. There is no requirement that the dwelling be the principal place of residence of the insured.

Dwelling form DP-00-01 (basic form) includes only Coverage D. Fair rental value coverage for additional expenses is added by endorsement for an additional premium.

Other Coverages
Many of the other coverages provided in the dwelling forms correspond to the additional coverages in the homeowners policy, but there are some differences. Loss assessment coverage, which is included automatically in the homeowners policy, can be added to the dwelling forms by endorsement. The following paragraphs discuss the other coverages in the dwelling forms and compare them with the coverage provided in the homeowners policy.

Other Structures - The dwelling forms provide up to 10% of the Coverage A limit of liability for loss to other structures. Use of this coverage does not reduce the Coverage A limit of liability for the same loss. Similar coverage is provided in the homeowners policy under Coverage B.

Debris Removal - The debris removal coverage of the dwelling forms is included in the Coverage A limit of liability. The homeowners policy provides an additional 5% of the Coverage A limit for debris removal if required.

Improvements, Alterations, and Additions - The dwelling forms, like the HO-4 Policy, provide 10% of the Coverage C limit of liability to cover a tenant's improvements, alterations and additions. There is no comparable coverage in other homeowners forms.

Worldwide Coverage - In the dwelling forms, up to 10% of the Coverage C limit of liability is provided for loss to the property covered under Coverage C, except rowboats and canoes, while anywhere in the world. The homeowners policy provides worldwide coverage for personal property owned or used by an insured, but a 10% limitation applies to property usually located at a secondary residence.

Rental Value and Additional Living Expense - Under the broad and special dwelling forms (DP-00-02 and DP-00-03), the insured may use up to 20% of the Coverage A limit of liability for loss of both fair rental value and additional living expense. Use of this coverage does not reduce the Coverage A limit of liability for loss of fair rental value. The DP-00-01 form includes 20% of Coverage A for fair rental value only unless Additional Living Expenses are added by endorsement. Payment under this coverage reduces the Coverage A limit of liability by the amount paid for the same loss.

Reasonable Repairs - The dwelling forms and the homeowners policy provide coverage for the cost of reasonable repairs made solely to protect covered property from further damages. This coverage does not increase the limit of liability that applies to the covered property.

Property Removed - Covered property is protected if it is removed from premises endangered by an insured peril under both the dwelling and homeowners forms. In both cases, this coverage applies to direct loss from any cause for a period of 30 days (a limit of 5 days applies to the basic dwelling form).

Trees, Shrubs, and Other Plants - In the dwelling forms and the homeowners policy, the aggregate limit of liability that can be applied to trees, shrubs, plants or lawns is 5% of the Coverage A limit. The limit for anyone tree, plant, or shrub is $500. This coverage can be added by endorsement to Dwelling Form DP-00-01, the basic form, but is included for the same amounts in the DP-00-02 and DP-00-03 forms.

Fire Department Service Charge - As in the homeowners policy, the dwelling forms will pay up to $500 for fire department service charges. Coverage is not provided if the property is within the city limits, municipality, or protection district furnishing the fire department response. This coverage is additional insurance, and no deductible applies.

Collapse - The Broad and Special Dwelling forms (DP-00-02 and DP-00-03) provide the same coverage for collapse that is provided in the homeowners policy. This coverage is not available in the basic dwelling form.

Glass or Safety Glazing Material - Dwelling forms DP-00-02 and DP-00-03 provide coverage for the breaking of glass or safety glazing material that is part of a building, storm door/storm window, and damage to covered property by such glass or safety glazing material.

Coverage does not apply if the dwelling has been vacant for more than 30 days. Similar coverage is provided in the homeowners policy.

Perils Insured Against - The following examinations of the perils insured against in the dwelling program is based on the Dwelling Special Form DP-00-03. (This form will be referred to as DP-3 in the following discussion). Forms DP-00-01 and DP-00-02 provide coverage against essentially the same perils covered by the H0-1 and HO-2 forms. To the extent that there are differences, the dwelling forms tend to provide narrower coverage. For instance, there is no theft coverage for personal property under any of the dwelling forms, although such coverage can be added by endorsement.

Coverage A and B - The DP-3, like the HO-3, insures against risks of direct loss to property under Coverage A and B. In each policy, the coverage for direct loss to real property is defined by the perils that are excluded. Those causes of loss that are not excluded are covered. The DP-3 Form excludes coverage for theft of any property that is not part of a covered building or structure. This means no coverage for personal property but theft coverage would exist if part of the building was stolen, for example, copper piping. It excludes loss by wind, hail, ice, snow, or sleet to (1) outdoor radio and TV antennas and aerials and (2), trees, shrubs, plants, or lawns. The other DP-3 exclusions are essentially the same as those in the HO-3.

Coverage C - Although the Coverage C perils under the DP-3 form are similar to the perils covered by the HO-3, there are some differences. Theft of personal property is not covered under the DP-3, but coverage is provided for damage to personal property caused by burglars, unless the dwelling has been vacant for more than 60 consecutive days. The DP-3 specifically excludes pilferage, theft, burglary and larceny under the vandalism or malicious mischief peril.

The windstorm or hail coverage also differs slightly from the HO-3 in that the DP-3 specifically excludes windstorm or hail damage to canoes, rowboats plants, shrubs and trees. The HO-3 does not cover windstorm or hail damage to trees, shrubs, and other plants, but it does cover damage to watercraft and their trailers, furnishings, equipment, and outboard motors while inside a fully enclosed building.

Conditions - The DP-3 Form contains a single section of conditions. These same conditions are found in the HO-3 Policy; however, some conditions are applicable only to Section I while others are applicable to both Section I and II. The dwelling policy does not contain the references to loss by theft and to credit card or fund transfer card coverage that are in the homeowners policy.

Coverages for Liability and Theft Loss - The dwelling forms do not provide coverage for liability or for theft losses. Coverage is available, however, through a personal liability supplement and theft endorsements.

Personal Liability Supplement - Liability coverage may be written in conjunction with the dwelling policy or independently as a separate policy through the personal liability supplement. The Personal Liability Form, DO-24-01, provides basic personal liability coverage (Coverage L) and medical payments to others coverage (Coverage M). These coverages are similar in format and language to Coverages E and F in Section II of the homeowners policy.

The definition in the personal liability supplement (PL) differs from the homeowners policy only in regard to "residence premises". The definition of "residence premises" in the DL Form includes a 1- to 4-family dwelling. The corresponding language in the homeowners policy refers to l- or 2-family dwellings.

Coverage L - Personal Liability and Coverage M - Medical Payments to Others of the DL Form are identical to Coverages E and F of the homeowners policy. Similarly, the exclusions and additional coverages in the DL form are virtually the same as those applicable to Section II of the homeowners policy. The only difference is that the additional coverage for loss assessment in the homeowners policy is not provided in the DL form as with the dwelling forms, and the conditions applicable to Section I and II in the homeowners policy.

3. HO and DP Policies: Loss Settlement
Loss Example - Section I
The following situations apply to the property coverages of the HO-3 and DP-3 policies. Each loss is a separate occurrence.

Water Damage Exclusion
Loss: The sewer backs up at the James' Florida home, and water overflowed from the drains. The overflow in their first-floor powder room damaged the contents of their linen closet and vanity. In addition, it costs $475 for a cleanup on their home.

Explanation: Damage caused by water backing up through sewers is excluded under Coverage A and is not a peril insured against under Coverage C. There would be no coverage for damage to the dwelling or its contents.

Replacement Cost Endorsement
Loss: Due to a malfunction of the water heater, steam sprayed into the laundry room of the James' Florida home, causing $350 worth of irreparable damage to their clothing. It costs $50 to replace a defective part in the water heater.

Explanation: Under Coverage C, damage to personal property caused by the accidental discharge of steam from within a plumbing system is covered. The James will receive the replacement cost of the clothing because of the personal property replacement cost coverage (HO-04-90) endorsement, less the $250 deductible. Under Coverage A, coverage for this type of accidental discharge excludes damage to the system or appliance from which the water or steam escaped. Therefore, there will be no payment for the cost to repair the water heater.

Loss: During a severe storm, several feet of snow accumulated on the roof of the detached garage at the James' New Jersey property. The garage roof caved in under the weight of the snow, causing some structural damage to the garage walls. At the time of the loss, the replacement cost of the garage was $8,000. Based on estimates from a contractor, and considering the age of the roofing material destroyed, the James and their insurer's adjuster agreed on the following values of the loss: (1) a replacement cost value of $3,300; and (2) an actual value of $2,800.

Explanation: Damage to the garage is covered for risks of direct loss under Coverage B of the James' DP-3 policy. Damage to the garage caused by snow accumulation is not excluded and is covered. The DP-3 Policy provides replacement cost coverage on other structures if the amount of coverage carried equals at least 80% of the structure replacement cost. The James' coverage does not meet this requirement, so the insurance-to-value fraction must be applied to the replacement cost of the loss to determine the amount payable if settlement is made on this basis. The calculation, which includes the $100 policy deductible, is as follows:

$6,000 divided by (80% of $8,000) X ($3,300 less $100) = 15/16 X $3,200 = $3,000

The James' will receive $3,000 in payment for the loss because this is greater than the $2,500 settlement amount on an actual cash value basis ($2,900 less the $100 deductible).

Additional Expenses - DP3
Loss: A five-story apartment building near the James' Florida home was severely damaged by fire. The fire department ordered the James and several of their neighbors to evacuate their homes because the fire threatened to spread to homes near the apartment building. The James were not allowed to return to their home for 3 days after the fire because the fire department feared that the fire-gutted apartment building might collapse. The James incurred the following additional living expenses during this period:

$375 for 3 nights lodging at a motel; and
$270 for 3 days of restaurant meals.
The cost of groceries for the James averaged $35 per day when they eat at home.

Explanation: Coverage E Additional Living Expense provides coverage for additional living expenses if a civil authority prohibits the insured from use of the residence premises as the result of direct damage to neighboring premises by a peril insured against under the the dwelling policy for up to 2 weeks. The James' $375 motel bill and their additional expenses for meals qualify for payment under CoverageE. The James' additional food expense is the $270 cost of restaurant meals less the $105 that they would have spent to eat at home, which comes to $165. The James' recovery will be as follows:

Motel bill  

$375

Additional cost of meals

$165

Less deductible

$250

Total payment

$290

When determining the loss settlement in such a case, it is necessary to consider other increased expenses, such as laundry, transportation, and telephone. However, the insured's usual expenses for such items, as well as any decrease in the cost of utilities or other expenses, would be considered in determining the total amount of the additional expense.

4. Mobile Homes
As housing prices have increased in recent years, so have mobile homes sales. Mobile homes are generally less expensive than conventional housing. The flexibility of mobile homes also makes them useful when the housing requirement may not be permanent. Often in "boom" towns when employment is temporarily increased due to the operation of an oil shale facility or surface mine, the workers purchase and set up mobile homes. Mobile homes also are used as summer or vacation homes.

The owners of mobile homes face the same exposures to loss, as do owners of conventional homes. Therefore, a mobile homeowner may experience loss to the dwelling or another structure on the residence premises and the contents of either. There is also an exposure to Liability Loss because of Bodily Injury or Damage to the Property of Others.

The Mobile Home and Other Structures - The mobile home itself is personal property rather than real property. The essence of the mobile home is its impermanence. In some areas of the country, a mobile home is required to have wheels and axles attached even when set up. This is to emphasize the mobile nature of the structured dwelling. These differences are usually recognized in the manner in which the mobile homes are taxed. Therefore, mobile homes are sometimes taxed as vehicles rather than structures.

When a mobile home is set up, it may be surrounded by skirting that conceals the wheels and gives the appearance of a permanent structure. Patio covers are often attached to mobile homes, and sheds and similar outbuildings are set up nearby. When they are set up, mobile homes are subject to the same perils as any other structure. Exposures to the perils of fire, vandalism, and crime are roughly equivalent to those of a conventional dwelling. Mobile homes are also susceptible to damage from windstorm and earthquake depending on how they are set up.

Mobile homes generally do not remain on their tires. They are set on blocks or piers, and, in some cases, on masonry footings. Masonry footings provide a very stable foundation. But they are costly and therefore seldom used. When the mobile home is set up, there are 2 major considerations with respect to the windstorm and earthquake perils. First, the piers or footings must be strong and stable enough to properly support the unit. The second consideration, tie down, is important because a windstorm may either move a mobile home sideways or lift it off the ground. An earthquake can subject the unit to sudden and severe upward and sideways thrusts. Therefore, a properly set up mobile home should not only have a strong and stable foundation, but it also should be tied down to anchors buried in the ground to prevent the unit from moving upward or sideways.

Mobile homes frequently suffer severe damage in hurricanes or tornadoes, often resulting in total loss of the units, as well as loss of life of the occupants. Because mobile homes may be relegated to less desirable housing areas by zoning laws, they often are located in areas subject to flooding. Theoretically, the mobile nature of the mobile home should make it possible to move a unit that is threatened by rising water, but this is seldom practical. A residential mobile home may be constructed of 2 or 3 modules. Each of these modules may be as large as 10 by 60 feet.

These units are mobile only in a technical sense. It usually takes many hours of specialized labor to prepare a unit for moving. Units on masonry foundations can take days to prepare.

When mobile homes are moved from the sales lot to the setup site, or from one site to another, they are subject to transportation perils. The high cost of disassembly, transportation, and reassembly result in infrequent mobile home moves after the initial setup.

Other Personal Property and Personal Liability - The contents of a mobile home are similar to those in a conventional dwelling and are subject to the same perils. The mobile home owner also is subject to the same liability perils as the owner of a conventional home. Consequently, there are corresponding similarities in coverage needs.

The mobile home endorsement, the attached homeowner form, and the declarations page constitute the complete mobile home policy. As with all homeowners policies, policy endorsements may be attached to modify the coverage. The mobile home endorsement states that the insurance is subject to all applicable provisions of the homeowners form except as revised by the endorsement. The differences between the HO-3 and the mobile home policy are in the definitions of "residence premises." It is changed to mean the mobile home and other structures located on land owned or leased by the insured where the insured resides. The location must be shown as the residence premises in the declarations.

Mobile Home Coverages
Owners of mobile homes have several options for insuring their dwellings. The American Association of Insurance Services (AAIS) and some specialty insurers have developed policies especially for mobile homes. Insurers that use forms developed by the Insurance Services Office (ISO) provide coverage for mobile homes by attaching a mobile home endorsement, MH-04-01, to a homeowners policy. The following discussion is based on the ISO forms, specifically the endorsement used with an HO policy. According to ISO rules, the endorsement may be used with an HO-2 policy. Tenants of mobile homes may use the HO-4 policy without modification.

Coverage A - Dwelling - The dwelling coverage applies to mobile homes used primarily as a private residence. Coverage applies to structures and utility tanks attached to the mobile home. It also applies to floor coverings, appliances, dressers, cabinets, and similar items that are permanently installed. This provision recognizes the fact that standard features of most mobile homes are built-in cabinets and appliances.

Coverage B - Other Structures - The limit of liability for Coverage B is 10% of the limit that applies to Coverage A. However, if that amount is less than $2,000, a minimum limit of $2,000 is provided.

Additional Coverages - The additional coverage for property removed provides up to $500 for reasonable expenses incurred by the insured for removal and return of the mobile home if it is endangered by an insured peril. No deductible applies to this coverage.

Section I - Conditions - The condition regarding loss settlement does not include carpeting and appliances as property to be valued on the basis of actual cash value. These types of property are included in Coverage A and are covered for risks of direct loss.

The Mobile Home Endorsement applies to loss of a pair or set of panels and will pay the reasonable cost of repairing or replacing damaged paneling to match the undamaged part as closely as possible. The insurer does not guarantee the availability of matching panels and will not be liable for replacement of all paneling if a suitable match is not found.

Under the mortgage clause, the word "mortgage" includes a trustee or lien holder. Mobile homes are not considered real property, and liens may take the form of chattel mortgages or trust certificates.

Mobile Home Endorsements
Other Mobile Home Endorsements - A mobile home policy can be endorsed with many of the Homeowners Endorsements. The following four endorsements are unique to Mobile Home Coverage:

Actual Cash Value (MH-04-02);
Transportation/Permission to Move (MH-04-03);
Mobile Home Lien Holder's Single Interest (MH-04-04);
Property Removed Increased Limit (MH-04-06).
Actual Cash Value - Mobile Home Endorsement (MH-O4-02) - This coverage on an actual cash value basis is desired for the mobile home. The MH-04-02 Endorsement is used in addition to the MH-04-01. The MH-04-02 Endorsement changes the loss settlement terms to an actual cash value basis. At the insured's discretion, covered property losses may be settled in one of three ways.

The insurer may pay the cost of repairing the damage, the cost of replacing the damaged property with similar property (but not necessarily from the same manufacturer), or it may pay the amount in money. If the amount is paid in money, the insurer will pay no more than the lowest of the following:

The difference between actual cash value of the property before and after the loss;
The cost of repairing the damage; or
The cost of replacing the damaged property with similar property.
Transportation/Permission To Move Endorsement (MH-O4-03) - The Transportation/Permission to Move Endorsement provides coverage for perils of transportation and at the new location, anywhere in the United States or Canada, for a period of 30 days from the effective date of the endorsement. The perils of transportation are collision, upset, and stranding or skidding (while the mobile home is being transported on a licensed ferry line).

Mobile Home Lien Holder's Single Interest Endorsement (MH-O4-04) - The Mobile Home Lien Holder's Single Interest Endorsement provides coverage for the lien holder only. The first coverage is transportation coverage for the limited perils of collision and upset. This coverage is designed to cover a loss while the unit is being delivered. In addition, coverage is provided to the lien holder for loss due to the owner's conversion, embezzlement, or secretion of the mobile home. Because the mobile home can be moved, some lien holders require the mobile homeowner to purchase this endorsement to protect the lien holder's interest in the event of any of the covered losses.

Property Removed Increased Limit Endorsement (HO-O4-06) - The mobile home endorsement provides $500 in order to cover removal expenses for a mobile home threatened by an insured peril. With a large, multi-unit mobile home, removal costs alone may run over $2,000. Added to this would be about the equivalent expense of resetting the mobile home up after the threat from the insured peril had passed. For this reason, the Property Removed Increased Limit Endorsement HO-04-06 provides a means for the insured to purchase a sufficiently high removal limit to cover the expenses to take down, transport, and set the mobile home up again.

Vacation Mobile Home Endorsement - Many mobile homes are used in recreational areas as vacation homes. Although some of these are set up in mobile home parks, many are not. For instance, a mobile home may be placed in the mountains or at the side of a lake or river. The exposures faced by vacation mobile homes are somewhat different from the exposures for mobile homes used as ordinary year-round residences. Often vacation areas do not have full-time fire departments. Also, there may be no telephone in the mobile home or no neighbors nearby to report a fire in the owner's absence. All of these factors contribute to the likelihood of increased loss severity if a fire does occur. Because many vacation mobile home residences are located in heavily wooded areas, they are subject to unusually high fire hazards. Placing a mobile home in a forest area increases potential loss frequency and probable severity.

Mobile Home Endorsement MH-O4-01 - A mobile home is eligible for coverage if it is designed for portability and year-round living. The mobile home also may not be less than 10 feet wide and 40 feet long.

5. Farm Owners
Farm owners may be eligible to insure the liability exposures from their farming operations under homeowners policies with the appropriate endorsements. These endorsements cover incidental farming operations on the residence premises or at another location, or larger farms operated away from the residence premises. The endorsement can be used only if the farming is not the insured's primary occupation.

Incidental Farming Personal Liability Endorsement (HO-24-72) - The Incidental Farming Personal Liability Endorsement extends the personal liability and medical payments coverage in Section II to incidental farming operations conducted by the insured. If the farming is on the insured's residence premises, it must be incidental to the use of the premises as dwelling, and the income derived from it may not be the insured's primary source of income. Coverage also applies if the residence premises is used for the sheltering and raising of animals. Coverage is not available, however, if the residence premises is used for raising purposes.

If the incidental farming activities are at a separate location, that location must be specified in the endorsement. The permissible farming activities include the boarding or grazing of the insured's animals or use of the land as garden space. The income derived may not be the insured's primary source of income, and there is no coverage if the location is used for the purposes of raising farm animals.

Farmers Personal Liability Endorsement (HO-24-73) - This endorsement is designed to cover the liability exposure arising out of a commercial farming operation conducted away from the insured's residence premises. The endorsement contains a supplemental declaration page. Some of the definitions applicable to Section II of the homeowners policy are modified to reflect that farming operations are covered. The Section II liability coverages and Section II exclusions in the endorsement replace those in the homeowners policy. A new coverage (Coverage G) may be selected by the insured to cover animal collision. Additional conditions apply if farm employees are covered.

Declarations - The first portion of the HO-24-73 Endorsement consists of a supplementary declaration page, which sets forth all farm premises rented, owned/operated by the insured, or tented to others. An advance premium is charged for each of the farm premises indicated.

For farms owned/operated or rented/operated by the insured or the insured's employees, the total acreage of the initial farm premises is indicated. An additional farm premises with buildings and a rate per premises are also listed.

For farms owned by the insured but rented to others, the declaration lists all farm premises without buildings, each farm premises with buildings, and the rate that applies per premises, along with the total acreage of farms rented to others. An additional flat charge for all such farms is based on the total acreage.

Coverage under the endorsement assumes that no business other than farming is conducted on the insured location. Therefore, if any other businesses are conducted, they must be listed in the declarations.

The second section of the declarations applies to farm employees. The covered employees are separated into 3 categories based on the number of days per year they are employed. A different rate per employee in each category may be charged, or the premium may be based on a rate per $100 of payroll.

If coverage for animal collision (Coverage G) is desired, the number of animals to be covered should be indicated in the final section of the declarations. The Coverage G limit of liability is $400 per animal.

The definition of "business," as it applies to coverage under the HO-24-73 Endorsement, does not include farming, and the definition of "insured location" is changed to "include the farm premises." The endorsement also adds definitions on "farm employees,""farming," and "insured farm employees."

Coverage and Exclusions - Only Section II of the homeowners policy is changed by the HO-24-23 Endorsement. Medical payments coverage is extended to insure farm employees and to persons who are injured by farm employees off the insured location in the course of employment by the insured. Under the endorsement, the exclusions for Coverage E and F apply to pollution liability and to bodily injury for farm employees.

Coverage B is provided only if a premium is paid for this coverage. Coverage G pays the amount shown in the declarations for loss by death of any cattle, horse, mule, donkey, swine, sheep, or goat owned by an insured. In order to be covered, death must have been the result of collision between the animal and a vehicle not owned or operated by the insured or an employee. The collision must occur while the animal is within a public area.

Additional Conditions - If a premium is shown in the declarations for Coverage of Farm Employees, the coverage is subject to additional conditions. The premium shown in the declarations is a deposit premium that will be applied to the earned premium due at the end of the policy period. The insured must keep records necessary for premium computation and must send copies to the insurer at the end of the policy period. The insurer also reserves the right to inspect the insured's operations and audit the insured's records and books.

Personal Lines Insurance: Related Concepts
1. Loss Assessment
The HO policy will pay up to $1,000 for the insured's share of any loss assessment charged by a corporation or association of property owners under certain conditions. The assessment must be made as a result of bodily injury or property damage to which Section II of the policy would apply, or for liability for an act of a director, officer, or trustee acting in that capacity. The coverage for loss assessment resulting from acts of a director, officer, trustee of the corporation or association of property owners is provided only if the director, officer, or trustee is elected by the members of the association or corporation and serves without pay.

This coverage is limited to loss assessment charged against the insured as owner or tenant of the residence premises. Loss assessment charges against the insured or a corporation or association of property owners by a governmental body is excluded. Regardless of the number of assessments, the $1,000 limit is the most that will be paid for loss arising out of one accident or one covered act of a director, officer, or trustee (an act involving more than one director, officer, or trustee in a single act). The loss assessment exclusion under Coverage E, discussed previously, does not apply to this coverage.

2. Loss Settlement
The provision in this condition explains how losses to covered property will be settled. Losses to personal property, awnings, carpeting, household appliances, outdoor antennas, and outdoor equipment attached or not attached to building, and non-building structures are all settled on an actual cash basis.

Non-building structures are those not designed for human occupancies, such as fences, concrete patios, and swimming pools.

An endorsement may be added to the policy that changes the settlement basis for personal property to replacement cost. This endorsement will be discussed in a later segment.

Losses to the dwelling and other structures are paid on the basis of replacement cost with no deduction for depreciation. Insurance on a replacement cost basis is one of the most important features of the homeowners policy. The homeowners policy contains a provision that reduces the loss payment if the insured does not carry coverage equal to at least 80% of the replacement cost of the damaged structure. Note that the 80% figure applies not only to the dwelling but also to other covered structures.

For example: Assume that an insured residence premises includes a detached garage. The Coverage B limit on that garage must be equa1 to at least 80% of the replacement cost of the garage for replacement cost coverage to apply to a loss to the garage.

Determining whether a loss under a homeowners policy will be settled on a replacement cost basis is a simple process. The following insurance-to-value formula is used to determine whether the insured has coverage equal to at least 80% of the replacement cost of the damaged structure.

Insurance-to-Value Fraction
Amount of insurance carried divided by 80% of replacement cost

For example: Assume that an insured carries a homeowners policy with a Coverage A limit of $100,000 on a dwelling that has a replacement cost of $110,000. Using these dollar amounts in the insurance to-value fraction yields the following:

$100,000 (100) divided by (80% of $110,000) 88 equals 1.14

In the event of a covered loss to the dwelling, the insured would receive settlement on a replacement cost basis because the value of the fraction is greater than 1.

For example: Assume that the same insured's residence premises also includes a detached garage with a replacement cost of $20,000. On the HO-3, the Coverage B limit is 10% of the Coverage A limit, unless the insured purchases additional limit. Therefore, the insured's policy with $100,000 of coverage on the dwelling provides $10,000 of coverage on the detached garage.

The insurance to-value fraction yields the following result with regard to coverage on the garage:

$10,000 (or 10) divided by (80% of $20,000) 16 equals .625

Because the value of the fraction is less than 1, the amount of insurance carried on the garage does not meet the policy's insurance-to-value requirements. Therefore, if a covered loss occurred to the garage, payment would not be made on a replacement cost basis. When the amount of coverage carried does not meet the insurance-to-value requirements, the policy will pay the larger of the following two amounts:

The insurance-to-value fraction, multiplied by the replacement cost of the loss; and
The actual cash value of the loss, typically meaning replacement cost less depreciation.
For example: Assume that the roof of the insured's $20,000 detached garage was damaged by a hurricane. The calculations above show that the loss will not be settled on a replacement cost basis. However, both the replacement cost and the actual cash value of the damage to the roof are needed to determine the amount the insured will receive. Assume that the replacement cost of the damage to the roof is $1,000. Because the roof is 10 years old, the actual cash value of the loss is $500. The amount of the insured will receive depends on which amount is greater: (1) the insurance-to-value fraction, multiplied by the $1,000 replacement cost; or (2) the $500 actual cash value. For purpose of illustration, the effect of the policy deductible has been ignored. Calculating the amount payable under the 1st option yields the following: Amount of insurance carried multiplied by the replacement cost divided by 80% of the replacement cost of the loss.

$10,000 times $1,000 divided by 80% of $20,000 equals $625

Because $625 is greater than $500, the insured will receive $625 in settlement of the loss. If, however, the actual cash value of the damage were $900 because the garage roof had recently been replaced, the insured would receive a $900 settlement. The insured always receives the larger of the two amounts.

Other Insurance
If a loss covered by a homeowners policy is also covered by another insurance policy, the homeowners policy will contribute to the loss settlement on a pro-rata basis for property claims.

For the purposes of illustration, assume that a loss qualifies for payment under Coverage C of 2 Homeowners Policies. The calculation of each insurer's pro-rata share of the loss is a 2-step process. First, the Coverage C limits of the 2 policies would be added to find the sum of the Coverage C limits. Second, the Coverage C limit of each policy would be divided by the sum of the Coverage C limits. The result of this calculation, for each policy, is the percentage of loss the policy will pay.

For example: Assume that a loss is covered under polices A and B with coverage limits of $10,000 and $40,000, respectively. If the amount of the loss settlement were $5,000, the pro-rate share of each insurer would be calculated as follows:

Sum of coverage limits = $10,000+$40,000 = $50,000

Insurer A's pro-rata share: $10,000 divided by $50,000 x $5,000 = $1,000

Insurer B's pro-rata share: $40,000 divided by $50,000 x $5,000 = $4,000

Additional Loss Settlement Conditions
Insurer's Option - This condition gives the insurer the right, after providing written notice to the insured, to repair or replace any part of the damaged property with like property. Insurers are often able to purchase items from replacement services at costs lower than the insured would have to pay in the retail market. The result is that the insured is indemnified, and the insurer has met its contractual obligation while reducing loss settlement costs.

Loss Payment - This condition indicates who will be paid and when payment will be made. It is, with regard to the Section I coverages, the insurer's promise. It states that payment will be made to the named insured unless the policy provides otherwise, or unless someone else is legally entitled to receive payment, for instance, the "legal representative" of the insured following the insured's death. The loss settlement provisions are reinforced by the requirement that a proof of loss be filed by the insured. After the insured files the proof of loss, the insurer will pay within 60 days after reaching an agreement with the insured, receiving a final judgment (in a legal action), or following the filing of an appraisal award.

Abandonment of Property - This condition prohibits the insured from claiming that property damaged in a covered loss is automatically owned by and the responsibility of the insurer. The insurer has the option of paying for damaged items in full and then taking the item as salvage.

Mortgage Clause - Most insured dwellings are purchased with a mortgagee. In such cases, the name and address of the mortgagee (the lender) are shown on the policy declarations page. The mortgage clause provides that any loss payable under Coverage A or B will be paid to the insured and the mortgagee as their interest appear in the policy. In practice, insurers often draw a settlement check payable to both the insured and the mortgagee, and the proceeds of the check are used to pay for repairs necessitated by the loss.

No Benefit to Bailee - When an insured delivers property to a bailee, the bailee's receipt may state that if the insured has valid insurance on the property and there is a loss, the bailee need not pay the insured.

Recovered Property - If either the insurer or the insured recovers stolen property for which a loss payment has already been made, that party is required to notify the other of the recovery. The insured then has the option of accepting the recovered property and returning the loss payment to the insurer, or giving the property to the insurer and keeping the loss payment.

3. FAIR Plans
Fair Access to Insurance Requirements (FAIR) plans were set up in response to the urban riots of the 1960s. At that time, property insurance was difficult to obtain in the "congested urban core" of many major cities.

The FAIR plan is an assigned risk property program. In order to be eligible for FAIR plan coverage, the insured must have the property inspected. Only property that meets the inspection criteria will be insured. When the program was drawn up, the concern was that well-kept properties with inner-city locations would be prevented from obtaining coverage by virtue of their location. The program directs that the inspection of the property must concentrate on the property alone and ignore "environmental perils." The environmental perils that the program designers had in mind were primarily those found in run-down, crime-ridden urban slums. Others noticed that brush hazards found in wealthy, tree-studded suburban areas might also be considered "environmental hazards."

Many FAIR Plans do not provide the homeowners coverage package, but such coverage is available in some states. In most states, however, only coverage for fire and a limited number of other perils is provided by the FAIR Plan. Other coverages are provided by means of a difference in conditions policy written outside of the FAIR Plan. Such policies can provide coverage for risks of direct loss, while excluding fire and the other perils covered under the FAIR Plan Policy. Because it is the fire peril that is the major concern in these cases, the difference in conditions policy can be written in the private market.

Beach Front Plans
Beach-front plans are similar to FAIR plans and are part of an assigned risk property insurance program. The difference is in the plans' origin: Beach-front plans were set up in response to heavy windstorm losses rather than urban riots.

Beach-front property in many parts of the country is exposed to heavy windstorm losses during hurricanes and lesser windstorms. Much of this property also is vulnerable to damage from high waves. The beach-front plans provide coverage for fire and windstorm losses.

4. Insuring against Other Risks
Some perils, such as floods and earthquakes, are generally not covered by any of the standard homeowners policies. Residents of areas prone to crime, fires, and windstorms also may find insurance companies unwilling or unable to sell them policies. For owners of high-risk homes, there are several options.

Flood Insurance - The National Flood Insurance Program, administered by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), offers flood insurance through the federal government. To qualify, homeowners must live in one of 18,300 flood-prone communities that have taken specific steps to control flood damage. Rates vary according to the structure of the house and its vulnerability to flooding. The average annual premium is about $308, which provides around $85,000 in coverage.

Although FEMA estimates that as many as 11 million buildings may be at risk of flooding, only 2.6 million are currently insured for it. An estimated 90% of the homes in the 1992 Midwest floods were not insured for flood damage. For homeowners who might be tempted to wait until a flood alert is sounded, take note. There is a 5-day waiting period between the time that a flood policy is purchased and the time when it becomes effective.

Earthquake Insurance - Most insurance companies offer earthquake coverage as an endorsement on homeowners policies. Premiums can run as high as 50% of a home's regular coverage, but rates will vary according to the vulnerability of the house. Wood-frame homes, which tend to withstand earthquakes better than brick, cost much less to insure.

Windstorm Insurance - Most policies include insurance for windstorm damage. However, companies may exclude coverage for the peril if a house is unusually vulnerable to windstorms by virtue of its location. Seven coastal states currently have beach and windstorm insurance plans to pick up where the regular policies leave off: Alabama, Florida, Louisiana, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, and Texas.

High-Risk Policies - Insurers may refuse to sell full replacement cost coverage for homes that are particularly vulnerable to fires, crime, or other perils. Unsafe wiring, unrepaired structural damage, or a history of vandalism may make a home uninsurable for some companies.

For people who have difficulty obtaining insurance in the standard market, there are 31 states and the District of Columbia that offer fair access to insurance requirement plans. FAIR plans are operated by private insurers that share the losses and profits in proportion to their business in the state. FAIR plan policies are often more expensive and less comprehensive than standard homeowners insurance.

Residents of high-crime areas who have the required security devices also may qualify for insurance with the Federal Crime Insurance Program. The policy covers only losses due to burglary or robbery.

